CHAPTER I.
The world was all before them, where to choose
Their place of rest, and Providence their guide:
They, hand in hand, with wandering steps and slow,
Through Eden took their solitary way.
Paradise Lost
.
If
we can believe the immortal poet, from
whom we have taken the above lines, to serve as
our letter of introduction to the gentle reader, the
grief of our first parents for the loss of Paradise
was not so deep and overwhelming but that they
almost immediately found comfort, when they
reflected
they had exchanged it for the land of
Eden,itself a paradise, though an earthly and
unsanctified one:
Some natural tears they dropt, but wiped them soon.
The exiles of America, who first forsook their
homes on the borders of the Atlantic, to build
their hearths among the deserts of the West, had
a similar consolation; they were bending their
steps towards a land, to which rumour at first, and
afterwards the reports of a thousand adventurous
visitants, had affixed the character of a second
elysium. The Dorado of the Spaniards, with its
cities built of gold, its highways paved with
diamonds
and rubies, was not more captivating to
the brains of Sir Walter Raleigh and his fellow
freebooters of the 16th century, than was the
Kentucky
of the red men, with its fertile fields,
and ever-blooming forests, to the imaginations of
their descendants, two hundred years after. It
was not unnatural, indeed, that men should
regard
as an Eden the land in which the gallant
Daniel Boone, while taking his pleasing
ramble
on the 22d of December, 1769, discovered
myriads of trees, some gay with blossoms, others
rich with fruits; which blossoms and fruits, as he
tells us, were beautifully coloured, elegantly
shaped, and charmingly flavoured.
[1]
[1]
See the worthy pioneer's Adventures, purporting to
be written by himself, though undoubtedly furbished up by
some flowery friend.
It might be difficult, in these degenerate days,
to find fruits and flowers adorning any forest in
Kentucky, at Christmas; yet there was enough,
and more than enough, in the wild beauty and
unexampled fertility of the country, to excuse the
rapture of the hunter and to warrant high
expectations
on the part of the eastern emigrants,
to whom he had opened a path through the
wilderness
,
which they were not slow to follow. A
strong proof of the real attractions of the land
was to be seen in the crowds rushing towards it,
year after year, regardless of all adverse
circumstances
.
Suffering and privation of all kinds
were to be endured on the long and savage road,
in which mountain, river, bog, and forest were to
be passed, and often, too, in the teeth of a lurking
foe; while peril of every imaginable aspect was
still to be encountered, when the journey was at
an end. The rich fields,the hunting-grounds of
a dozen tribes of Indians,to be possessed, were
first to be won, and won from an enemy at once
brave and cruel, resolute and wily, who had shown
no disposition to yield them except with life, and
who had already stained them with the best blood
of the settler. Such evils were well known to
exist; but they imposed little check on the ardour
of adventurers: the tide of emigration, at first a
little rivulet, lost among forests, increased to a
river, the river grew into a flood, overflowing the
whole land; and, in 1792, sixteen years after the
first block-house was built in the woods, the `
wilderness
'
of Kentucky was admitted into the
Federal
Union, a free and sovereign State, with a
population of seventy-five thousand souls.
Ten years before that happy eventfor it is
to this early period we must ask the attention of
the reader,the Shawanee and the Wyandot still
hunted the bear and buffalo in the cane-brake, and
waylaid the settler at the gates of his solitary
stronghold. The `District of Kentucky,' then
within the territorial jurisdiction of Virginia,
comprised
but three inhabited counties, Fayette,
Jefferson
,
and Lincoln; of which, to play the
geographer
briefly, it needs only to say, that the first
occupied all the country north and east of the
Kentucky river; the second all the region west
of that river as far as Green river, which, with
the redoubtable Salt, the river of Roarers, formed
also its southern bounds; while the third extended
over all the territory lying south of the two others,
and was therefore the first reached by emigrants
coming from Virginia and the Carolinas through
the Gap of the Cumberlands. In these counties,
the settlements were already somewhat numerous,
although confined, for the most part, to the
neighbourhood
of the
stations
, or forts, which were the
only effectual places of refuge for the husbandman
and his family, when the enemy was abroad in the
land. These stations were mere assemblages of
huts, sometimes, in number, approaching to
villages
,
surrounded, or at least connected, hut to
hut, by ranges of strong palisades, easily
defended
against assailants armed only with knives and
rifles. Founded, in the first place, by some bold
and resolute pioneer, each station, as the land
filled with settlers, was enlarged to receive other
inhabitants, who were glad to unite with the
founder
in defending from attack a place so necessary
to their own safety, and easily conceded him a
kind of military authority over them, which was
usually confirmed by a commission from the State,
on the division of the District into counties, and
exercised with due military spirit, on all proper
occasions.
The sun of an August afternoon, 1782, was yet
blazing upon the rude palisades and equally rude
cabins of one of the principal stations in Lincoln
county, when a long train of emigrants, issuing
from the southern forest, wound its way over the
clearings, and among the waving maize-fields
that surrounded the settlement, and approached the
chief gate of its enclosure.
The party was numerous, consisting perhaps of
seven or eight score individuals in all, men,
women
,
and children, the last bearing that
proportion
to the others in point of numbers usually
found in a borderer's family, and thus, with the
help of pack-horses, cattle, and a few negroes, the
property of the more wealthy emigrants, scattered
here and there throughout the assemblage, giving
to the whole train the appearance of an army, or
moving village, of Vandals in quest of some new
home to be won with the edge of the sword. Of
the whole number there were at least fifty well
armed; some of these, however, being striplings
of fourteen, and, in one or two instances, even of
twelve, who balanced the big rifle on their
shoulders
,
2*
or sustained it over their saddle-bows, with
all the gravity and dignity of grown warriors;
while some few of the negroes were provided with
the same formidable weapons. In fact, the
dangers
of the journey through the wilderness
required
that every individual of a party should be
well armed, who was at all capable of bearing
arms; and this was a kind of capacity which
necessity
instilled into the American frontiersman
in the earliest infancy.
Of this armed force, such as it was, the two
principal divisions, all well mounted, or at least
provided with horses, which they rode or not as
the humour seized them, were distributed in
military
order on the front and in the rear; while
scouts leading in the van, and flanking-parties
beating the woods on either side, where the nature
of the country permitted, indicated still further
the presence of a martial spirit on the part of the
leaders. The women and children, stowed
carefully
away for the most part with other valuable
chattels, on the backs of pack-horses, were
mingled
with droves of cattle in the centre, many of
which were made to bear burthens as well as the
horses. Of wheeled carriages there was not a
single one in the whole train, the difficulties of the
road, which was a mere bridle-path, being such
that they were never, at that early day,
attempted
to be brought into the country, unless when
wafted in boats down the Ohio.
Thus marshalled, and stealing from the depth of
the forest into the clearings around the Station,
there was something in the appearance of the train
wild, singular, and striking. The tall and robust
frames of the men, wrapped in blanket-coats
and hunting-frocks,some of which, where the
wearers were young and of gallant tempers,
were profusely decked with fringes of yellow,
green, and scarlet; the gleam of their weapons;
and the tramp of their horses; gave a warlike air
to the whole, typical, it might be supposed, of the
sanguinary struggle by which alone the desert
was to be won from the wandering barbarian;
while the appearance of their families, with their
domestic beasts and the implements of husbandry,
was in harmony with what might be supposed the
future destinies of the land, when peaceful labour
should succeed to the strife of conquest.
The exiles were already in the heart of their
land of promise, and many within view of the
haven where they were to end their wanderings.
Smiles of pleasure lighted their way-worn
countenances
,
as they beheld the waving fields of
maize and the gleam of the distant cabins; and
their satisfaction was still further increased, when
the people of the Station, catching sight of them,
rushed out, some mounted and others on foot, to
meet them, uttering loud shouts of welcome, such
as, in that day, greeted every band of new-comers;
and adding to the clamour of the reception a
feude-joie
,
which they fired in honour of the numbers
and martial appearance of the present company.
The salutation was requited, and the stirring
hurrahs
returned, by the travellers, most of whom
pressed forward to the van in disorder, eager to
take part in the merry-making ere it was over, or
perhaps to seek for friends who had preceded
them in the journey through the wilderness. Such
friends were, in many instances found, and their
loud and affectionate greetings were mingled with
the scarce less cordial welcomes extended by the
colonists even to the unknown stranger. Such was
the reception of the emigrants at that period and
in that country, where men were united together
by a sense of common danger; and where every
armed visiter, besides being an accession to the
strength of the colonists, brought with him such
news of absent friends and still remembered homes
as was sure to recommend him to favour.
The only individual who, on this occasion of
rejoicing
,
preserved a melancholy countenance, and
who, instead of riding forward, like the others, to
shake hands with the people of the Station,
betrayed
an inclination to avoid their greetings
altogether
,
was a young man, who, from the position
he occupied in the band, and from other causes,
was entitled to superior attention. With the rank
and nominal title of Second Captain,a dignity
conferred upon him by his companions, he was,
in reality, the commander of the party, the
ostensible
leader being, although a man of good repute
on the Virginia border, entirely wanting in the
military reputation and skill which the other had
acquired in the armies of the Republics, and of
which the value was fully appreciated, when
danger
first seemed to threaten the exiles on their
march. He was a youth of scarce twenty-three
years of age; but five of those years had been
passed in camps and battles; and the labours,
passions
,
and privations of his profession had
antedated
the period of manhood. A frame tall and
athletic, a countenance which, although retaining
the smoothness and freshness of youth, was yet
marked with the manly gravity and decision of
mature life, added, in appearance, at least six
years to his age. He wore a hunting-frock of the
plainest green colour, with cap and leggings of
leather
,
such as were worn by many of the poorest
or least pretending exiles; like whom also he bore
a rifle on his shoulder, with the horn and other
equipments of a hunter. There was little,
therefore
,
to distinguish him, at the first view, from
among his companions; although his erect
military
bearing, and the fine blooded bay horse
which he rode, would have won him more than a
passing look. The holsters at his saddle-bow, and
the sabre at his side, were weapons not indeed
very generally worn by frontiersmen, but still
common enough to prevent their being regarded
as badges of rank.
With this youthful officer, the rear-guard, which
he commanded, having deserted him, to press
forward
to the van, there remained only three
persons
,
two of whom were negro slaves, both
mounted
and armed, that followed at a little distance
behind
,
leading thrice their number of pack-horses.
The third was a female, who rode closely at his
side, the rein of her pony being, in fact, grasped
in his hand; though he looked as if scarce
conscious
that he held it,a degree of insensibility
that would have spoken little in his favour to an
observer; for his companion was both young and
beautiful, and watched his moody countenance on
her part with looks of the most anxious and
affectionate
interest. Her riding-habit, chosen, like his
own garments, with more regard to usefulness than
beauty, and perhaps somewhat the worse for its
encounters with the wind and forest, could not
conceal the graceful figure it defended; nor had
the sunbeam, though it had darkened the bright
complexion exposed to its summer fury, during a
journey of more than six weeks, robbed her fair
visage of a single charm. There was, in the
general
cast of features, a sufficient resemblance
between
the two to indicate near relationship;
although
it was plain that the gloom seated upon
the brow of her kinsman, as if a permanent
characteristic
,
was an unwelcome and unnatural
visitant on her own. The clear blue eye, the
golden locks floating over her temples, the ruddy
cheek and lip of seventeen, and, generally, the
frank and open character of her expression,
betokened
a spirit too joyous and elastic to indulge
in those dark anticipations of the future or
mournful
recollections of the past, which clouded the
bosom of her relative. And well for her that such
was the cheerful temper of her mind; for it was
manifest, from her whole appearance, that her lot,
as originally cast, must have been among the
gentle
,
the refined, and the luxurious, and that she
was now, for the first time, exposed to discomfort,
hardship, and suffering, among companions, who,
however kind and courteous of conduct, were
unpolished
in their habits, conversation, and feelings,
and, in every other respect, unfitted to be her
associates.
She looked upon the face of her kinsman, and
seeing that it grew the darker and gloomier the
nearer they approached the scene of rejoicing, she
laid her hand upon his arm, and murmured softly
and affectionately,
Roland,cousin,brother!what is it that
disturbs you? Will you not ride forward, and
salute
the good people that are making us welcome?
Us! muttered the young man, with a bitter
voice; who is there on earth, Edith, to welcome
us? Where shall
we
look for the friends and
kinsfolk
,
that the meanest of the company are now
finding among yonder noisy barbarians?
You do them injustice, Roland, said the
maiden. Yesternight we had experience at the
Station we left, that these wild people of the
woods do not confine their welcomes to kinsmen.
Kinder and more hospitable people do not exist in
the world.
It is not that, Edith, said the young man;
I were but a brute to doubt their hospitality.
But look, Edith; we are in Kentucky, almost at
our place of refuge. Yonder hovels, lowly, mean,
and wretched,are they the mansions that should
shelter the child of my father's brother? Yonder
people, the outcasts of our borders, the poor, the
rude, the savage,but one degree elevated above
the Indians, with whom they contend,are they
the society from whom Edith Forrester should
choose her friends?
They are, said Edith, firmly; and Edith
Forrester asks none better. In such a cabin as
these, and, if need be, in one still more humble,
she is content to pass her life, and dream that she
is still in the house of her fathers. From such
people, too, she will choose her friends, knowing
that, even among the humblest of them, there are
many worthy of her regard and affection. What
have we to mourn in the world we have left
behind
us? We are the last of our name and race;
fortune has left us nothing to regret. My only
relation
on earth, saving yourself, Roland,saving
yourself, my cousin, my brother,her lip
quivered
,
and, for a moment, her eyes were filled with
tears,my only other living relation resides in
this wilderness-land; and she, tenderly nurtured
as myself, finds in it enough to engage her thoughts
and secure her happiness. Why, then, should not I?
Why should not
you?
Trust me, dear Roland, I
should myself be as happy as the day is long, could
I only know that you did not grieve for me.
I cannot but choose it, said Roland. It is
to me you owe the loss of fortune and your present
banishment from the world.
Say not so, Roland, for it is not true; No! I
never can believe that our poor uncle would have
carried his resentment, for such a cause, so far.
But supposing that he could, and granting that all
were as you say, I am prouder to be the poor
cousin of Roland Forrester, who has bled in the
battles of his country, than if I were the rich and
courted kinswoman of one who had betrayed the
memory of his father.
You are, at least, an angel; said the youth;
and I am but a villain to say or do any thing to
give you pain. Farewell then to Fell-hallow, to
old James River, and all! If you can forget these
things, Edith, so will I; at all events, I will try.
Now, said Edith, you talk like my true
cousin.
Well, Edith, the world is before us; and shame
be upon me, if I, who have health, strength, and
youth to back my ambition, cannot provide you a
refuge and a home. I will leave you for a while
in the hands of this good aunt at the Falls; and
then, with old Emperor there for my adjutant, and
Sam for my rank and file, I will plunge into the
forest, and scatter it as I have seen a band of
tories
scattered by my old major, (who, by the by,
is only three years older than myself,) Henry Lee,
not many years back. Then, when I have built
me a house, furrowed my acres with my martial
plough-share, (for to that, it appears, my sword
must come,) and reaped my harvest with my own
hands, (it will be hard work to beat my
horse-pistols
into a sickle,) then, Edith
Then, Roland, said the maiden, with a smile
and a tear, if you should still remember your poor
cousin, it will not be hard to persuade her to follow
you to your retreat, to share your fortunes of
good and of evil, and to love you better in your
adversity than she ever expected to love you in
your prosperity.
Spoken like my true Edith! said the young
officer, whose melancholy fled before her soft
accents
,
as the evil spirit of Saul before the tinklings
of the Jewish harp,spoken like my true Edith;
for whom I promise, if fate smile upon my
exertions
,
to rear a new Fell-hallow on the banks of
the Ohio, in which I will be, myself, the first to
forget that on James River.And now, Edith,
let us ride forward and meet yon gay looking
giant, whom, from his bustling demeanour, and
fresh jerkin, I judge to be the commander of the
Station, the redoubtable Colonel Bruce himself.
As he spoke, the individual thus alluded to,
separating
himself from the throng, galloped up to
the speaker, and displayed a person which excited
the envy even of the manly-looking Forrester.
He was a man of at least fifty years, but as hale
as one of thirty, without a single gray hair to
deform
the beauty of his raven locks, which fell
down in masses nearly to his shoulders. His
stature
was colossal, and the proportions of his frame
as just as they were gigantic; so that there was
much in his appearance of real native majesty.
Nothing, in fact, could be well imagined more
truly striking and grand than his appearance, as
seen at the first glance; though the second revealed
a lounging indifference of carriage, amounting, at
times, to something like awkwardness and
uncouthness
,
which a little detracted from the
effect
.
Such men were oft-times, in those days,
sent from among the mountain counties of
Virginia
,
to amaze the lesser mortals of the plains,
who regarded them as the genii of the forest, and
almost looked, as was said of the victor of the
Kenhawa,
[2]
[2]
Gen. Andrew Lewis.
himself of the race, to see the earth
VOL. I.3
tremble beneath their footsteps. With a spirit
corresponding to his frame, he would have been
the Nimrod, or Meleager, that he seemed. But
nature had long before extinguished the race of
demigods; and the worthy Commander of the
Station
was not of them. He was a mortal man,
distinguished by little, save his exterior, from other
mortal men, and from the crowd of settlers who
had followed him from the fortress. He wore, it
is true, a new and janty hunting-shirt of dressed
deer-skin, as yellow as gold, and fringed and
furbelowed
with shreds of the same substance, dyed as
red as blood-root could make them; but was
otherwise, to the view, a plain yeoman, endowed
with those gifts of mind only which were
necessary
to his station, but with the virtues which are
alike common to forest and city. Courage and
hospitality, however, were then hardly, accounted
virtues, being too universal to be distinguished as
such; and courtesy was equally native to the
independent
borderer.
He shook the young officer heartily by the hand,
a ceremony which he instantly repeated with the
fair Edith; and giving them to understand that
he claimed them as his own especial guests,
insisted
,
with much honest warmth, that old
companionship
in arms with one of their late nearest and
dearest kinsmen had given him a double right to
do so:
You must know, said he, the good old
Major
,
your uncle, the brave old Major Roly, as
we called him, Major Roland Forrester:well,
K'-yaptin,well, young lady,my first battle war
fought under his command; and an excellent
commander he war; it war on the bloody
Monongahela
,
whar the Frenchmen and Injuns
trounced us so promiskous. Perhaps you've h'ard
him tell of big Tom Bruce,for so they called
me then? I war a copporal in the first company
of Rangers that crossed the river. Lord! how
the world is turning upside down! I war a
copporal
then, and now I'm a k'-yunnel; a greater
man in commission than war ever my old Major;
and the Lord, he knows, I thought my old Major
Forrester war the greatest man in all Virginee,
next to the G'-yovernor, and K'-yunnel George
Washington! Well, you must know, we marched
up the g'-yully that runs from the river; and bang
went the Savages' g'-yuns, and smash went their
hatchets; and then it came to close quarters, a
regular, rough-and-tumble, hard scratch! And so
I war a-head of the Major, and the Major war
behind, and the fight had made him as ambitious
[3]
[3]
Ambitious
,in Western parlance, vicious.
as a wild-cat, and he war hungry for a shot; and
so says he to me, for I war right afore him, `Git
out of my way, you damned big rascal, till I git a
crack at 'em!' And so I got out of his way, for
I war mad at being called a damned big rascal,
especially as I war doing my best, and covering
him from mischief besides. Well! as soon as I
jumped out of his way, bang went his piece, and
bang went another, let fly by an Injun;down
went the Major, shot right through the hips,
slam-bang
.
And so said I, `Major,'for I warn't
well over my passion,`if you'd 'a' taken things
easy, I'd 'a' stopped that slug for you.' And so
says he, `Bang away, you big fool, and don't
stand talking.' And so he swounded away; and
that made me ambitious too, and I killed two of
the red niggurs, before you could say Jack
Robinson
,
just by way of satisfaction for the Major;
and then I helped to carry him off to the tumbrels.
I never see'd my old Major from that day to this;
and it war only a month ago that I h'ard of his
death. I honour his memory: and so, K'-yaptin,
you see, thar's a sort of claim to old friendship
between
us.
To this characteristic speech, which was
delivered
with great earnestness, Captain Forrester
made a suitable response; and intimating his
willingness
to accept the proffered hospitality of his
uncle's companion in arms, he rode forward with
his host and kinswoman towards the Station, of
which, when once fairly relieved from the forest,
he had a clear view.
It was a quadrangle of stout pickets, firmly
driven into the earth, on the brow of a knoll of
very gentle ascent, with a strong, though low
block-house at each corner; and was sufficiently
spacious to contain a double row of cabins,
between
which was a vacant area, as well as two
others betwixt the cabins and the stockade; and
thus afforded shelter not only for its defenders and
their families, but for their cattle and horses,
which were always driven in, if possible, when an
attack was apprehended. A sense of security,
arising from increase of numbers, and the absence
of hostilities for a long period, had begot a
contempt
for the confined limits of the stockade; and
a dozen or more of the settlers had built their
cabins without the enclosure, on the slope of the
hill, which had now assumed the appearance of a
village; though one, it must be confessed, of
exceedingly
rude and primitive appearance. The
houses were, in every instance, of logs, even to
the chimneys; which being, therefore, of a
combustible
temper, notwithstanding the goodly
daubing
of clay with which they were plastered, were
made to incline outwards from the perpendicular,
so as to be detached from the building itself, as
they rose. By this arrangement, the dangers of a
conflagration were guarded against; for when the
burning of the chimney involved, as doubtless it
often did, the wooden materials of the chimney
itself, it was easy to tear it down, before the flames
communicated to the cabin.
Such was the appearance of a fortified
settlement
,
at that time, one of the most prominent of
all the Stations in Kentucky; and when we repeat
that the forest had vanished in its immediate
vicinity, to make way for rich fields of corn,
that divers great gaps were, at a distance, seen in
its massive green walls, where the tall oaks and
walnuts, girdled and leafless, but not yet fallen,
admitted the sunshine upon other crops as rich
and as verdant,and that all beyond and around
was a dark and solemn wilderness, the tree-top
aloft and the cane-brake below, we have a proper
idea of the aspect and condition of the lonely
strongholds, which succeeding years saw changed
into towns and villages.
The Station seemed unusually populous, as,
indeed
,
it was; but Roland, as he rode by, remarked,
on the skirts of the village, a dozen or more
shooting-targets
set up on the green, and perceived it
was a gala-day which had drawn the young men
from a distance to the fort. This, in fact, he was
speedily told by a youth, whom the worthy Bruce
introduced to him as his oldest son and namesake,
`big Tom Bruce,the third of that name; the
other two Toms,for two others he had had,
having been killed by the Injuns, and he having
changed the boy's name, that he might have a
Tom in the family.' The youth was worthy of his
father, being full six feet high, though scarcely
yet out of his teens, and presented a visage of
3 *
such serene gravity and good-humoured simplicity,
as won the affections of the soldier in a moment.
Thar's a boy now, the brute, said Colonel
Bruce, sending him off to assist in the distribution of
the guests among the settlers, that comes of the
best stock for loving women and fighting Injuns
in all Kentucky! And so, captain, if young madam,
your sister h'yar, is for picking a husband out of
Kentuck, I'll say it, and stand to it, thar's not a
better lad to be found than Tom Bruce, if you
hunt the District all over. You'd scarce believe
it, mom, he continued, addressing Edith
herself
,
but the young brute did actually take the
scalp of a full grown Shawnee, before he war
fourteen y'ar old, and that in fa'r fight, whar thar
war none to help him. The way of it war this:
Tom war out in the range, looking for a
neighbour's
horse; when what should he see but two
great big Shawnees astride of the identicular
beast he war hunting! Away went Tom, and
away went the bloody villians hard after, one of
'em afoot, the other on the horse. `Now,' said Tom,
`this won't do, no how;' and so he let fly at the
mounted feller; but being a little skeary, as how
could he help it, the young brute, being the first
time he ever banged at an Injun, he hit the horse,
which dropped down in a flurry; and away comes
the red devil over his head, like a rocket, eend on to a
sapling. Up jumps Tom and picks up the Injun's
gun; and bang goes the other Shawnee at him, and
jumps to a tree. `A bird in the hand,' said Tom,
`is worth two in a bush;' and with that, he blows
out the first feller's brains, just as he is gitting up,
and runs into the fort, hard chased by the other.
And then to see the feller, when I asked him why
he did n't shoot the Injun that had fired at him,
and so make sure of both, the other being in a
sort of swound-like from the tumble, and ready to
be knocked on the head at any moment? `Lord!'
said Tom, `I never thought of it, I war such a
fool!' and with that he blubbered all night, to
think he had not killed them both. Howsomever, I
war always of opinion that what he had done war
good work for a boy of fourteen.But, come now,
my lovely young mom; we are entering the
Station. May you never enter a house where you
are less welcome.
CHAPTER II.
Men
and boys had rushed from the fortress
together, to greet the new comers, and few
remained
save the women; of whom not a few,
particularly of the younger individuals, were as
eager to satisfy their curiosity as their fathers
and brothers. The disorderly spirit had spread
even among the daughters of the commandant, to
the great concern of his spouse; who, although
originally of a degree somewhat humbler even
than his own, had a much more elevated sense of
the dignity of his commission as a colonel of
militia
,
and a due consciousness of the necessity of
adapting her manners to her rank. She stood on
the porch of her cabin, which had the merit of
being larger than any other in the fort,
maintaining
order among some half dozen or more lasses,
the oldest scarce exceeding seventeen, whom she
endeavoured to range in a row, to receive the
expected guests in state, though every moment
some one or other might be seen edging away
from her side, as if in the act of deserting her
altogether.
Out on you, you flirting critturs! said she,
her indignation provoked, and her sense of
propriety
shocked by such unworthy behaviour:
Stop thar, you Nell! whar you going? You
Sally, you Phbe, you Jane, and the rest of you!
ha'nt you no better idea of what's manners for a
Cunnel's daughters? I'm ashamed of you,to
run ramping and tearing after the strannge men
thar, like tom-boys, or any common person's
daughters! Laws!
do
remember your father's a
Cunnel in the milishy, and set down in the porch
here on the bench, like genteel young ladies; or
stand up, if you like that better, and wait till your
father, Cunnel Bruce that is, brings up the
captains
:
one of 'em 's a rale army captain, with
epaulets and broad-sword, with a chance of
money, and an uncommon handsome sister,rale
genteel people from old Virginnee: and I'm glad
of it,it's so seldom you sees any body but
common
persons come to Kentucky. Do behave
yourselves: thar's Telie Doe thar at the loom
don't think so much as turning her eyes around;
she's a pattern for you.
Law, mother! said the eldest of the
daughters
,
bridling with disdain, I reckon I know how
to behave myself as well as Telie Doe, or any
other girl in the settlement;a declaration
echoed and re-echoed by her sisters, all of whom
bent their eyes towards a corner of the ample
porch, where, busied with a rude loom, fashioned
perhaps by the axe and knife of the militia colonel
himself, on which she was weaving a coarse cloth
from the fibres of the flax-nettle, sat a female
somewhat younger than the oldest of the sisters,
and doubtless of a more humble degree, as was
shown by the labour in which she was engaged,
while the others seemed to enjoy a holyday, and
by her coarse brown garments, worn at a moment
when the fair Bruces were flaunting in their best
bibs and tuckers, the same having been put on not
more in honour of the exiles, whose coming had
been announced the day before, than out of
compliment
to the young men of the settlement, who
were wont to assemble on such occasions to
gather the latest news from the States.
The pattern of good manners thus referred to,
was as unconscious of the compliment bestowed
upon her by the worthy Mrs. Bruce as of the
glances of disdain it drew from the daughters,
being apparently at that moment too much
occupied
with her work to think of any thing else;
nor did she lift up her eyes until, the conversation
having been resumed between the mother and
daughters, one of the latter demanded `what was
the name of that army captain, that was so rich
and great, of whom her mother had been talking?'
Captain Roland Forrester, replied the latter;
at the sound of which name the maiden at the
loom started and looked up with an air of fright,
that caused exceeding diversion among the others.
Look at Telie Doe! they cried, laughing: you
can't speak above your breath but she thinks you
are speaking to her; and, sure, you can't speak to
her, but she looks as if she would jump out of her
skin, and run away for her dear life!
And so, indeed, the girl did appear for a
moment
,
looking as wild and terrified as the animal
whose name she bore, when the first bay of the
deer-hound startles her in the deep woodland
pastures
,
rolling her eyes, catching her breath
convulsively
,
shivering, and, in short, betraying a
degree of agitation that would have appeared
unaccountable to a stranger; though, as it caused
more amusement than surprise among the merry
Bruces, it was but fair to suppose that it sprung
from constitutional nervousness, or the sudden
interruption of her meditations. As she started
up in her confusion, rolling her eyes from one
laughing maiden to another, her very
trepidation
imparted an interest to her features, which
were in themselves pretty enough, though not so
much so as to attract observation, when in a state
of rest. Then it was that the observer might see,
or fancy he saw, a world of latent expression in
her wild dark eyes, and trace the workings of
a quick and sensitive spirit, whose existence would
have been otherwise unsuspected, in the
tremulous
movement of her lips. And then, too, one
might have been struck with the exquisite contour
of a slight figure, which even the coarse
garments
,
spun, and perhaps shaped, by her own
hands, could not entirely conceal. At such times
of excitement, there was something in her
appearance
both striking and singular,Indian-like,
one might almost have said. Such an epithet
might have been borne out by the wildness of her
looks, the darkness of her eyes, the simple
arrangement
of her coal-black hair, which, instead
of being confined by comb or fillet, was twisted
round a thorn cut from the nearest locust-tree,
and by the smallness of her stature; though the
lightness and European tinge of her complexion
must have instantly disproved the idea.
Her discomposure dispelled from the bosoms of
her companions all the little resentment produced
by the matron's invidious comparison; and each
now did her best to increase it by cries of, Jump,
Telie, the Indians will catch you! Take care,
Telie, Tom Bruce will kiss you! Run, Telie,
the dog will bite you! and other expressions of a
like alarming nature, which, if they did not
augment
her terror, divided and distracted her
attention
,
till, quite bewildered, she stared now on one,
now on the other, and at each mischievous
assault
,
started, and trembled, and gasped for breath,
in inexpressible confusion. It was fortunate for
her that this species of baiting, which, from the
spirit and skill with which her youthful
tormentors
pursued it, seemed no uncommon infliction,
the reforming mother considered to be, at least at
that particular moment, unworthy the daughters
of a colonel in the militia.
Do behave yourselves, you ungenteel critturs,
said she; Phbe Bruce, you're old enough to
know better; don't expose yourself before
stranngers
.
Thar they come now; thar's Cunnel Bruce
that is, talking to Captain Forrester that is, and
a right-down soldier-looking captain he is, too. I
wonder whar's his cocked hat, and feather, and
goold epaulets? Thar's his big broad-sword,
andbut, Lord above us, ar'nt his sister a beauty!
Any man in Kentucky will be proud of her; but,
I warrant me, she'll take to nothing under a
cunnel
!
The young misses ceased their sport to stare at
the strangers, and even Telie Doe, pattern of
propriety
as she was, had no sooner recovered her
equanimity than she turned her eyes from the
loom and bent them eagerly upon the train now
entering through the main gate, gazing long and
earnestly upon the young captain and the fair
Edith, who, with the colonel of militia, and a
fourth individual, parted from it, and rode up to
the porch. The fourth person, a sober and
substantial-looking
borderer, in a huge blanket-coat
and slouched hat, the latter stuck round with
bucks' tails, was the nominal captain of the party.
He conversed a moment with Forrester and the
commandant, and then, being given in charge by
the latter to his son Tom, who was hallooed from
the crowd for this purpose, he rode away, leaving
the colonel to do the honours to his second in
command. These the colonel executed with much
courtesy and gallantry, if not with grace, leaping
from his horse with unexpected activity, and
assisting
Edith to dismount, which he effected by
taking her in his arms and whisking her from the
saddle with as little apparent effort as though he
were handling an infant.
Welcome, my beautiful young lady, said he,
giving her another hearty shake of the hand:
H'yar's a house that shall shelter you; though
thar's not much can be said of it, except that it is
safe and wholesome. H'yar's my old lady too, and
my daughters, that will make much of you; and
as for my sons, thar's not a brute of 'em that
won't fight for you; but th' ar' all busy stowing
away the strangers; and, I reckon, they think it
ar'nt manners to show themselves to a young
lady, while she's making acquaintance with the
women.
With that the gallant colonel presented the fair
stranger to his wife and daughters, the latter of
whom, a little daunted at first by her appearance,
as a being superior in degree to the ordinary
race of mortals, but quickly re-assured by her
frank and easy deportment, loaded her with
caresses
,
and carried her into the house, to improve
the few hours allowed to make her acquaintance,
and to assist her in changing her apparel, for
which the means were furnished from sundry bags
and packages, that the elder of the two
negro-men
,
the only immediate followers of her
kinsmen
,
took from the back of a pack-horse. The
mother of the Bruces thought it advisable to
follow them, to see, perhaps, in person, that they
conducted themselves towards their guest as a
colonel's daughter should.
None of the females remained on the porch
save Telie, the girl of the loom, who, too humble
or too timid to seek the acquaintance of the
stranger
VOL. I.4
lady, like the others, had been overlooked in
the bustle, and now pursued her labour with but
little notice from those who remained.
And now, colonel, said the young officer,
declining
the offer of refreshments made by his host,
allow me, like a true soldier, to proceed to the
business with which you heard our commander,
Major Johnson, charge me. To-morrow we
resume
our journey to the Falls. I should gladly
myself, for Miss Forrester's sake, consent to
remain
with you a few days, to recruit our strength
a little. But that cannot be. Our men are
resolved
to push on without delay; and as I have no
authority to restrain them, I must e'en accompany
them.
Well, said Colonel Bruce, if it must be, it
must, and I'm not the brute to say No to you. But
lord, captain, I should be glad to have you stay a
month or two, war it only to have a long talk
about my old friend, the brave old major. And
thar's your sister, captain,lord, sir, she would
be the pet of the family, and would help my wife
teach the girls manners. Lord! he continued,
laughing, you 've no idea what grand notions
have got into the old woman's head about the way
of behaving, ever since it war that the Governor
of Virginnie sent me a cunnel's commission. She
thinks I ought to w'ar a cocked hat and goold
swabs, and put on a blue coat instead of a leather
shirt; but I wonder how soon I'd see the end of it,
out h'yar in the bushes? And then, as for the
girls, why thar's no end of the lessons she gives
them;and thar's my Jenny,that's the
youngest
,came
blubbering up the other day, saying,
`she believed mother intended even to stop their
licking at the sugar-troughs, she was gitting so
great and so proud!' Howsomever, women will
be women, and thar's the end of it.
To this philosophic remark the officer of
inferior
degree bowed acquiescence, and recalling his
host's attention to the subject of most interest to
himself, requested to be informed what difficulties
or dangers might be apprehended on the further
route to the Falls of Ohio.
Why, none on 'arth that I know of, said
Bruce; you 've as cl'ar and broad a trace before
you as man and beast could makea buffalo-street
[4]
[4]
The bison-paths, when very broad, were often thus
called.
through the canes; and, when thar's open woods,
blazes as thick as stars, and horse-tracks still
thicker: thar war more than a thousand settlers
have travelled it this year already. As for
danngers
,
captain, why I reckon thar's none to think
on. Thar war a good chance of whooping and
howling about Bear's Grass, last year, and some
hard fighting; but I h'ar nothing of Injuns thar
this y'ar. But you leave some of your people
h'yar: what force do you tote down to the Falls
to-morrow?
Twenty-seven guns in all; but several quite
too young to face an enemy.
Thar's no trusting to years, in a matter of
fighting! said the Kentuckian. Thar's my son
Tom, that killed his brute at fourteen; but, I
remember
,
I told you that story. Howsomever, I
hold thar's no Injuns on the road; and if you
should meet any, why, it will be down about
Bear's Grass, or the Forks of Salt, whar you can
keep your eyes open, and whar the settlements are
so thick, it is easy taking cover. No, no, captain,
the fighting this year is all on the north side of
Kentucky.
Yet, I believe, said Roland, there have been
no troubles there since the defeat of Captain Estill
on Little Mountain, and of Holder at that place,
what do you call it?
Upper Blue Licks of Licking, said Bruce;
and war'nt they troubles enough for a season?
Two Kentucky captains (and one of them a
south-side
man, too,) whipped in fa'r fight, and by
nothing
better than brutish Injuns!
They were sad affairs, indeed; and the
numbers
of white men murdered made them still more
shocking.
The murdering, said the gallant Colonel
Bruce, is nothing, sir: it is the shame of the
thumping that makes one feel ambitious; thar's
the thing no Kentuckian can stand, sir. To be
murdered, whar thar's ten Injuns to one white
man, is nothing; but whar it comes to being
trounced by equal numbers, why thar's the thing
not to be tolerated. Howsomever, captain, we're
no worse off in Kentucky than our neighbours.
Thar's them five hundred Pennsylvanians, that
went out in June, under old Cunnel Crawford from
Pittsburg, agin the brutes of Sandusky, war
more ridiculously whipped by old Captain Pipe,
the Delaware, thar's no denying.
What! said Roland, was Crawford's
company
beaten?
Beaten! said the Kentuckian, opening his
eyes; cut off the
b
, and say the savages made a
dinner of 'em, and you'll be nearer the true
history
of the matter. It's but two months ago; and
so I suppose the news of the affa'r had n't got
into East Virginnie when you started. Well,
captain
,
the long and short of it is,the cunnel
war
beaten and exterminated, and that on a hard run
from the fight he had hunted hard after. How many
ever got back safe again to Pittsburg, I never
could rightly h'ar; but what I know is, that thar
war dozens of prisoners beaten to death by the
squaws and children, and that old Cunnel
Crawford
himself war put to the double torture and
roasted alive; and, I reckon, if he war'nt eaten, it
war only because he war too old to be tender.
Horrible! said the young soldier, muttering
half to himself, though not in tones so low but
that the Kentuckian caught their import; and I
must expose my poor Edith to fall into the power
of such fiends and monsters!
Ay, captain, said Bruce, thar's the thing
that sticks most in the heart of them that live in
the wilderness and have wives and daughters;to
think of
their
falling into the hands of the brutes,
who murder and scalp a woman just as readily as
a man. As to their torturing them, that's not so
certain, but the brutes are n't a bit too good for
it; and I did h'ar of their burning one poor
woman
at Sandusky.
[5]
[5]
The worthy Kentuckian was perhaps mistaken. A
female captive from Pittsburg was however actually bound
to the stake near the Sandusky villages, and rescued with
difficulty by British traders. But this happened in 1790,
eight years after the date of our story.
But now, captain, if you are
anxious to have the young lady, your sister, in
safety, h'yar's the place to stick up your
tent-poles
,
h'yar in this very settlement, whar the
Injuns
never trouble us, never coming within ten
miles of us. Thar's as good land here as on
Bear's Grass; and we shall be glad of your
company
.
It is not often we have a rich man to take
luck among us. Howsomever, I won't deceive
you, if you will go to the Ohio; I hold, thar's no
danger on the trace for either man or woman.
My good friend, said Roland, you seem to
4 *
labour under two errors in respect to me, which
it is fitting I should correct. In the first place, the
lady whom you have several times called, I know
not why, my sister, claims no such near
relationship
,
being only my cousin.
Why, sure! said the colonel, some one told
me so, and thar's a strong family likeness.
There should be, said the youth, since our
fathers were twin brothers, and resembled each
other in all particulars, in body, in mind, and, as
I may say, in fortune. They were alike in their
lives, alike also in their deaths: they fell together,
struck down by the same cannon-ball, at the
bombardment of Norfolk, seven years ago.
May I never see a scalp, said the Kentuckian,
warmly grasping the young man's hand, if I
don't honour you the more for boasting such a
father and such uncles! You come of the true
stock, captain, thar's no denying; and my brave
old major's estates have fallen into the right
hands; for, if thar's any believing the news the
last band of emigrants brought of you here, thar
war no braver officer in Lee's corps, nor in the
whole Virginnie line, than young Captain
Forrester
.
Here, said Roland, looking as if what he said
cost him a painful effort, lies the second error,
your considering me, as you manifestly do, the
heir of your old major, my uncle Roland,which
I am
not
.
Lord! said the worthy Bruce, he was the
richest man in Prince-George, and he had
thousands
of fat acres in the Valley, the best in all
Fincastle, as I know very well, for I war a
Fincastle
man myself; and thar war my old friend
Braxley,he war a lieutenant under the major at
Braddock's, and afterwards his steward, and
manger
,
and lawyer-like,who used to come over the
Ridge, to see after them. But I see how it is; he
left all to the young lady?
Not an acre, said Roland.
What! said the Kentuckian: he left no
children of his own. Who then is the heir?
Your old friend, as you called him, Richard
Braxley.And hence you see, continued the
youth, as if desirous to change the conversation,
that I come to Kentucky, an adventurer and
fortune-hunter, like other emigrants, to locate
lands under proclamation-warrants and
bounty-grants
,
to fell trees, raise corn, shoot bisons and
Indians, and, in general, to do any thing else that
can be required of a good Virginian or good
Kentuckian
.
It was evidently the captain's wish now to leave
altogether the subject on which he had thought it
incumbent to acquaint his host with so much; but
the worthy Bruce was not so easily satisfied; and
not conceiving there was any peculiar
impropriety
in indulging curiosity in matters relating to
his old major, however distasteful that curiosity
might prove to his guest, he succeeded in drawing
from the reluctant young man many more
particulars
of his story; which, as they have an
important
connexion with the events it is our object
to narrate, we must be pardoned for briefly
noticing
.
Major Roland Forrester, the uncle and
godfather
of the young soldier, and the representative
of one of the most ancient and affluent families
on James River, (for by this trivial name
Virginians
are content to designate the noble
Powhatan
,)
was the eldest of three brothers, of whom
the two younger, as was often the case under the
ancien rgime
in Virginia, were left, at the death
of their parent, to shift for themselves; while the
eldest son inherited the undivided princely estate
of his ancestors. This was at the period when
that contest of principle with power, which finally
resulted in the separation of the American
Colonies
from the parent State, first began to agitate
the minds of the good planters of Virginia, in
common with the people of all the other colonies.
Men had already begun to take sides, in feeling,
as in argument; and, as usual, interest had, no
doubt, its full share in directing and confirming
the predilections of individuals. These
circumstances
,the
regular succession of the eldest-born
to the paternal estate, and the necessity imposed
on the others of carving out their own fortunes,
had, perhaps, their influence in determining the
political bias of the brothers, and preparing them
for contention, when the increase of party feeling
and the clash of interests between the
government
abroad and the colonies at home, called upon
all men to avow their principles and take their
stands. It was as natural that the one should
retain
affection and reverence for the institutions
which had made him rich and distinguished, as
that the younger brothers, who had suffered under
them a deprivation of their natural rights, should
declare for a system of government and laws
more liberal and equitable in their character and
operation. At all events, and be the cause of
difference
what it might, when the storm of the
Revolution
burst over the land, the brothers were
found arrayed on opposite sides, the two younger,
the fathers of Roland and Edith, instantly taking
up arms in the popular cause, while nothing,
perhaps, but helpless feebleness and bodily
infirmities
,
the results of wounds received in
Braddock's
war, throughout which he had fought at
the head of a battalion of Buckskins, or
Virginia
Rangers, prevented the elder brother from
arming as zealously in the cause of his king.
Fierce, uncompromising, and vindictive, however,
in his temper, he never forgave his brothers the
bold and active part they both took in the contest;
and it was his resentment, perhaps, more than
natural
affection for his neglected offspring, that
caused him to defeat his brothers' hopes of
succession
to his estates, (he being himself
unmarried
,)
by executing a will in favour of an
illegitimate
child, an infant daughter, whom he drew
from concealment and acknowledged as his
offspring
.
This child, however, was soon removed,
having been burned to death in the house of its
foster-mother. But its decease effected little or no
change in his feelings towards his brothers; who,
pursuing the principles they had so early avowed,
were among the first to take arms among the
patriots
of Virginia, and fell, as Roland had said, at
Norfolk, leaving each an orphan child, Roland
then a youth of fifteen, and Edith a child of ten,
to the mercy of the elder brother. Their death
effected what perhaps their prayers never would
have done. The stern loyalist took the orphans
to his bosom, cherished and loved them, or at least
appeared to do so, and often avowed his intention
to make them his heirs. But it was Roland's ill
fate to provoke his ire, as Roland's father had
done before him. The death of that father, one
of the earliest martyrs to liberty, had created in
his youthful mind a strong abhorrence of every
thing British and loyal; and after presuming a
dozen times or more to disclose and defend his
hatred, he put the coping-stone to his audacity, by
suddenly leaving his uncle's house, two years after
he had been received into it, and galloping away,
a cornet in one of the companies of the first
regiment
of horse which Virginia sent to the armies
of Congress. He never more saw his uncle. He
cared little for his wrath, or its effects; if
disinherited
himself, it pleased his imagination to think
he had enriched his gentle cousin. But his uncle
carried his resentment further than he had
dreamed
,
or indeed any one else who had beheld the
show of affection he continued to the orphan
Edith, up to the last moment of his existence. He
died in October of the preceding year, a week
before
the capitulation at York-town, and almost
within the sound of the guns that proclaimed the
fall of the cause he had so loyally espoused. From
this place of victory Roland departed to seek his
kinswoman. He found her in the house,not of
his fathers, but of a stranger,herself a destitute
and homeless orphan. No will appeared to
pronounce
her the mistress of the wealth he had
himself rejected; but, in place of it, the original
testament in favour of Major Forrester's own
child, was produced by Braxley, his confidential
friend and attorney, who, by it, was appointed
both executor of the estate and trustee to the
individual
in whose favour it was constructed.
The production of such a testament, so many
years after the death of the girl, caused no little
astonishment; but this was still further increased
by what followed, the aforesaid Braxley instantly
taking possession of the whole estate in the name
of the heiress, who, he made formal deposition,
was, to the best of his belief, yet alive, and would
appear to claim her inheritance. In support of this
extraordinary averment, he produced, or professed
himself ready to produce, evidence to show that
Forrester's child, instead of being burned to death
as was believed, had actually been trepanned and
carried away by persons to him unknown, the
burning of the house of her foster-mother having
been devised and exceuted merely to give colour
to the story of her death. Who were the
perpetrators
of such an outrage, and for what purpose
it had been devised, he affected to be ignorant;
though he threw out many hints and surmises of
a character more painful to Edith and Roland
than even the loss of the property. These hints
Roland could not persuade himself to repeat to the
curious Kentuckian, since they went, in fact, to
charge his own father, and Edith's, with the crime
of having themselves concealed the child, for the
purpose of removing the only bar to their
expectations
of succession.
Whatever might be thought of this singular
story, it gained some believers, and was enough
in the hands of Braxley, a man of great address
and resolution, and, withal, a lawyer, to enable
him to laugh to scorn the feeble efforts made by
the impoverished Roland to bring it to the test of
legal arbitrement. Despairing, in fact, of his cause,
after a few trials had convinced him of his
impotence
,
and perhaps himself almost believing the
tale to be true, the young man gave up the
contest
,
and directed his thoughts to the condition of
his cousin Edith; who, upon the above
circumstances
being made known, had received a warm
invitation to the house and protection of her only
female relative, a married lady, whose husband
had, two years before, emigrated to the Falls of
Ohio, where he was now a person of considerable
importance. This invitation determined the course
to be pursued. The young man instantly resigned
his commission, and converting the little property
that remained into articles necessary to the
emigrant
,
turned his face to the boundless West, and
with his helpless kinswoman at his side, plunged
at once into the forest. A home for Edith in the
house of a relative was the first object of his
desires
;
his second, as he had already mentioned,
was to lay the foundation for the fortunes of both,
by locating lands on proclamation-warrants, as
they were called, (being grants of western lands
made to the colonists who had served the crown
in the provincial French wars,) which the two had
inherited from their fathers, besides the
bounty-grants
earned by himself in virtue of military
service
rendered in the army of his native state.
There was something in the condition of the
young and almost friendless adventurers to interest
the feelings of the hardy Kentuckian; but they
were affected still more strongly by the generous
self-sacrifice, as it might be called, which the
young soldier was evidently making for his
kinswoman
,
for whom he had given up an honourable
profession and his hopes of fame and distinction,
to live a life of inglorious toil in the desert. He
gave the youth another energetic grasp of hand,
and said, with uncommon emphasis,
Hark'ee, Captain, my lad, I love and honour
ye; and I could say no more, if you war my own
natteral born father! As to that 'ar' Richard
Braxley, whom I call'd my old friend, you must
know, it war an old custom I have of calling a
man a friend who war only an acquaintance; for
I am for being friendly to all men that are white
and honest, and no Injuns. Now, I do hold that
Braxley to be a rascal,a precocious rascal, sir!
and, I rather reckon, thar war lying and villiany at
the bottom of that will; and I hope you'll live to
see the truth of it.
The sympathy felt by the Kentuckian in the
story was experienced in a still stronger degree
by Telie Doe, the girl of the loom, who, little
noticed
,
if at all, by the two, sat apparently
occupied
with her work, yet drinking in every word
uttered by the young soldier with a deep and eager
interest, until Roland by chance looking round,
beheld
her large eyes fastened upon him, with a
wild, sorrowful look, of which, however, she
herself
seemed quite unconscious, that greatly
surprised
him. The Kentuckian observing her at the
same time, called to her,What, Telie, my girl,
are you working upon a holyday? You should be
dressed like the others, and making friends with
the strannger lady. And so git away with you now,
and make yourself handsome, and don't stand thar
looking as if the gentleman would eat you.
Upon being thus accosted, the girl exhibited
much of the same terror and flurry of spirits that
she had shown on a previous occasion; but
obeying
the order at last, she left the loom, and stole
timorously into the house.
A qu'ar crittur she, poor thing! said Bruce,
looking after her commiseratingly, and a strannger
might think her no more nor half-witted. But she
has sense enough, poor crittur! and, I reckon, is
just as smart, if she war not so humble and
skittish
,
as any of my own daughters.
What, said Roland, is she not then your
child?
No, no, replied Bruce, shaking his head, a
poor crittur, of no manner of kin whatever. Her
father war an old friend, or acquaintance-like; for,
rat it, I won't own friendship for any such
apostatized
villians, no how:but the man war taken by
the Shawnees; and so as thar war none to
befriend
her, and she war but a little chit no bigger
nor my hand, I took to her myself and raised her.
But the worst of it is, and that's what makes her
VOL. I.5
so wild and skeary, her father, Abel Doe, turned
Injun himself, like Girty, Elliot, and the rest of
them refugee scoundrels you've h'ard of. Now
that's
enough, you see, to make the poor thing sad
and frightful; for Abel Doe is a rogue, thar's no
denying, and every body hates and cusses him, as
is but his due: and it's natteral, now she's growing
old enough to be ashamed of him, she should be
ashamed of herself too,though thar's nothing
but her father to charge against her, poor creatur'.
A bad thing for her, to have an Injunized father;
for if it war'nt for him, I reckon my son Tom, the
brute, would take to her, and marry her.
Poor creature, indeed! muttered Roland to
himself, contrasting in thought the condition of
this helpless and deserted girl with that of his own
unfortunate kinswoman, and sighing to
acknowledge
that it was still more forlorn and pitiable.
His sympathy was, however, but short-lived,
being interrupted on the instant by a loud uproar
of voices from the gate of the stockade, sounding
half in mirth, half in triumph; while the junior
Bruce was seen approaching the porch, looking
the very messenger of good news.
CHAPTER III.
What's
the matter, Tom Bruce? said the
father, eyeing him with surprise.
Matter enough, responded the young giant,
with a grin of mingled awe and delight; the
Jibbenainosay is up again!
Whar? cried the senior, eagerly,not in
our limits?
No, by Jehoshaphat! replied Tom; but
nigh enough to be neighbourly,on the north
bank of Kentuck, whar he has left his mark
right in the middle of the road, as fresh as
though it war but the work of the morning!
And a clear mark, Tom?no mistake in it?
Right to an iota! said the young man;a
reggelar cross on the breast, and a good
tomahawk-dig
right through the skull; and a
longlegg'd
fellow too, that looked as if he might have
fou't old Sattan himself!
It 's the Jibbenainosay, sure enough; and so
good luck to him! cried the commander: thar's
a harricane coming!
Who is the Jibbenainosay? demanded
Forrester
.
Who? cried Tom Bruce; Why Nick,
Nick of the Woods.
And who, if you please, is Nick of the
Woods?
Thar, replied the junior with another grin,
thar, strannger, you 're too hard for me. Some
think one thing, and some another; but thar's
many reckon he's the devil.
And his mark, that you were talking of in
such mysterious terms,what is that?
Why, a dead Injun, to be sure, with Nick's
mark on him,a knife-cut, or a brace of 'em, over
the ribs in the shape of a cross. That's the way
the Jibbenainosay marks all the meat of his
killing
.
It has been a whole year now since we
h'ard of him.
Captain, said the elder Bruce, you don't
seem to understand the affa'r altogether; but if
you war to ask Tom about the Jibbenainosay till
doomsday, he could tell you no more than he has
told already. You must know, thar's a creatur'
of some sort or other that ranges the woods round
about our station h'yar, keeping a sort of guard
over us like, and killing all the brute Injuns that
ar' onlucky enough to come in his way, besides
scalping them, and marking them with his mark.
The Injuns call him
Jibbenainosay
, or a word on
that natur', which them that know more about
the Injun gabble than I do, say means the
Spiritthat-walks
;
and if we can believe any such lying
devils as Injuns, (which I am loath to do, for the
truth ar'nt in 'em,) he is neither man nor beast, but
a great ghost or devil that knife cannot harm nor
bullet touch; and they have always had an idea
that our fort h'yar in partickelar, and the country
round about, war under his friendly protection
many thanks to him, whether he be a devil or not;
for that war the reason the savages so soon left
off a worrying of us.
Is it possible, said Roland, that any one can
believe such an absurd story?
Why not, said Bruce, stoutly. Thar's the
Injuns themselves, Shawnees, Hurons, Delawares
and all,but partickelarly the Shawnees, for he
beats all creation a-killing of Shawnees,that
believe
in him, and hold him in such etarnal dread,
that thar's scarce a brute of 'em has come within
ten miles of the station h'yar, this three y'ar:
because
as how, he haunts about our woods h'yar
in partickelar, and he kills 'em wheresomever he
catches 'em,especially the Shawnees, as I said
afore, against which the creatur' has a most
butchering
spite; and there's them among the other
tribes that call him the
Shawneewannaween
, or the
Howl of the Shawnees, because of his keeping
them ever a howling. And thar's his marks,
captain
,what
do you make of
that?
When you
find an Injun lying scalped and tomahawked, it
stands to reason thar war something to kill
him?
Ay, truly, said Forrester; but I think you
have human beings enough to give the credit to,
without referring it to a supernatural one.
Strannger, said Big Tom Bruce the younger,
with a sagacious nod, when you kill an Injun
yourself, I reckon,meaning no offenceyou will
be willing to take all the honour that can come of
it, without leaving it to be scrambled after by
others. Thar's no man 'arns a scalp in
Kentucky
,
without taking great pains to show it to his
neighbours.
And besides, captain, said the father, very
gravely, thar are men among us who have
seen
the creatur'!
That
, said Roland, who perceived his new
friends were not well pleased with his incredulity,
is an argument I can resist no longer.
Thar war Ben Jones, and Samuel Sharp, and
Peter Smalleye, and a dozen more, who all had
a glimpse of him stalking through the woods, at
5*
different times; and, they agree, he looks more
like a devil nor a mortal man,a great tall fellow
with horns and a hairy head like a buffalo-bull,
and a little devil that looks like a black b'ar, that
walks before him to point out the way. He war
always found in the deepest forests, and that's the
reason we call him Nick of the Woods; wharby
we mean
Old
Nick of the Woods; for we hold
him to be the devil, though a friendly one to all
but Injuns. Now, captain, I war never
superstitious
in my life,but I go my death on the
Jibbenainosay
!
I never seed the creatur' himself,
but I have seen in my time two different savages
of his killing. It's a sure sign, if you see him in
the woods, that thar's Injuns at hand: and it's a
good sign when you find his mark, without seeing
himself; for then you may be sure the brutes are
off,they can't stand old Nick of the Woods no
how! At first, he war never h'ard of afar from
our station; but he has begun to widen his range.
Last year he left his marks down Salt River in
Jefferson; and now, you see, he is striking game
north of the Kentucky; and I have h'ard of them
that say he kills Shawnees even in their own
country; though consarning
that
I'll not be so
partickelar. No, no, captain, thar's no mistake in
Nick of the Woods; and if you are so minded,
we will go and h'ar the whole news of him. But,
I say, Tom, continued the Kentuckian, as the
three left the porch together, who brought the
news?
Captain Ralph,Roaring Ralph Stackpole,
replied Tom Bruce, with a knowing and
humourous
look.
What! cried the father, in sudden alarm;
Look to the horses, Tom!.
I will, said the youth, laughing: it war no
sooner known that Captain Ralph war among us
than it was resolved to have six Regulators in the
range all night! Thar's some of these new colts,
(not to speak of our own creaturs,) and especially
that blooded brown beast of the captain's, which
the nigger calls Brown Briery, or some such
name, would set a better man than Roaring Ralph
Stackpole's mouth watering.
And who, said Roland, is Roaring Ralph
Stackpole? and what has he to do with Brown
Briareus?
A proper fellow as ever you saw! replied
Tom, approvingly;killed two Injuns once,
single-handed
,
on Bear-Grass, and has stolen more
horses from them than ar another man in
Kentucky
.
A prime creatur'! but he has his fault,
poor fellow, and sometimes mistakes a christian's
horse for an Injun's, thar's the truth of it!
And such scoundrels you make officers of?
demanded the soldier, indignantly.
Oh, said the elder Bruce, thar's no reggelar
commission in the case. But whar thar's a knot
of our poor folks out of horses, and inclined to
steal a lot from the Shawnees, (which is all fa'r
plundering, you see, for thar's not a horse among
them, the brutes, that they did not steal from
Kentucky,) they send for Roaring Ralph and make
him their captain; and a capital one he is, too,
being all fight from top to bottom; and as for the
stealing part, thar's no one can equal him. But,
as Tom says, he sometimes
does
make mistakes,
having stolen horses so often from the Injuns, he
can scarce keep his hands off a christian's; and
that makes us wrathy.
By this time the speakers had reached the gate
of the fort, and passed among the cabins outside,
where they found a throng of the villagers,
surrounding
the captain of horse-thieves, and
listening
with great edification to, and deriving no
little amusement from, his account of the last
achievement of the Jibbenainosay. Of this, as it
related no more than the young Bruce had already
repeated,namely, that, while riding that
morning
from the north side, he had stumbled upon the
corse of an Indian, which bore all the marks of
having been a late victim to the wandering
demon
of the woods,we shall say nothing:but
the appearance and conduct of the narrator, one
of the first, and perhaps the parent, of the race of
men who have made Salt River so renowned in
story, were such as to demand a less summary
notice. He was a stout, bandy-legged,
broad-shouldered
,
and bull-headed tatterdemalion, ugly,
mean, and villainous of look; yet with an
impudent
,
swaggering, joyous self-esteem traced in
every feature and expressed in every action of
body, that rather disposed the beholder to laugh
than to be displeased at his appearance. An old
blanket-coat, or wrap-rascal, once white, but now
of the same muddy brown hue that stained his
visage, and once also of sufficient length to
defend
his legs, though the skirts had long since been
transferred to the cuffs and elbows, where they
appeared in huge patches, covered the upper part
of his body; while the lower boasted a pair of
buckskin breeches and leather wrappers,
somewhat
its junior in age, but its rival in mud and
maculation. An old round fur hat, intended
originally for a boy, and only made to fit his
head by being slit in sundry places at the bottom,
thus leaving a dozen yawning gaps, through
which, as through the chinks of a lattice, stole out
as many stiff bunches of black hair, gave to the
capital excrescence an air as ridiculous as it was
truly uncouth, which was not a little increased by
the absence on one side of the brim, and by a
loose fragment of it hanging down on the other.
To give something martial to an appearance in
other respects so outlandish and ludicrous, he had
his rifle, and other usual equipments of a
woodsman
,
including the knife and tomahawk, the first
of which he carried in his hand, swinging it about
at every moment, with a vigour and apparent
carelessness well fit to discompose a nervous
person
,
had any such happened among his auditors.
As if there was not enough in his figure, visage,
and attire to move the mirth of beholders, he
added to his other attractions a variety of
gestures
and antics of the most extravagant kinds,
dancing, leaping and dodging about, clapping his
hands and cracking his heels together, with the
activity, restlessness, and, we may add, the grace,
of a jumping-jack. Such was the worthy, or
unworthy
,
son of Salt River, a man wholly unknown
to history, though not to local and traditionary
fame, and much less to the then inhabitants of
Bruce's Station, to whom he related his news of
the Jibbenainosay with that emphasis and
importance
of tone and manner which are most
significantly
expressed in the phrase of `laying down
the law.'
As soon as he saw the commander of the
Station
approaching, he cleared the throng around
him by a skip and a hop, seized the colonel by the
hand, and doing the same with the soldier, before
Roland could repel him, as he would have done,
exclaimed, Glad to see you, cunnel;same to
you, stranngerWhat's the news from
Virginnie
?
Strannger, my name's Ralph Stackpole,
and I'm a ring-tailed squealer!
Then, Mr. Ralph Stackpole, the ring-tailed
squealer, said Roland, disengaging his hand, be
so good as to pursue your business, without
regarding
or taking any notice of me.
'Tarnal death to me! cried the captain of
horse-thieves, indignant at the rebuff, I'm a
gentleman
,
and my name 's
Fight!
Foot and hand,
tooth and nail, claw and mud-scraper, knife, gun,
and tomahawk, or any other way you choose to
take me, I'm your man! Cock-a-doodle-doo!
And with that, the gentleman jumped into the air,
and flapped his wings, as much to the amusement
of the provoker of his wrath as of any other
person
present.
Come, Ralph, said the commander of the
Station, whar'd' you steal that brown mar' thar?
a question whose abruptness somewhat quelled
the ferment of the man's fury, while it drew a
roar of laughter from the lookers-on.
Thar it is! said he, striking an attitude and
clapping a hand on his breast, like a man who felt
his honour unjustly assailed. Steal!
I
steal any
horse but an Injun's! Whar's the man dar's
insinivate
that? Blood and massacree-ation! whar's
the man?
H'yar, said Bruce, very composedly. I know
that old mar' belongs to Peter Harper, on the north
side.
You're right, by Hooky! cried Roaring
Ralph: at which seeming admission of his knavery
the merriment of the spectators was greatly
increased
;
nor was it much lessened when the
fellow
proceeded to aver that he had borrowed it,
and that with the express stipulation that it should
be left at Bruce's Station, subject to the orders of
its owner. Thar, cunnel, said he, thar's the
beast; take it; and just tell me whar's the one you
mean to lend me,for I must be off afore
sunset
.
And whar are you going? demanded Bruce.
To St. Asaphs,which was a Station some
twenty or thirty miles off,replied Captain
Stackpole
.
Too far for the Regulators to follow, Ralph,
said Colonel Bruce; at which the young men
present
laughed louder than ever, and eyed the
visiter
in a way that seemed both to disconcert and
offend him.
Cunnel, said he, you're a man in authority,
and my superior officer; wharfo' thar' can be no
sealping between us. But my name's Tom
Dowdle
,
the rag-man! he screamed, suddenly
skipping
into the thickest of the throng, and sounding
a note of defiance; my name's Tom Dowdle,
the rag-man, and I'm for any man that insults me!
log-leg or leather-breeches, green-shirt or
blanket-coat
,
land-trotter or river-roller,I'm the man for
a massacree! Then giving himself a twirl upon
his foot that would have done credit to a
dancing-master
,
he proceeded to other antic
demonstrations
of hostility, which, when performed in
after years on the banks of the Lower Mississippi,
by himself and his worthy imitators, were, we
suspect, the cause of their receiving the name of
the mighty alligator. It is said, by naturalists, of
this monstrous reptile, that he delights, when the
returning warmth of spring has brought his
fellows
from their holes, and placed them basking
along the banks of a swampy lagoon, to dart into
the centre of the expanse, and challenge the whole
field to combat. He roars, he blows the water
from his nostrils, he lashes it with his tail, he
whirls round and round, churning the water into
foam; until, having worked himself into a proper
fury, he darts back again to the shore, to seek an
antagonist. Had the gallant captain of
horse-thieves
boasted the blood, as he afterwards did
the name, of an `alligator half-breed,' he could
have scarce conducted himself in a way more
worthy of his parentage. He leaped into the
centre of the throng, where, having found
elbow-room
for his purpose, he performed the gyration
mentioned before, following it up by other feats
expressive of his hostile humour. He flapped his
wings and crowed, until every chanticleer in the
settlement replied to the note of battle; he snorted
and neighed like a horse; he bellowed like a bull;
he barked like a dog; he yelled like an Indian; he
whined like a panther; he howled like a wolf,
until
one would have thought he was a living
menagerie
,
comprising within his single body the spirit
of every animal noted for its love of conflict.
Then, not content with such a display of
readiness
to fight the field, he darted from the centre
of the area allowed him for his exercise, and
invited
the lookers-on individually to battle. Whar's
your buffalo-bull, he cried, to cross horns with
the roarer of Salt River? Whar's your full-blood
colt that can shake a saddle off? h'yar's an old
nag can kick off the top of a buck-eye! Whar's
your cat of the Knob's? your wolf of the Rolling
Prairies? h'yar's the old brown b'ar can claw the
bark off a gum-tree! H'yar's a man for you, Tom
Bruce! Same to you, Sim Roberts! to you, Jimmy
Big-nose! to you, and to you, and to you! Ar'n't
I a ring-tailed squealer? Can go down Salt on my
back, and swim up the Ohio! Whar's the man to
fight Roaring Ralph Stackpole?
Now, whether it happened that there were none
present inclined to a contest with such a
champion
,
or whether it was that the young men look
ed upon the exhibition as a mere bravado meant
rather to amuse them than to irritate, it so
occurred
that not one of them accepted the challenge;
though each, when personally called on, did his
best to add to the roarer's fury, if fury it really
were, by letting off sundry jests in relation to
borrowed horses and Regulators.
[6]
[6]
It is scarce necessary to inform the reader, that by this
term must be understood those public-spirited citizens, amateur
jack-ketches, who administer Lynch-law in districts where
regular law is but inefficiently, or not at all, established.
That the
fellow's
rage was in great part assumed, Roland,
who was, at first, somewhat amused at his
extravagance
,
became soon convinced; and growing
at last weary of it, he was about to signify to his
host his inclination to return into the fort, when
the appearance of another individual on the ground
suddenly gave promise of new entertainment.
VOL. I.6
CHAPTER IV.
If
you're ralely ripe for a fight, Roaring
Ralph, cried Tom Bruce the younger, who had
shown, like the others, a greater disposition to jest
than to do battle with the champion, here comes
the very man for you. Look, boys, thar comes
Bloody Nathan! At which formidable name
there was a loud shout set up, with an infinite
deal of laughing and clapping of hands.
Whar's the feller? cried Captain Stackpole,
springing six feet into the air, and uttering a
whoop of anticipated triumph. I've heerd of
the brute, and, 'tarnal death to me, but I'm his
super-superior! Show me the crittur, and let me
fly! Cock-a-doodle-doo!
Hurrah for Roaring Ralph Stackpole! cried
the young men, some of whom proceeded to pat
him on the back in compliment to his courage,
while others ran forward to hasten the approach
of the expected antagonist.
The appearance of the comer, at a distance,
promised an equal match to the captain of
horse-thieves
;
but Roland perceived, from the increase
of merriment among the Kentuckians, and
especially
from his host joining heartily in it, that there
was more in Bloody Nathan than met the eye.
And yet there was enough in his appearance to
attract attention, and to convince the soldier that
if Kentucky had shown him, in Captain
Stackpole
,
one extraordinary specimen of her
inhabitants
,
she had others to exhibit not a whit less
remarkable. It is on the frontiers, indeed, where
adventurers from every corner of the world, and
from every circle of society, are thrown together,
that we behold the strongest contrasts, and the
strangest varieties, of human character.
Casting his eyes down the road or street, (for it
was flanked by the outer cabins of the settlement,
and perhaps deserved the latter name,) which led,
among stumps and gullies, from the gate of the
stockade to the bottom of the hill, Forrester
beheld
a tall man approaching, leading an old lame
white horse, at the heels of which followed a little
silky-haired black or brown dog, dragging its tail
betwixt its legs, in compliment to the curs of the
Station, which seemed as hospitably inclined to
spread a field of battle for the submissive brute, as
their owners were to make ready another for its
master. The first thing that surprised the soldier
in the appearance of the person bearing so
formidable
a name, was an incongruity which struck
others as well as himself, even the colonel of
militia exclaiming, as he pointed it out with his
finger, It's old Nathan Slaughter, to the
backbone
!
Thar he comes, the brute, leading a horse
in his hand, and carrying his pack on his own
back! But he's a marciful man, old Nathan, and
the horse thar, old White Dobbin, war foundered
and good for nothing ever since the boys made a
race with him against Sammy Parker's jackass.
As he approached yet nigher, Roland perceived
that his tall, gaunt figure was arrayed in garments
of leather from top to toe, even his cap, or hat,
(for such it seemed, having several broad flaps
suspended by strings, so as to serve the purpose of
a brim,) being composed of fragments of tanned
skins rudely sewed together. His upper garment
differed from a hunting-shirt only in wanting the
fringes usually appended to it, and in being
fashioned
without any regard to the body it encompassed,
so that, in looseness and shapelessness, it looked
more like a sack than a human vestment; and,
like his breeches and leggings, it bore the marks
of the most reverend antiquity, being covered with
patches and stains of all ages, sizes, and colours.
Thus far Bloody Nathan's appearance was not
inconsistent with his name, being uncommonly
wild and savage; and to assist in maintaining his
claims to the title, he had a long rifle on his
shoulder
,
and a knife in his belt, both of which were in
a state of dilapidation worthy of his other
equipments
;
the knife, from long use and age, being
worn so thin that it seemed scarce worth the
carrying
,
while the rifle boasted a stock so rude,
shapeless, and, as one would have judged from its
magnitude and weight, so unserviceable, that it
was easy to believe it had been constructed by the
unskilful hands of Nathan himself. Such, then, was
the appearance of the man who seemed so
properly
to be called the Bloody: but when Roland
came to survey him a little more closely, he could
not avoid suspecting that the sobriquet, instead of
being given to indicate warlike and dangerous
traits of character, had been bestowed out of pure
wantonness and derision. His visage, seeming to
belong to a man of at least forty-five or fifty years
of age, was hollow, and almost as weather-worn
as his apparel, with a long hooked nose,
prominent
chin, a wide mouth exceedingly straight and
pinched, with a melancholy or contemplative
twist at the corners, and a pair of black staring
eyes that beamed a good-natured, humble, and
perhaps submissive, simplicity of disposition. His
gait, too, as he stumbled along up the hill, with a
shuffling, awkward, hesitating step, was more like
that of a man who apprehended injury and insult,
than of one who possessed the spirit to resist them.
The fact, moreover, of his sustaining on his own
shoulders a heavy pack of deer and other skins,
to relieve the miserable horse which he led,
betokened
a merciful temper, scarce compatible with
the qualities of a man of war and contention.
Another test and criterion by which Roland judged
his claims to the character of a roarer, he found
in the little black dog; for the Virginian was a
devout believer, as we are ourselves, in that
maxim
of practical philosophers,namely, that by the
dog you shall know the master, the one being
fierce, magnanimous, and cowardly, just as his
master is a bully, a gentleman, or a dastard. The
little dog of Bloody Nathan was evidently a
coward
,
creeping along at white Dobbin's heels, and
seeming to supplicate with his tail, which now
draggled in the mud, and now attempted a timid
wag, that his fellow-curs of the Station should not
be rude and inhospitable to a peaceable stranger.
On the whole, the appearance of the man was
any thing in the world but that of the bulky and
ferocious ruffian whom the nickname had led
Roland
to anticipate; and he scarce knew whether
to pity him, or to join in the laugh with which the
young men of the settlement greeted his approach.
Perhaps his sense of the ridiculous would have
disposed the young soldier to merriment; but the
wistful look, with which, while advancing, Nathan
seemed to deprecate the insults he evidently
expected
,
spoke volumes of reproach to his spirit,
and the half-formed smile faded from his
countenance
.
Thar! exclaimed Tom Bruce, slapping
Stackpole
on the shoulder, with great glee, thar's the
man that calls himself Dannger! At him, for the
6*
honour of Salt River; but take care of his
forelegs
,
for, I tell you, he's the Pennsylvany
war-horse
!
And ar'n't I the ramping tiger of the Rolling
Fork? cried Captain Ralph; and can't I eat
him, hoss, dog, dirty jacket, and all? Hold me by
the tail, while I devour him!
With that, he executed two or three escapades,
demivoltes, curvets, and other antics of a truly
equine character, and galloping up to the amazed
Nathan, saluted him with a neigh so shrill and
hostile that even White Dobbin pricked up his
ears, and betrayed other symptoms of alarm.
Surely, Colonel, said Roland, you will not
allow that mad ruffian to assail the poor man?
Oh, said Bruce, Ralph won't hurt him; he's
never ambitious, except among Injuns and horses.
He's only for skearing the old feller.
And who! said Forrester, may the old
fellow
be? and why do you call him Bloody
Nathan
?
We call him Bloody Nathan, replied the
commander, because he's the only man in all
Kentucky, that
won't fight!
and thar's the way he
beats us all hollow. Lord, Captain, you'd hardly
believe it, but he's nothing more than a poor
Pennsylvany Quaker; and what brought him out
to Kentucky, whar thar's nar another creatur' of
his tribe, thar's no knowing. Some say he war
dishonest, and so had to cut loose from
Pennsylvany
;
but I never heerd of his stealing any thing
in Kentucky: I reckon thar's too much of the
chicken about him for that. Some say he is
hunting rich lands; which war like enough for
any body that war not so poor and lazy. And
some say his wits are unsettled, and I hold that
that's the truth of the creatur'; for he does
nothing
but go wandering up and down the country,
now h'yar and now thar, hunting for meat and
skins; and that's pretty much the way he makes a
living; and once I see'd the creatur' have a fit,
a right up-and-down touch of the falling-sickness,
with his mouth all of a foam. Thar's them that's
good-natur'd, that calls him Wandering Nathan,
because of his being h'yar, and thar, and every
whar. He don't seem much afear'd of the
Injuns
;
but, they say, the red brutes never disturbs
the Pennsylvany Quakers. Howsomever, he
makes himself useful; for sometimes he finds
Injun
sign whar thar's no Injuns thought of, and so
he gives information; but he always does it, as he
says, to save bloodshed, not to bring on a fight.
He comes to me once, thar's more than three
years ago, and instead of saying `Cunnel, thar's
twenty Injuns lying on the road at the lower ford
of Salt, whar you may nab them;' says he, says
he, `Friend Thomas; thee must keep the people
from going nigh the ford, for thar's Injuns thar
that will hurt them;' and then he takes himself off;
whilst I rides down thar with twenty-five men
and exterminates them, killing six, and driving
the others the Lord knows whar. He has had but
a hard time of it among us, poor creatur'; for it
used to make us wrathy to find thar war so little
fight in him, that he would'nt so much as kill a
murdering Injun. I took his gun from him once;
for why, he wouldn't attend muster, when I had
enrolled him. But I pitied the brute; for he war
poor, and thar war but little corn in his cabin,
and nothing to shoot meat with; and so I gave it
back, and told him to take his own ways for an
old fool.
While Colonel Bruce was thus delineating the
character of Nathan Slaughter, the latter found
himself surrounded by the young men of the
Station
,
the butt of a thousand jests, and the victim of
the insolence of the captain of horse-thieves. It
is not to be supposed that Roaring Ralph was
really the bully and madman that his extravagant
freaks and expressions seemed to proclaim him.
These, like any other `actions that a man might
play,' were assumed, partly because it suited his
humour to be fantastic, and partly because the
putting of his antic disposition on, was the only
means which he, like many of his betters,
possessed
of attracting attention, and avoiding the
neglect and contempt to which his low habits and
appearance would have otherwise justly consigned
him. There was, therefore, little really hostile in
the feelings with which he approached the
noncombatant
;
though it was more than probable,
the disgust he, in common with the other warlike
personages, entertained toward the peaceable
Nathan
,
might have rendered him a little more
malicious
than usual.
Bloody Nathan! said he, as soon as he had
concluded his neighing and curvetting, if you
ever said your prayers, now's the time. Down
with your pack,for I can't stand deer's ha'r
sticking in my swallow, no how!
Friend, said Blooody Nathan, meekly, I beg
thee will not disturb me. I am a man of peace
and quiet.
And so saying, he endeavoured to pass onwards,
but was prevented by Ralph, who seizing his
heavy bundle with one hand, applied his right foot
to it with a dexterity that not only removed it from
the poor man's back, but sent the dried skins
scatering
over the road. This feat was rewarded by
the spectators with loud shouts, all which, as well
as the insult itself, Nathan bore with exemplary
patience.
Friend, he said, what does thee seek of me,
that thee treats me thus?
A fight! replied Captain Stackpole, uttering
a war-whoop; a fight, strannger, for the love of
heaven!
Thee seeks it of the wrong person, said
Nathan
;
and I beg thee will get thee away.
What! said Stackpole, ar'nt thee the
Pennsylvanny
war-horse, the screamer of the
meeting-house
,
the bloody-mouthed b'ar of
Yea-Nay-and-Verily
?
I am a man of peace, said the submissive
Slaughter.
Yea verily, verily and yea! cried Ralph,
snuffling
through the nostrils, but assuming an air of
extreme indignation; Strannger, I've heerd of
you! You're the man that holds it agin duty and
conscience to kill Injuns, the red-skin screamers,
that refuses to defend the women, the
splendiferous
creatur's! and the little children, the
squall-a-baby
d'ars! And wharfo'? Bec'ause as how you're
a man of peace and no fight, you superiferous,
long-legged, no-souled, crittur! But I'm the
gentleman
to make a man of you. So down with
your gun, and 'tarnal death to me, I'll whip the
cowardly devil out of you.
Friend, said Nathan, his humility yielding to
a feeling of contempt, thee is theeself a
cowardly
person, or thee would n't seek a quarrel
with one, thee knows, can't fight thee. Thee would
not be so ready with thee match.
With that, he stooped to gather up his skins, a
proceeding that Stackpole, against whom the
laugh was turned by this sally of Nathan's,
resisted
by catching him by the nape of the neck,
twirling him round, and inaking as if he really
would have beaten him.
Even this the peaceful Nathan bore without
anger or murmuring; but his patience fled, when
Stackpole, turning to the little dog, which by
bristling its back and growling, expressed a half
inclination to take up its master's quarrel, applied
his foot to its ribs with a violence that sent it
rolling some five or six yards down the hill, where
it lay for a time yelping and whining with pain.
Friend! said Nathan, sternly, thee is but a
dog theeself, to harm the creature! What will
thee have with me?
A fight! a fight, I tell thee! replied Captain
Ralph, till I teach thy leatherified conscience
the new doctrines of Kentucky.
Fight thee I cannot and dare not, said
Nathan
;
and then added, much to the surprise of
Forrester, who, sharing his indignation at the
brutality of his tormentor; had approached to
drive the fellow off,But if thee must have
thee deserts, thee
shall
have them.Thee prides
theeself upon thee courage and strengthwill thee
adventure with me a friendly fall?
Hurrah for Bloody Nathan! cried the young
men, vastly delighted at his unwonted spirit, while
Captain Ralph himself expressed his pleasure, by
leaping into the air, crowing, and dashing off his
hat, which he kicked down the hill with as much
good will as he had previously bestowed upon the
little dog.
Off with your leather night-cap, and down
with your rifle, he cried, giving his own weapon
into the hands of a looker-on, and serape some
of the grease off your jacket; for, 'tarnal death
to me, I shall give you the Virginny lock, fling
you head-fo'most, and you'll find yourself, in a
twinkling, sticking fast right in the centre of the
'arth!
Thee may find theeself mistaken, said
Nathan
,
giving up his gun to one of the young men,
but instead of rejecting his hat, pulling it down
tight over his brows. There is locks taught
among the mountains of Bedford that may be as
good as them learned on the hills of Virginia.I
am ready for thee.
Cock-a-doodle-doo! cried Ralph Stackpole,
springing towards his man, and clapping his
hands, one on Nathan's left shoulder, the other on
his right hip: Are you ready?
I am, replied Nathan.
Down then, you go, war you a buffalo!
And with that the captain of horse-thieves put
forth his strength, which was very great, in an
effort that appeared to Roland quite irresistible;
though, as it happened, it scarce moved Nathan
from his position.
Thee is mistaken, friend! he cried, exerting
his strength in return, and with an effect that no
one had anticipated. By magic, as it seemed, the
heels of the captain of horse-thieves were
suddenly
seen flying in the air, his head aiming at
the earth, upon which it as suddenly descended
with the violence of a bomb-shell; and there it
would doubtless have burrowed, like the
aforesaid
implement of destruction, had the soil been
soft enough for the purpose, or exploded into a
thousand fragments, had not the shell been double
the thickness of an ordinary skull.
Huzza! Bloody Nathan for ever! shouted
the delighted villagers.
He has killed the man, said Forrester; but
bear witness, all, the fellow provoked his fate.
Thanks to you, strannger! but not so dead as
you reckon, said Ralph, rising to his feet, and
scratching his poll, with a stare of comical
confusion
.
I say, strannger, here's my shoulders,
but whar's my head?Do you reckon I had the
worst of it?
Huzza for Bloody Nathan Slaughter! He has
whipped the ramping tiger of Salt River; cried
the young men of the station.
Well, I reckon he has, said the magnanimous
Captain Ralph, picking up his hat: then walking
up to Nathan, who had taken his dog into his
arms, to examine into the little animal's hurts, he
cried, with much good-humoured energy,Thar's
my fo'-paw, in token I've had enough of you, and
want no mo'. But I say, Nathan Slaughter, he
added, as he grasped the victor's hand, it's no
thing you can boast of, to be the strongest man in
Kentucky, and the most sevagarous at a tussel,
h'yar among murdering Injuns and scalping
runnegades
,
and keep your fists off their top-knots.
Thar's my idear: for I go for the doctrine, that
every able-bodied man should sarve his country
and his neighbours, and fight their foes; and them
that does is men and gentlemen, and them that
don't is cowards and rascals, that's my idear.
And so, fawwell.
Then, executing another demivolte or two, but
with much less spirit than he had previously
displayed
,
he returned to Colonel Bruce, saying,
Whar's that horse you promised me, cunnel?
I'm a licked man, and I can't stay here no longer,
no way no how. Lend me a hoss, cunnel, and
trust to my honour.
You shall have a beast, said Bruce, coolly;
but as to trusting your honour, I shall do no such
thing, having something much better to rely on.
Tom will show you a horse; and, remember, you
are to leave him at Logan's. If you carry him a
step further, captain, you'll never carry another.
Judge Lynch is looking at you; and so bewar'.
Having uttered this hint, he left the captain of
horse-thieves to digest it as he might, and stepped
up to Nathan, who had seated himself on a stump,
where, with his skins at his side, his little dog and
his rifle betwixt his legs, he sat enduring a
thousand
sarcastic encomiums on his strength and
spirit, with as many sharp denunciations of the
peaceful principles that robbed the community of
the services he had shown himself so well able to
render. The doctrine, so eloquently avowed by
Captain Ralph, that it was incumbent upon every
able-bodied man to fight the enemies of their little
state, the murderers of their wives and children,
was a canon of belief imprinted on the heart of
every man in the district; and Nathan's failure to
do so, however caused by his conscientious
aversion
to bloodshed, no more excused him from
contempt
and persecution in the wilderness, than it
did others of his persuasion in the Eastern
republics
,
during the war of the revolution. His
appearance
,
accordingly, at any Station, was usually
the signal for reproach and abuse; the fear of
which had driven him almost altogether from the
society of his fellow-men, so that he was seldom
seen among them, except when impelled by
necessity
,
or when his wanderings in the woods had
acquainted him with the proximity of the foes of
his persecutors. His victory over the captain of
horse-thieves exposed him, on this occasion, to
ruder and angrier remonstrances than usual;
which having sought in vain to avert, he sat down
in despair, enduring all in silence, staring from
one to another of his tormentors with lack-lustre
eyes, and playing with the silken hair of his dog.
VOL. I.7
The approach of the captain of the Station
procured
him an interval of peace, which he,
however
,
employed only to communicate his troubles
to the little cur, that, in his perplexity, he
addressed
pretty much as he would have addressed a
human friend and adviser: Well, Peter, said
he, abstractedly, and with a heavy sigh, what
does
thee
think of matters and things? To which
question, the ridiculousness of which somewhat
mollified the anger of the young men, Peter
replied
by rubbing his nose against his master's
hand, and by walking a step or two down the hill,
as if advising an instant retreat from the
inhospitable
Station.
Ay, Peter, muttered Nathan, the sooner we
go the better; for there are none that makes us
welcome. But nevertheless, Peter, we must have
our lead and our powder; and we must tell these
poor people the news.
And pray, Nathan, said Colonel Bruce,
rousing
him from his meditations, what may your
news for the poor people be? I reckon it will be
much wiser to tell it to me than that 'ar brute
dog. You have seen the Jibbenainosay, perhaps,
or his mark thar-away on the Kentucky?
Nay, said Nathan. But there is news from
the Injun towns of a great gathering of Injuns
with their men of war in the Miami villages, who
design, the evil creatures, marching into the
district
of Kentucky with a greater army than was
ever seen in the land before.
Let them come, the brutes, said the
Kentuckian
,
with a laugh of scorn; it will save us
the trouble of hunting them up in their own
towns.
Nay, said Nathan: but perhaps they
have
come; for the prisoner who escaped, and who is
bearing the news to friend Clark, the General at
the Falls, says they were to march two days after
he fled from them.
And whar did you learn this precious news?
At the lower ford of Kentucky, and from the
man himself, said Nathan. He had warned the
settlers at Lexington
That's piper's news, interrupted one of the
young men. Captain Ralph told us all about
that; but he said thar war nobody at Lexington
believed the story.
Then, said Nathan, meekly, it may be that
the man was mistaken. Yet persons should have
a care, for there is Injun sign all along the
Kentucky
.
But that is my story. And now, friend
Thomas, if thee will give me lead and powder for
my skins, I will be gone, and trouble thee no
longer.
It's a sin and a shame to waste them on a,
man who only employs them to kill deer, b'ar,
and turkey, said Bruce; yet a man must n't
starve, even whar he's a quaker. So go you
along with my son Dick thar, to the store, and
he'll give you the value of your plunder.A poor,
miserable brute, thar's no denying, he continued,
contemptuously, as Nathan, obeying the direction,
followed Bruce's second son into the fortress.
The man has some spirit now and then; but
whar's the use of it, while he's nothing but a
no-fight
quaker? I tried to reason him out of his
notions; but thar war no use in trying, no how I
could work it. I have an idea about these
quakers
But here, luckily, the worthy Colonel's idea was
suddenly put to flight by the appearance of Telie
Doe, who came stealing through the throng, to
summon him to his evening meal,a call which
neither he nor his guest was indisposed to obey;
and taking Telie by the hand in a paternal
manner
,
he ushered the young soldier back into the
fort.
The girl, Roland observed, had changed her
attire at the bidding of her protector, and now,
though dressed with the greatest simplicity,
appeared
to more advantage than before. He
thought her, indeed, quite handsome, and pitying
her more than orphan condition, he endeavoured
to show her such kindness as was in his power,
by addressing to her some complimentary
remarks
,
as he walked along at her side. His
words, however, only revived the terror she
seemed
really to experience, whenever any one
accosted
her; seeing which, he desisted, doubting if
she deserved the compliment the benevolent Bruce
had so recently paid to her good sense.
CHAPTER V.
The
evening meal being concluded, and a few
brief moments devoted to conversation with her
new friends, Edith was glad, when, at a hint from
her kinsman as to the early hour appointed for
setting out on the morrow, she was permitted to
seek the rest of which she stood in need. Her
chamberand, by a rare exercise of hospitality,
the merit of which she appreciated, since she was
sensible it could not have been made without
sacrifice
,
she occupied it aloneboasted few of the
luxuries, few even of the comforts, to which she
had been accustomed in her native land, and her
father's house. But misfortune had taught her
spirit humility; and the recollection of nights
passed in the desert, with only a thin mattress
betwixt
her and the naked earth, and a little
tent-cloth
and the boughs of trees to protect her from
inclement skies, caused her to regard her present
retreat with such feelings of satisfaction as she
might have indulged if in the chamber of a
palace.
She was followed to the apartment by a bevy of
the fair Bruces, all solicitous to render her such
assistance as they could, and all, perhaps, equally
anxious to indulge their admiration, for the second
or third time, over the slender store of finery,
which Edith good-naturedly opened to their
inspection
.
In this way the time fled amain until
Mrs. Bruce, more considerate than her daughters,
7 *
and somewhat scandalized by the loud
commendations
which they passed on sundry articles of
dress such as were never before seen in
Kentucky
,
rushed into the chamber, and drove them
manfully away.
Poor, ignorant critturs! said she, by way of
apology, they knows no better: thar's the
mischief
of being raised in the back-woods. They'll
never l'arn to be genteel, thar's so many common
persons comes out here with their daughters. I'm
sure, I do my best to l'arn 'em.
With these words she tendered her own good
offices to Edith, which the young lady declining
with many thanks, she bade her good night, and,
to Edith's great relief, left her to herself. A few
moments then sufficed to complete her
preparations
for slumber, which being effected, she threw
herself on her knees, to implore the further favour
of the orphan's Friend, who had conducted her
so far in safety on her journey.
Whilst thus engaged, her mind absorbed in the
solemn duty, she failed to note that another visiter
had softly stolen into the apartment; and
accordingly
,
when she rose from her devotions, and
beheld
a female figure standing in the distance,
though regarding her with both reverence and
timidity, she could not suppress an exclamation of
alarm.
Do not be afraid,it is only Telie Doe, said
the visiter with a low and trembling voice: I
thought you would want some one toto take the
candle.
You are very good, replied Edith, who,
having
scarcely before observed the humble and
retiring
maid, and supposing her to be one of her
host's children, had little doubt she had stolen in
to indulge her curiosity like the others, although at
so late a moment, as to authorize a little cruelty
on the part of the guest. I am very tired and
sleepy, she said, creeping into bed, hoping that
the confession would be understood and accepted
as an apology. She then, seeing that Telie did
not act upon the hint, intimated that she had no
further occasion for the light, and bade her
good-night
.
But Telie, instead of departing,
maintained
her stand at the little rude table, where, besides
the candle, were several articles of apparel that
Edith had laid out in readiness for the morning,
and upon which she thought the girl's eyes were
fixed.
If you had come a little earlier, said Edith,
with unfailing good-nature, I should have been
glad to show you any thing I have. But now,
indeed
,
it is too late, and all my packages are made
up
It is not
that
, interrupted the maiden hastily,
but with trepidation. No, I did not want to
trouble
you. But
But what? demanded Edith, with surprise,
yet with kindness, for she observed the agitation
of the speaker.
Lady, said Telie, mustering resolution, and
stepping to the bed-side, if you will not be angry
with me, I would,I would
You would ask a favour, perhaps? said
Edith, encouraging her with a smile.
Yes, that is it, replied the girl, dropping on
her knees, not so much, however, as it appeared,
from abasement of spirit, as to bring her lips
nearer to Edith's ear, that she might speak in a
lower voice. I know, from what they say, you
are a great lady, and that you once had many
people to wait upon you; and now you are in the
wild woods, among strangers, and none about you
but men. Edith replied with a sigh, and Telie,
timorously grasping at the hand lying nearest her
own, murmured eagerly, If you would but take
me
with you, I am used to the woods, and I would
be your servant.
You!
exclaimed Edith, her surprise getting
the better of her sadness. Your mother would
surely never consent to your being a servant?
My mother? muttered Telie,I have no
mother,no relations.
What! Mr. Bruce is not then your father?
No,I have no father. Yes,that is, I have
a father; but he has,he has turned Indian.
These words were whispered rather than
spoken
,
yet whispered with a tone of grief and shame
that touched Edith's feelings. Her pity was
expressed
in her countenance, and Telie, reading the
gentle sympathy infused into every lovely
feature
,
bent over the hand she had clasped, and
touched it with her lips.
I have told you the truth, she said,
mournfully
:
one like me should not be ashamed to be a
servant. And so, lady, if you will take me, I will
go with you and serve you; and poor and
ignorant
as I am, I
can
serve you,yes, ma'am, she
added, eagerly, I can serve you more and better
than you think,indeed, indeed I can.
Alas, poor child, said Edith, I am one who
must learn to do without attendance and service.
I have no home to give you.
I have heard it all, said Telie; but I can
live in the woods with you, till you have a house;
and then I can work for you, and you'll never
repent
taking me,no, indeed, for I know all that's
to be done by a woman in a new land, and you
don't; and indeed, if you have none to help you,
it would kill you, it would indeed: for it is a hard,
hard time in the woods for a woman that has been
brought up tenderly.
Alas, child, said Edith, perhaps a little
pettishly
,
for she liked not to dwell upon such gloomy
anticipations, why should you be discontented
with the home you have already? Surely, there
are none here unkind to you?
No, replied the maiden, they are very good
to me, and Mr. Bruce has been a father to me.
But then I am
not
his child, and it is wrong of me
to live upon him, who has so many children of his
own. And then my fatherall talk of my father;
all the people here hate him, though he has never
done them harm, and I know,yes, I know it well
enough, though they won't believe it,that he
keeps the Indians from hurting them; but they
hate him and curse him; and, oh, I wish I was
away, where I should never hear them speak of
him more. Perhaps they don't know any thing
about him at the Falls, and then there will be
nobody to call me the white Indian's daughter.
And does Mr. Bruce, or his wife, know of
your desire to leave him?
No, said Telie, her terrors reviving; but if
you should ask them for me, then they would
agree to let me go. He told the Captain,that's
Captain Forrester,he would do any thing for
him; and indeed he would, for he is a good man,
and he will do what he says.
How strange, how improper, nay, how
ungrateful
then, if he be a good man, said Edith,
that you should wish to leave him and his kind
family, to live among persons entirely unknown.
Be content, my poor maid. You have little save
imaginary evils to afflict you. You are happier
here than you can be among strangers.
Telie clasped her hands in despair; I shall
never be happy here, nor any where. But take
me, she added eagerly, take me for your own
sake;for it will be good for you to have me
with you in the woods, it will, indeed it will.
It cannot be, said Edith, gently. But the
maiden would scarce take a refusal. Her terrors
had been dissipated by her having ventured so far
on speech, and she now pursued her object with
an imploring and passionate earnestness that both
surprised and embarrassed Edith, while it
increased
her sympathy for the poor bereaved
pleader. She endeavoured to convince her, if not
of the utter folly of her desires, at least of the
impossibility
there was on her part of granting them.
She succeeded, however, in producing conviction
only on one point: Telie perceived that her suit
was not to be granted: of which as soon as she
was satisfied, she left off entreaty; and rose to her
feet with a saddened and humbled visage, and
then taking up the candle, she left the fair stranger
to her repose.
In the meanwhile, Roland also was preparing
for slumber; and finding, as indeed he could not
avoid seeing, that the hospitality of his host had
placed the males of the family under the necessity
of taking their rest in the open air on the porch,
he insisted upon passing the night in the same
place in their company. In fact, the original
habitation
of the back-woodsman seldom boasted
more than two rooms in all, and these none of the
largest; and when emigrants arrived at a Station,
there was little attempt made to find shelter for
any save their women and children, to whom the
men of the settlement readily gave up their own
quarters, to share those of their male visiters
under
the blanket-tents which were spread before
the doors. This, to men who had thus passed the
nights for several weeks in succession, was any
thing but hardship; and when the weather was
warm and dry, they could congratulate
themselves
on sleeping in greater comfort than their
sheltered companions. Of this Forrester was well
aware, and he took an early period to
communicate
his resolution of rejecting the unmanly luxury
of a bed, and sleeping like a soldier, wrapped in
his cloak, with his saddle for a pillow. In this
way, the night proving unexpectedly sultry, he
succeeded in enjoying more delightful and
refreshing
slumbers than blessed his kinswoman in her
bed of down. The song of the katydid and the
cry of the whippoorwill came more sweetly to his
cars from the adjacent woods; and the breeze that
had stirred a thousand leagues of forest in its
flight, whispered over his cheek with a more
enchanting
music than it made among the chinks
and crannies of the wall by Edith's bed-side. A
few idle dreams,recollections of home, mingled
with the anticipated scenes of the future, the deep
forest, the wild beast, and the lurking Indian,
amused, without harassing, his sleeping mind;
and it was not until the first gray of dawn that he
experienced any interruption. He started up
suddenly
,
his ears still tingling with the soft tones of
an unknown voice, which had whispered in them,
Cross the river by the Lower Ford,there is
danger at the Upper.He stared around, but
saw nothing; all was silent around him, save the
deep breathing of the sleepers at his side. Who
spoke? he demanded in a whisper, but received
no reply. River,Upper and Lower Ford;
danger? he muttered: now I would have
sworn some one spoke to me: and yet I must
have dreamed it. Strange things, dreams,
thoughts in freedom, loosed from the chains of
association
,temporary
mad-fits undoubtedly:
marvellous
impressions they produce on the organs of
sense; see, hear, smell, taste, touch, more
exquisitely
without
the organs than
with
themWhat's
the use of organs? There's the poserI think,
I but here he ceased thinking altogether, his
philosophy having served the purpose such
philosophy
usually does, and wrapped him a second
time in the arms of Morpheus. He opened his
eyes almost immediately, as he thought; but his
morning nap had lasted half an hour; the dawn
was already purple and violet in the sky, his
companions
had left his side, and the hum of voices
and the sound of footsteps in and around the
Station
,
told him that his fellow exiles were already
preparing to resume their journey.
A brave morrow to you, captain! said the
commander of the fortress, the thunder of whose
footsteps, as he approached the house with
uncommonly
fierce strides, had perhaps broken his
slumbers. A frown was on his brow, and the
grasp of his hand, in which every finger seemed
doing the duty of a boa-constrictor, spoke of a
spirit up in arms, and wrestling with passion.
What is the matter? asked Roland.
Matter that consarns you and me more than
any other two persons in the etarnal world! said
Bruce, with such energy of utterance as nothing
but rage could supply. Thar has been a black wolf
in the pin-fold,
alias
, as they used to say at the
court-house, Captain Ralph Stackpole; and the
end of it is, war I never to tell another truth in my
life, that your blooded brown horse has
absquotulated
!
Absquotulated!
echoed Forrester, amazed as
much at the word as at the fierce visage of his
friend,what is that? Is the horse hurt?
Stolen away, sir, by the etarnal Old Scratch!
Carried off by Roaring Ralph Stackpole, while I,
like a brute, war sound a-sleeping! And h'yar's
the knavery of the thing, sir! the
unpronounceable
rascality, sir!I loaned the brute one of my
own crittur's, just to be rid of him, and have him
out of harm's way; for I had a forewarning, the
brute, that his mouth war a-watering after the new
beasts in the pin-fold, and after the brown horse in
partickelar! And so I loaned him a horse, and
sent him off to Logan's. Well, sir, and what does
the brute do but ride off, for a make-believe, to set
us easy; for he knew, the brute, if he war in sight,
of us, we should have had guards over the cattle
all night long; well, sir, down he sot in ambush,
till all war quiet; and then he stole back, and
turning
my own horse among the others, as if to say,
`Thar's the beast that I borrowed,'it war a
wonder
the brute war so honest!picked the best of the
gathering, your blooded brown horse, sir! and all
the while, I war sleeping like a brute, and leaving
the guest in my own house to be robbed by
Captain
Ralph Stackpole, the villian!
If it be possible to follow the rascal, said
Roland
,
giving way to wrath himself, I must do so,
and without a moment's delay. I would to
heaven
I had known this earlier.
Whar war the use, said Bruce; whar war
the use of disturbing a tired man in his nap, and
he a guest of mine too?
The advantage would have been, said
Roland
,
a little testily, that the pursuit could have
been instantly begun.
And war it
not?
said the colonel. Thar
war not two minutes lost after the horse war
missing
,
afore my son Tom and a dozen more of the
best woodsmen war mounted on the fleetest horses
VOL. I.8
in the settlement, and galloping after, right on the
brute's trail.
Thanks, my friend, said Roland, with a
cordial
grasp of hand. The horse will be
recovered
?
Thar's no denying it, said Bruce, if a fresh
leg can outrun a weary one: and besides, the brute
war not content with the best horse, but he must
have the second best too, that's Major Smalleye's
two-y'ar-old pony. He has an eye for a horse,
the etarnal skirmudgeon! but the pony will be the
death of him; for he's skeary, and will keep
Ralph slow in the path. No, sir; we'll have your
brown horse before you can say Jack Robinson.
But the intolerability of the thing, sir, is that
Ralph Stackpole should steal my guest's horse,
sir! But it's the end of his thieving, the brute, or
thar's no snakes! I told him Lynch war out, the
brute, and I told the boys to take ear' I war not
found lying; and I reckon they won't forget me!
I like the crittur, thar's no denying, for he's a
screamer among Injuns; but thar's no standing a
horse-thief! no, sir, thar's no standing a
horse-thief
!
The only evil consequence of this accident
which was apprehended, was that the march of
the exiles must be delayed until the soldier's horse
was recovered, or Roland himself left behind
until the animal was brought in; unless, indeed,
he chose to accept another freely offered him by
his gallant host, and trust to having his own
charger restored on some future occasion. He
was himself unwilling that the progress of more
than a hundred human beings towards the long
sighed for land of promise should be delayed a
moment on his account; and for this reason he
exhorted his nominal superior to hasten the
preparations
for departure, without thinking of him.
His first resolution in relation to his own course,
was to proceed with the company, leaving his
horse to be sent after him, when recovered. He
was loath, however, to leave the highly-prized and
long-tried charger behind; and Colonel Bruce
taking advantage of the feeling, and representing
the openness and safety of the road, the shortness
of the day's journey, (for the next Station at
which the exiles: intended lodging was scarce
twenty miles distant,) and above all, promising,
if he remained, to escort him thither with a band
of his young men, to whom the excursion would
be but an agreeable frolic, the soldier changed his
mind, and, in an evil hour, as it afterwards
appeared
,
consented to remain until Brown Briareus
was brought in,provided this should happen
before
mid-day: at which time, if the horse did not
appear, it was agreed he should set out, trusting
to his good fortune and the friendly zeal of his
host, for the future recovery and restoration of his
charger. Later than mid-day he was resolved
not to remain; for however secure the road, it
was wiser to pursue it in company than alone;
nor would he have consented to remain a moment,
had there appeared the least impediment to his
joining the companions of his exile before
nightfall
.
His measures were taken accordingly. His
baggage-horses, under the charge of the younger
of the two negroes, were sent on with the band;
the other, an old and faithful slave of his father,
being retained as a useful appendage to a party
containing his kinswoman, from whom he, of
course, saw no reason to be separated. To Edith
herself, the delay was far from being disagreeable.
It promised a gay and cheerful gallop through the
forest, instead of the dull, plodding, funeral-like
march to which she had been day after day
monotonously
accustomed. She assented, therefore,
to the arrangement, and, like her kinsman, beheld,
in the fresh light of sun-rise, without a sigh,
without
even a single foreboding of evil, the departure
of the train of emigrants, with whom she had
journeyed in safety so many long and weary
leagues through the desert.
They set out in high spirits, after shaking hands
with their hosts, at the gates, and saluting them
with cheers, which they repeated in honour of
their young captain; and, in a few moments, the
whole train had vanished, as if swallowed up by
the dark forest.
CHAPTER VI.
Within
an hour after the emigrants had set
out, the sky, which had previously been clear and
radiant, began to be overcast with clouds,
dropping
occasional rains, which Roland scarcely
observed
with regret, their effect on the sultry
atmosphere
being highly agreeable and refreshing.
They continued thus to fall at intervals until nine
o'clock; when Roland, as he sat on the porch
debating
with Bruce the probabilities of their
continuance
,
was roused by a shout from the outer
village, and looking up, he beheld, to his great
delight
,
Richard Bruce, the second son of his host,
a lad of sixteen, ride into the enclosure, leading in
triumph his recovered charger.
Thar's the brute, strannger! said he, with
uncommon glee: he war too hard a hoss for
Ralph's riding; and, I reckon, if he had n't been,
you would n't have had him so easy, for he's a
peeler at run, trot, or gallop, he is, I tell you! It's
bad luck for Stackpole to be flung by man and
beast two days hand-running,first by Bloody
Nathan, then by a stolen crittur!
And whar
is
the brute, Stackpole? and what
have you done with him? demanded Bruce.
Thar, father, you're too hard for me, replied
the youth; but I'll tell you all I know on it.You
need n't look at his legs, captain, for they're all as
sound as hickory: the crittur's a bit worried with
8*
his morning's work; but that's nothing to speak
on.
The lad's story was soon told. The track of the
horse-thief had been followed through the woods;
and it was soon seen, from it's irregularity, that
he had made an unlucky selection of beasts, both
being so restive and rebellious, that, it was
obvious
,
he had found it no easy matter to urge
them along. A place was found where he
appeared
to have been thrown by the turbulent
Briareus, which he seemed afterwards to have
pursued, mounted on the pony, in the vain hope
of retaking the mettlesome charger, until
persuaded
of his inability, or afraid, from the
direction
in which the animal had fled, of being led
back again to the settlement. His track, after
abandoning the chase, was as plain as that left by
the war-horse, and was followed by the main body
of pursuers; while Richard and two or three others,
taking the latter, had the good fortune to find and
recover the animal as he was solacing himself,
after his morning adventures, in a grassy wood,
scarce two miles from the Station. What had
become
of Stackpole the lad knew not, but had no
doubt, as he added, with a knowing look, that
Lynch's boys would soon give a good account of
him; for Major Smalleye war as mad as a beaten
o'ar about the two-y'ar-old pony.
Well, said the father, I reckon the brute
will deserve all he may come by; and thar's no
use in mourning him. Thar's as good
Injun-fighters
as he, left in Kentucky, thar's the
comfort
;
and thar's no denying, men will be much
easier about their horses.
With this consoling assurance, in which Roland
saw implied the visitation of the deadliest
vengeance
on the head of the offender, Bruce
proceeded
to congratulate him on the recovery of
Brown Briareus, and to intimate his readiness,
after the animal had been allowed a little rest,
which it evidently needed, to marshal his band of
young men, and conduct him on his way after the
exiles. But fate willed that the friendly intention
should never be put into execution, and that the
young soldier should go forth on his pilgrimage
unattended and unprotected.
Within the space of half an hour, the clouds,
which seemed previously to have discharged all
their moisture, collected into a dense canopy,
darkening the whole heaven, and rumbling with
thunder, that became every moment louder and
heavier. Then came gusts of wind, groaning
through the forest, rattling among the dead limbs
of the girdled trees, and whistling over the
palisades
of the fort. These were succeeded by
louder peals of thunder, and vivid flashes of
lightning
,
which continued and increased, until the
tempest, for such it was, burst in fury, discharging
deluges of rain, that fell with unintermitting
violence
until an hour or more after mid-day.
This was a circumstance, which, as it
necessarily
deferred the moment of his setting out, caused
Forrester a little uneasiness; but he soon came to
believe he had reason to congratulate himself on
its occurrence, since it was scarce possible the
band would continue their journey in such a storm;
and, indeed, Bruce was of opinion that the day's
march would be ended on the banks of the river,
one of the principal forks of the Salt,but little
more than ten miles from his Station; where, if the
exiles were wise, they would pitch their camp,
waiting
for the subsidence of the waters. This was a
point that Roland might be expected to reach in a
ride of three or four hours at most; which
consideration
not only satisfied him under the delay,
but almost made him resolve to defer his
setting-out
until the following morning, that his
kinswoman
might have the advantage of sleeping a
second
time under the shelter of a roof, rather than
be compelled to exchange it for the chill and humid
forest.
It was while he was balancing this thought in
his mind, and watching with a gladdened eye the
first flash of sunshine, breaking through the parted
clouds, that a shout, louder than that which had
proclaimed the recovery of his steed, but of a
wild and mournful character, arose from the outer
village, and a horseman, covered with mud,
reeking
with rain, and reeling in the saddle with
fatigue
and exhaustion, rode into the fort, followed
by a crowd of men, women, and children, all
testifying
,
by their looks and exclamations, that he
was the bearer of alarming news. And such
indeed
he was, as was shown by the first words he
answered in reply to Bruce's demand what was
the matter?
There are a thousand Indians, he said,
Shawnees
,
Delawares, Wyandots, Miamies,all the
tribes of the North,laying siege to Bryant's
Station
,
and perhaps at this moment they are
burning
and murdering at Lexington. Men, Colonel
Bruce! send us all your men, without a moment's
delay; and send off for Logan, and his forces;
despatch
some one who can ride, for I can sit a
horse no longer.
Whar's Dick Bruce? cried the Kentuckian;
and the son answering, he continued, Mount the
roan Long-legs, you brute, and ride to St. Asaph's
in no time. Tell Cunnel Logan what you h'ar;
and add, that before he can draw girth, I shall be,
with every fighting-man in my fort, on the north
side of Kentucky. Ride, you brute, ride for your
life; and do you take car'
you
come along with
the Cunnel; for it's time you war trying your
hand at an Injun top-knot. Ride, you brute,
ride!
Wahwahwahwah! whooped the boy,
like a young Indian, flying to obey the order, and
exulting in the expectation of combat.
Sound horn, you Samuel Sharp! cried the
father. You, Ben Jones, and some more of you,
ride out and rouse the settlements; and, some of
you, hunt up Tom Bruce and the Regulators: it
war a pity they hanged Ralph Stackpole; for he
fights Injuns like a wolverine. Tell all them that
ar'n't ready to start, to follow at a hard gallop,
and join me at the ford of Kentucky; and them
that can't join me thar, let them follow to
Lexington
;
and them that don't find me thar, let them
follow to Bryant's, or to any-whar whar thar's
Injuns
!
Hurrah, you brutes! whar's your guns and
your horses? your knives and your tomahawks?
If thar's a thousand Injuns, or the half of 'em,
thar's meat for all of you. Whar's Ikey Jones,
the fifer? Let's have Yankee-Doodle and the
Rogue's March; for, by the etarnal Old Scratch,
all them white-men that ar'n't a-horse-back in
twenty-five minutes, are rogues worse than red
Injuns!Hurrah for Kentucky!
The spirit of the worthy officer of militia infused
animation into all bosoms; and, in an instant, the
settlement, late so peaceful, resounded with the
hum and uproar of warlike preparation. Horses
were caught and saddled, rifles pulled from their
perches, knives sharpened, ammunition-pouches and
provender-bags filled, and every other step taken
necessary to the simple equipment of a border
army, called to action in an emergency so sudden
and urgent.
In the meanwhile, the intelligence was not
without
its effects on Roland Forrester, who, seeing
himself so unexpectedly deprived of the promised
escort,for he could scarce think, under such
circumstances, of withdrawing a single man from
the force called to a duty so important,
perceived
the necessity of employing his own
resources
to effect escape from a position which he
now felt to be embarrassing. He regretted, for
the first time, his separation from the band of
emigrants
,
and became doubly anxious to follow
them: for, if it were true that so large a force of
Indians was really in the District, there was every
reason to suppose they would, according to their
known system of warfare, divide into small parties,
and scatter over the whole country, infesting
every road and path; and he knew not how soon
some of them might be found following on the
beels of the messenger. He took advantage of
the first symptom of returning serenity on the
part of his host, to acquaint him with his
resolution
to set out immediately, the rains having
ceased, and the clouds broken up and almost
vanished.
Lord, captain, said the Kentuckian, I
hoped you would have been for taking a brush
with us; and it war my idea to send a messenger
after your party, in hopes your men would join
us in the rusty. Whar will they have such
another
chance? A thousand Injuns ready cut and
dried for killing! Lord, what a fool I war for
not setting more store by that tale of Nathan
Slaughter's! I never knowed the brute to lie in
such a case; for, as he is always ramping about
the woods, he's as good as a paid scout.
Howsomever
,
the crittur did'nt speak on his own
knowledge; and that infarnal Stackpole was just
ripe from the North side. But, I say, captain, if
your men will fight, just tote 'em back, stow away
the women behind the logs here, and march your
guns after me; and, if thar's half the number of
red niggurs they speak of, to be found, you shall
see an affa'r of a skrimmage that will be good for
your wholesome,you will, by the etarnal!
If the men are of that mind, said Roland,
gallantly, I am not the one to balk them. I will,
at least, see whither their inclinations tend; and
that the matter may the sooner be decided, I will
set out without delay.
And we who war to escort you, captain,
said the Kentuckian, with some embarrassment:
you're a soldier, captain, and you see the case!
I do; I have no desire to weaken your force;
and, I trust, no protection is needed.
Not an iota; the road is as safe as the furrow
of a Virginnee corn-field,at least till you strike
the lower Forks; and
thar
I've heard of no
rampaging
since last summer: I'll indamnify you
against all loss and mischief,I will, if it war on
my salvation!
If you could but spare me a single guide,
said Forrester.
Whar's the use, captain? The road is as
broad and cl'ar as a turnpike in the Old
Dominion
;
it leads you, chock up, right on the Upper
Ford, whar thar's safe passage at any moment:
but, I reckon, the rains will make it look a little
wrathy a while, and so fetch your people to a
stand-still. But it's a pot soon full and soon
empty, and it will be low enough in the morning.
The Upper Ford? said Roland, his dream,
for so he esteemed it, recurring to his mind: is
there then a Lower Ford?
Ay, replied Bruce; but thar's no passing it
in the freshes; and besides the place has a bad
name. It war thar old John Ashburn pitched his
Station, in '78; but the savages made murdering
work of him, taking every scalp in the company;
and so it makes one sad-like to pass thar, and the
more partickelarly that its' all natteral fine ground
for an ambush. You'll see the road, when you're
six mile deep in the forest, turning off to the right,
under a shivered beech-tree. You are then four
miles from the river, or tharabouts, and just
that distance, I reckon, from your company. No,
captain, he repeated, the road is wide and open,
and a guide war mere lumber on your hands.
This was a point, however, on which the young
soldier, doubly solicitous on his kinswoman's
account
,
to avoid mistake, was not so easily
satisfied
:
seeing which, the Kentuckian yielded to his
importunity,perhaps somewhat ashamed of
suffering
his guests to depart entirely alone,and
began to cast about him for some suitable person
who could be prevailed upon to exchange the
privilege
of fighting Indians for the inglorious duty
of conducting wayfarers through the forest. This
was no easy task, and it was not until he assumed
his military authority, as commander of all the
enrolled militia-men in his district, empowered to
make such disposition of his forces as he thought
fit, that he succeeded in compelling the service of
one of his reluctant followers, under whose
guidance
Roland and his little party soon after set
out. Their farewells were briefly said, the urgent
nature of his duties leaving the hospitable Bruce
little opportunity for superfluous speech. He
followed
them, however, to the bottom of the hill,
grasped Roland by the hand; and doing the same
thing by Edith, as if his conscience smote him for
dismissing her with so little ceremony and such
insufficient attendance, he swore that if any evil
happened to her on the road, he would rest neither
night nor day until he had repaired it, or lost his
scalp in the effort.
With this characteristic and somewhat ominous
farewell, he took his leave; and the cousins, with
their guide and faithful servant, spurred onwards
at a brisk pace, until the open fields of the
settlement
were exchanged for the deep and gloomy
woodlands.
VOL. I.9
CHAPTER VII.
The
sun shone out clearly and brilliantly, and
the tree-tops, from which the winds had already
shaken the rain, rustled freshly to the more
moderate
breezes that had succeeded them; and
Roland, animated by the change, by the brisk
pace at which he was riding, and by the hope of
soon overtaking his fellow-exiles, met the joyous
looks of his kinswoman with a countenance no
longer disturbed by care.
And yet there was a solemnity in the scene
around them that might have called for other and
more sombre feelings. The forest into which
they had plunged, was of the grand and gloomy
character, which the fortility of the soil, and the
absence of the axe for a thousand years, imprint
on the western woodlands, especially in the
vicinity
of rivers. Oaks, elms, and walnuts,
tulip-trees
and beeches, with other monarchs of the
wilderness, lifted their trunks like so many pillars,
green with mosses and ivies, and swung their
majestic
arms, tufted with mistletoe, far over head,
supporting a canopy,a series of domes and arches
without end,that had for ages overshadowed the
soil. Their roots, often concealed by a billowy
undergrowth of shrubs and bushes, oftener by
brakes of the gigantic and evergreen cane,
forming
fences as singular as they were, for the most
part, impenetrable, were yet at times visible,
where open glades stretched through the woods,
broken only by buttressed trunks, and by the
stems of colossal vines, hanging from the boughs
like cables, or the arms of an Oriental banyan;
while their luxuriant tops rolled in union with the
leafy roofs that supported them. The vague and
shadowy prospects opened by these occasional
glades, stirred the imagination and produced a
feeling of solitude in the mind, greater perhaps
than would have been felt, had the view been
continually
bounded by a green wall of canes.
The road, if such it could be called, through
this noble forest was, like that the emigrants had
so long pursued through the wilderness, a mere
path, designated, where the wood was open, by
blazes, or axe-marks on the trees; and, where the
undergrowth was dense, a narrow track cut
through the canes and shrubs, scarce sufficient in
many places to allow the passage of two
horsemen
abreast; though when, as was frequently the
case, it followed the ancient routes of the bisons
to fords and salt-licks, it presented, as Bruce had
described, a wide and commodious highway,
practicable
even to wheeled carriages.
The gait of the little party over this road was
at first rapid and cheery enough; but by and by,
having penetrated deeper into the wood, where
breezes and sunbeams were alike unknown, they
found their progress impeded by a thousand pools
and sloughs, the consequences of the storm, that
stretched from brake to brake. These
interruptions
promised to make the evening journey longer
than Roland had anticipated; but he caught, at
intervals, the fresh foot-prints of his comrades in
the soil where it was not exposed to the rains, and
reflected with pleasure, that, travelling even at the
slowest pace, he must reach the ford where he
expected to find them encamped, long before dark.
He felt therefore no uneasiness at the delay; nor
did he think any of those obstacles to rapid
progress
a cause for regret that gave him the better
opportunity to interchange ideas with his fair
kinswoman
.
His only concern arose from the conduct of his
guide, a rough, dark-visaged man, who had
betrayed
,
from the first moment of starting, a sullen
countenance, indicative of his disinclination to
the duty assigned him; which feeling evidently
grew stronger the further he advanced,
notwithstanding
sundry efforts Forrester made to bring
him into a better humour. He displayed no
desire
to enter into conversation with the soldier,
replying to such questions as were directed at him
with a brevity little short of rudeness; and his
smothered exclamations of impatience,
whenever
his delicate followers slackened their pace at
a bog or gully, which he had himself dashed
through with a manly contempt of mud and
mire, somewhat stirred the choler of the young
captain.
They had perhaps followed him a distance of
four miles into the forest, when the occurrence
of a wider and deeper pool than ordinary
producing
a corresponding delay on the part of
Roland
,
who was somewhat averse to plunging with
Edith up to the saddle-girths in mire, drew from
him a very unmannerly, though not the less hearty
execration on the delicacy of `them thar persons
who,' as he expressed it, `stumped at a mud-hole
as skearily as if every tadpole in it war a
screeching
Injun.'
Of this explosion of ill-temper Roland took no
notice, until he had, with the assistance of
Emperor
,
the negro, affected a safe passage for Edith
over the puddle; in the course of which he had
leisure to observe that the path now struck into a
wide buffalo-street, that swept away through a
wilderness of wood and cane-brake, in nearly a
straight line, for a considerable distance. He
observed
also, that the road looked drier and less
broken than usual; his satisfaction at which had
the good effect of materially abating the rage into
which he had been thrown by the uncivil bearing
of the guide. Nevertheless, he had no sooner
brought his kinswoman safely to land, than,
leaving
her in the charge of Emperor, he galloped up
to the side of his conductor, and gave vent to his
indignation in the following pithy query:
My friend, said he, will you have the
goodness
to inform me whether you have ever lived in
a land where courtesy to strangers, and kindness
and respect to women, are ranked among the
virtues of manhood?
The man replied only by a fierce and angry
stare; and plying the ribs of his horse with his
heels, he dashed onwards. But Roland kept at
his side, not doubting that a little more wholesome
reproof would be of profit to the man, as well as
advantageous to his own interests.
I ask that question, he continued, because a
man from such a land, seeing strangers, and one
of them a female, struggling in a bog, would,
instead
of standing upon dry land, making
disrespectful
remarks, have done his best to help them
through it.
Strannger; said the man, drawing up his
horse, and looking, notwithstanding his anger, as
if he felt the rebuke to be in a measure just, I
am neither hog nor dog, Injun nor outlandish
niggur
,
but a man,a man, strannger! outside and
inside, in flesh, blood, and spirit, jest as my Maker
made me: though thar may be something of the
9*
scale-bark and parsimmon about me, I'll not deny;
for I've heer'd on it before. I axes the lady's
pardon
,
if I've offended; and thar's the eend on't.
The end of it, said Forrester, will be much
more satisfactory, if you give no further occasion
for complaint. But now, he continued, Edith
drawing nigh, let us ride on, and as fast as you
like; for the road seems both open and good.
Strannger, said the guide, without budging
an inch, you have axed me a question; and
according
to the fa'r rule of the woods, it's my
right to ax you another.
Very well, said Roland, assenting to the
justice
of the rule: ask it, and be brief.
What you war saying of the road is true; thar
it goes, wide, open, cl'ar and straight, with as good
a fence on both sides of it to keep in stragglers,
as war ever made of ash, oak, or chestnut rails,
though it's nothing but a natteral bank of
cane-brake
:
and so it runs, jest as cl'ar and wide, all
the way to the river.
I am glad to hear it, was the soldier's
reply
:
but now for your question?
Hy'ar it is, said the man, flinging out his hand
with angry energy: I wants to ax of you, as a
sodger, for I've heer'd you're of the reggelar
sarvice
,
whether it's a wiser and more christian
affa'r, when thar's Injuns in the land a murdering
of your neighbour's wives and children, and all
the settlements in a screech and a cry, to send an
able-bodied man to fight them; or to tote him off,
a day's journey thar and back ag'in, to track a
road that a blind man on a blind horse could
travel, without axing questions of any body?
Thar's my question, he added, somewhat
vehemently
;
and now let's have a sodger's
answer
!
My good friend, said Roland, a little
offended
,
and yet more embarrassed, by the
interrogatory
,
none can tell better than yourself how much,
or how little occasion I may have for a guide.
Your question, therefore, I leave you to answer
yourself. If you think your duty calls you to
abandon a woman in the wild woods to such
guidance
as one wholly unacquainted with them can
give, you can depart as soon as you think fit; for
I cannot
The guide gave him no time to finish the
sentence
.
You're right, strannger, he cried;
that is your road, as plain as the way up a
hickory, b'aring to a camp of old friends and
acquaintances
,and
hy'ar is mine, running right slap
among fighting Injuns!
And with that he turned his horse's head, and
flourishing his right hand, armed with the
ever-constant
rifle, above his own, and uttering a whoop
expressive of the wild pleasure he felt at being
released
from his ignoble duty, he dashed across the
pool, and galloped in a moment out of sight,
leaving
Roland and his party confounded at the
desertion
.
`An outlandish niggur'! muttered old
Emperor
,
on whom this expression of the guide had
produced no very favourable effect; guess the
gemman white-man is a niggur himself, and a
rogue, and a potater, or whatsomever you call
'em! Leab a lady and a gemman lost in the
woods, and neither take 'em on nor take 'em back!
lor-a-massy!
To this half-soliloquized expression of
indignation
the soldier felt inclined to add a few bitter
invectives of his own; but Edith treating the
matter
lightly, and affecting to be better pleased at the
rude man's absence than she had been with his
company, he abated his own wrath, and
acknowledged
that the desertion afforded the best proof
of the safety of the road; since he could not
believe
that the fellow, with all his roughness and
inhumanity, would have been so base as to leave
them, while really surrounded by difficulties. He
remembered enough of Bruce's description of the
road, which he had taken care should be minute
and exact, to feel persuaded that the principal
obstructions
were now over, and that, as the guide
had said, there was no possibility of wandering
from the path. They had already travelled nearly
half the distance to the river, and to accomplish
the remainder, they had yet four hours of
day-light
.
He saw no reason why they should not
proceed alone, trusting to their good fate for a
fortunate issue to the enterprise. To return to the
fort would be only to separate themselves further
from their friends, without insuring them a better
guide, or, indeed, any guide at all, since it was
highly probable they would find it only occupied
by women and children. In a word, he satisfied
himself that nothing remained for him but to
continue
his journey, and trust to his own sagacity to
end it to advantage.
He set out accordingly, followed by Edith and
Emperor, the latter bringing up the rear in true
military style, and handling his rifle, as if almost
desirous of finding an opportunity to use it in the
service of his young mistress.
In this manner, they travelled onwards with but
little interruption for more than a mile; and
Roland
was beginning anxiously to look for the path
that led to the Lower Ford, when Emperor galloped
to the van and brought the party to a halt by
reporting
that he heard the sound of hoofs following
at a distance behind.
Perhaps,perhaps, said Edith, while the
gleam of her eye, shining with sudden pleasure,
indicated how little real satisfaction she had felt
at the desertion of their conductor,perhaps it
is the sour fellow, the guide, coming back,
ashamed
of his misconduct.
We will soon see, said Roland, turning his
horse to reconnoitre; a proceeding that was,
however
,
rendered unnecessary by the hurried speed
of the comer, who, dashing suddenly round a bend
in the road, disclosed to his wondering eyes, not
the tall frame and sullen aspect of the guide, but
the lighter figure and fairer visage of the girl,
Telie
Doe. She was evidently arrayed for travel,
having donned her best attire of blue cloth, with
a little cap of the same colour on her head, under
which her countenance, beaming with exercise
and anxiety, looked, in both Roland's and Edith's
eyes, extremely pretty; much more so, indeed,
than either had deemed her to be; while, secured
behind the cushion, or pillion, on which she rode,
for not a jot of saddle had she,was a little
bundle containing such worldly comforts as were
necessary to one seriously bent upon a journey.
She was mounted upon a sprightly pony, which
she managed with more address and courage than
would have been augured from her former
timorous
demeanour; and it was plain that she had put
him to his mettle through the woods, with but
little
regard to the sloughs and puddles which had
so greatly embarrassed the fair Edith. Indeed, it
appeared, that the exercise which had infused
animation into her countenance had bestowed a
share also on her spirit; for having checked her
horse an instant, and looked a little abashed at the
sudden sight of the strangers, she recovered
herself
in a moment, and riding boldly up, she
proceeded
,
without waiting to be questioned, to explain
the cause of her appearance. She had met the
deserter, she said, returning to the Station, and
thinking it was not right the stranger lady should
be left without a guide in the woods, she had
ridden
after her to offer
her
services.
It was at least somewhat surprising, Roland
could not avoid saying, that the fellow should
have found you already equipt in the woods?
At this innuendo, Telie was somewhat
embarrassed
,
but more so, when, looking towards Edith,
as if to address her reply to her, she caught the
inquiring look of the latter, made still more
expressive
by the recollection which Edith retained
of the earnest entreaty Telie had made the
preceding
night, to be taken into her service.
I will not tell you a falsehood, ma'am, she
said at last, with a firm voice: I was not on the
road by chance: I came to follow you. I knew,
the man you had to guide you was unwilling to
go, and I thought he would leave you, as he has
done. And, besides, the road is not so clear as it
seems; it branches off to so many of the
salt-licks
,
and the tracks are so washed away by the
rains, that none but one that knows it can be sure
of keeping it long.
And how, inquired Edith, very pointedly,
for, in her heart, she suspected the little damsel
was determined to enter her service, whether she
would or not, and had actually run away from her
friends for the purpose,how, after you have
led us to our party, do you expect to return again
to your friends?
If you will let me go with you as far as
Jackson's
Station,(the settlement at which it was
originally determined the emigrants should pass
the night,) said the maiden, humbly, I will find
friends there who will take me home; and
perhaps
our own people will come for me,for they
are often visiting about among the Stations.
This declaration, made in a tone that convinced
Edith the girl had given over all hopes of being
received into her protection, unless she could
remove
opposition by the services she might render
on the way, pointed out also an easy mode of
getting
rid of her, when a separation should be
advisable
,
and thus removed the only objection she
felt to accept her proffered guidance. As for
Roland
,
however, he expressed much natural
reluctance
to drag a young and inexperienced
female
so far from her home, leaving her
afterwards
to return as she might. But he perceived
that her presence gave courage to his kinswoman;
he felt that her acquaintance with the path was
more to be relied upon than his own sagacity; and
he knew not, if he even rejected her offered
services
altogether, how he could with any grace
communicate the refusal, and leave her
abandoned
to her own discretion in the forest. He felt a
little inclined, at first, to wonder at the interest
she seemed to have taken in his cousin's welfare;
but, by and by, he reflected that perhaps, after all,
her motive lay in no better or deeper feeling than
a mere girlish desire to make her way to the
neighbouring Station, (twenty miles make but a
neighbourly distance in the wilderness,) to enjoy a
frolic among her gadding acquaintance. This
reflection
ended the struggle in his mind; and
turning
to her with a smiling countenance, he said,
If you are so sure of getting home, my pretty
maid, you may be as certain we will be glad of
your company and guidance. But let us delay no
longer.
The girl, starting at these words with alacrity,
switched her pony and darted to the head of the
little party, as if addressing herself to her duty in
a business-like way; and there she maintained her
position with great zeal, although Roland and
Edith endeavoured, for kindness' sake, to make
her sensible they desired her to ride with them as
a companion, and not at a distance like a pioneer.
The faster they spurred, however, the more
zealonsly
she plied her switch, and her pony being
both spirited and fresh, while their own horses
were both not a little the worse for their long
journey, she managed to keep in front,
maintaining
a gait that promised in a short time to bring
them to the banks of the river.
They had ridden perhaps a mile in this
manner
,
when a sudden opening in the cane-brake on
the right hand, at a place where stood a
beech-tree
,
riven by a thunderbolt in former years, but
still spreading its shattered ruins in the air,
convinced
Roland that he had at last reached the
road to the Lower Ford, which Bruce had so
strictly
cautioned him to avoid. What, therefore, was
his surprise, when Telie, having reached the tree,
turned at once into the by-road, leaving the direct
path which they had so long pursued, and which
still swept away before them, as spacious and
uninterrupted
,
save by occasional pools, as ever.
You are wrong, he cried, checking his steed.
This is the road, sir, said the girl, though in
some trepidation.
By no means, said Forrester: that path
leads to the Lower Ford: here is the shivered
beech, which the Colonel described to me.
Yes, sir, said Telie, hurriedly; it is the
mark: they call it the Crooked Finger-post.
And a crooked road it is like to lead us, if we
follow it, said Roland. It leads to the Lower
Ford, and is not therefore
our
road. I remember
the Colonel's direction.
Yes, sir, said Telie, anxiously,to take the
beech on the right shoulder, and then down, four
miles, to the water.
Precisely so, said the soldier; with only
this difference, (for, go which way we will, the
tree being on the right side of each path, we must
still keep it on the right shoulder,) that the road to
the Upper Ford, which I am now travelling, is the
one for our purposes. Of this I am confident.
And yet, Roland, said Edith, somewhat
alarmed at this difference of opinion, where
unanimity
was so much more desirable, the young
woman should know best.
Yes! cried Telie, eagerly: I have lived
here almost seven years, and been across the
river more than as many times. This is the
shortest and safest way.
It may be both the shortest and safest, said
Forrester, whose respect for the girl's knowledge
of the woods and ability to guide him through
them, began to be vastly diminished; but
this
is
the road Mr. Bruce described. Of this I am
positive
;
and to make the matter still more certain, if
need be, here are horse-tracks, fresh, numerous,
scarcely washed by the rain, and undoubtedly
made by our old companions; whereas
that
path
seems not to have been trodden for a
twelve-month
.
I will guide you right, faltered Telie, with
anxious voice.
My good girl, said the soldier, kindly, but
positively, you must allow me to doubt your
ability to do that,at least, on that path. Here is
our road; and we must follow it.
VOL. I.10
He resumed it, as he spoke, and Edith,
conquered
by his arguments which seemed decisive,
followed
him; but looking back, after having
proceeded
a few steps, she saw the baffled guide still
lingering on the rejected path, and wringing her
hands with grief and disappointment.
You will not remain behind us? said Edith,
riding back to her: You see, my cousin is
positive
:
you must surely be mistaken?
I am
not
mistaken, said the girl, earnestly;
and, oh, he will repent that ever he took his own
way through this forest.
How can that be? What cause have you to
say so?
I do not know, murmured the damsel, in
woful perplexity; but,but, sometimes, that road
is dangerous.
Sometimes all roads are so, said Edith, her
patience failing, when she found Telie could give
no better reason for her opposition. Let us
continue
:
my kinsman is waiting us, and we must lose
no more time by delay.
With these words, she again trotted forward,
and Telie, after hesitating a moment, thought fit
to follow.
But now the animation that had, a few moments
before, beamed forth in every look and gesture of
the maiden, gave place to dejection of spirits, and
even, as Edith thought, to alarm. She seemed as
anxious now to linger in the rear as she had been
before to preserve a bold position in front. Her
eyes wandered timorously from brake to tree, as
if in fear lest each should conceal a lurking
enemy; and often, as Edith looked back, she was
struck with the singularly mournful and distressed
expression of her countenance.
CHAPTER VIII.
These
symptoms of anxiety and alarm affected
Edith's own spirits; they did more, they shook
her faith in the justice of her kinsman's
conclusions
.
His arguments in relation to the road were,
indeed, unanswerable, and Telie had offered none
to weaken them. Yet why should she betray
such distress, if they were upon the right one?
and why, in fact, should she not be supposed to
know both the right and the wrong, since she had,
as she said, so frepuently travelled both?
These questions Edith could not refrain asking
of Roland, who professed himself unable to
answer
them, unless by supposing the girl had
become
confused, as he thought was not improbable,
or had, in reality, been so long absent from the
forest as to have forgotten its paths altogether;
which was likely enough, as she seemed a very
simple-minded, inexperienced creature. But why
need we, he said, trouble ourselves to find
reasons
for the poor girl's opposition? Here are the
tracks of our friends, broader and deeper than
ever: here they wind down into the hollow; and
there, you may see where they have floundered
through that vile pool, that is still turbid, where
they crossed it. A horrible quagmire! But
courage
,
my fair cousin: it is only such difficulties as
these which the road can lead us into.
Such were the expressions with which the young
soldier endeavoured to reassure his kinswoman's
courage, his own confidence remaining still
unmoved
;
although in secret he felt somewhat
surprised
at the coincidence between the girl's
recommendations
of the by-road and the injunctions
of his morning dream. But while pondering over
the wonder, he had arrived at the quagmire
alluded
to, through which the difficulties of
conducting
his cousin were sufficiently great to banish
other matters for a moment from his mind.
Having
crossed it at last in safety, he paused to give
such instructions or assistance as might be needed
by his two followers; when Edith, who had halted
at his side, suddenly laid her hand on his arm, and
exclaimed, with a visage of terror,Hark,
Roland
!
do you hear? What is that?
Heard him, massa! ejaculated Emperor from
the middle of the bog, with voice still more
quavering
than the maiden's, and lips rapidly changing
from Spanish-brown to clayey-yellow; heard
him, massa! Reckon it's an Injun! lorra-massy!
Peace, fool, cried Forrester, bending his
looks from the alarmed countenance of his
kinswoman
to the quarter whence had proceeded the
sound which had so suddenly struck terror into
her bosom.
Hark, Roland! it rises again! she exclaimed;
and Roland now distinctly heard a sound in the
depth of the forest to the right hand, as of the
yell of a human being, but at a great distance off.
At the place which they had reached, the canes
and undergrowth of other kinds had disappeared,
and a wide glade, stretching over hill and hollow,
swept away from both sides of the road further
than the eye could see. The trees, standing wider
apart than usual, were, if possible, of a more
majestic
stature; their wide and massive tops were
so thickly interlaced, that not a single sunbeam
found its way among the gloomy arcades below.
A wilder, more solitary, and more awe-inspiring
spot Roland had not before seen; and it was
peculiarly
fitted to add double effect to sights and
sounds of a melancholy or fearful character.
Accordingly
,
when the cry was repeated, as it soon
was, though at the same distance as before, it
came echoing among the hollow arches of the
woods with a wild and almost unearthly cadence,
the utterance, as it seemed, of mortal agony and
despair, that breathed a secret horror through the
breasts of all.
It is the Jibbenainosay! muttered the
shivering
Telie: these are the woods he used to range
in most; and they say he screams after his prey!
It is not too late:let us go back!
An Injun, massa! said Emperor, stuttering
with fright, and yet proceeding both to handle his
arms and to give encouragement to his young
mistress, which his age and privileged character,
as well as the urgency of the occasion, entitled
him to do: don't be afraid, missie Edie; nebber
mind;ole Emperor will fight and die for missie,
old massa John's daughter!
Hist! said Roland, as another scream rose on
the air, louder and more thrilling than before.
It is the cry of a human being! said Edith,
of a man in distress!
It is, indeed, replied the soldier,of a man
in great peril, or suffering. Remain here on the
road; and if any thingNay, if you will follow
me, it may be better; but let it be at a distance.
If any thing happens to me, set spurs to your
horses:Telie here can at least lead you back to
the fort.
With these words, and without waiting to hear
the remonstrances, or remove the terrors of his
10*
companions, the young man turned his horse into
the wood, and guided by the cries, which were
almost incessant, soon found himself in the
vicinity
of the place from which they proceeded. It
was a thick grove of beeches of the colossal
growth of the west, their stems as tall and straight
as the pines of the Alleghanies, and their boughs,
arched and pendulous like those of the elm,
almost
sweeping the earth below, over which they
cast shadows so dark that scarce any thing was
visible beneath them, save their hoary and
spectral
trunks.
As Roland, followed by his little party,
approached
this spot, the cries of the unknown, and
as yet unseen, sufferer, fearful even at a distance,
grew into the wildest shrieks of fear, mingled with
groans, howls, broken prayers and execrations,
and half inarticulate expressions, now of fondling
entreaty, now of fierce and frantic command, that
seemed addressed to a second person hard by.
A thousand strange and appalling conceits had
crept into Roland's mind, when he first heard the
cries. One while he almost fancied he had
stumbled
upon a gang of savages, who were torturing
a prisoner to death; another moment, he thought
the yells must proceed from some unlucky hunter,
perishing by inches in the grasp of a wild beast,
perhaps a bear or panther, with which animals it
was easy to believe the forest might abound.
With such horrible fancies oppressing his mind,
his surprise may be imagined, when, having
cocked his rifle and thrown open his holsters, to
be prepared for the worst, he rushed into the grove
and beheld a spectacle no more formidable than
was presented by a single individual,a man in a
shaggy blanket-coat,sitting on horseback under
one of the most venerable of the beeehes, and
uttering
those diabolical outcries that had alarmed
the party, for no imaginable purpose, as Roland
was at first inclined to suspect, unless for his own
private diversion.
A second look, however, convinced the soldier
that the wretched being had sufficient cause for
his clamour, being, in truth, in a situation almost
as dreadful as any Roland had imagined. His
arms were pinioned behind his back, and his neck
secured in a halter, (taken, as it appeared, from his
steed,) by which he was fastened to a large bough
immediately above his head, with nothing betwixt
him and death, save the horse on which he sat,
a young and terrified beast, at whose slightest
start or motion, he must have swung off and
perished
,
while he possessed no means of
restraining
the animal whatever, except such as lay in
strength of leg and virtue of voice.
In this terrible situation, it was plain, he had
remained for a considerable period, his clothes
and hair (for his hat had fallen to the ground)
being saturated with rain; while his face purple
with blood, his eyes swollen and protruding from
their orbits with a most ghastly look of agony and
fear, showed how often the uneasiness of his horse,
round whose body his legs were wrapped with the
convulsive energy of despair, had brought him to
the very verge of strangulation.
The yells of mortal terror, for such they had
been, with which he had so long filled the forest,
were changed to shrieks of rapture, as soon as he
beheld help approach in the person of the
astonished
soldier. Praised be the Etarnal! he
roared; cut me loose, strannger!Praised be the
Etarnal, and this here dumb beast!Cut me loose,
strannger, for the love of God!
Such was Roland's intention; for which purpose
he had already clapped his hand to his sabre, to
employ it in a service more humane than any it
had previously known; when, unfortunately, the
voice of the fellow did what his distorted
countenance
had failed to do, and revealed to Roland's
indignant eyes the author of all his present
difficulties
,
the thief of the pinfold, the robber of
Brown Briareus,in a word, the redoubtable
Captain Ralph Stackpole.
In a moment, Roland understood the mystery
which he had been before too excited to inquire
into. He remembered the hints of Bruce, and he
had learned enough of border customs and
principles
to perceive that the justice of the woods had
at last overtaken the horse-thief. The pursuing
party had captured him,taken him in the very
manner, while still in possession of the `
two-year-old
pony,' and at once adjuged him to the penalty
prescribed by the border code,tied his arms,
noosed him with the halter of the stolen horse,
and left him to swing, as soon as the animal should
be tired of supporting him. There was a kind of
dreadful poetical-justice in thus making the stolen
horse the thief's executioner: it gave the animal
himself an opportunity to wreak vengeance for all
wrongs received, and at the same time allowed his
captor the rare privilege of galloping on his back
into eternity.
Such was the mode of settling such offences
against the peace and dignity of the settlements;
such was the way in which Stackpole had been
reduced to his unenviable situation; and, that all
passers-by might take note that the execution had
not been done without authority, there was
painted
upon the smooth white bark of the tree, in
large black letters, traced by a finger well charged
with moistened gun-powder, the ominous name
Judge Lynch
,the Rhadamanthus of the forest,
whose decisions are yet respected in the land, and
whose authority sometimes bids fair to supersede
that of all erring human tribunals.
Thus tied up, his rifle, knife, and ammunition
laid under a tree hard by, that he might have the
satisfaction, if satisfaction it could be, of knowing
they were in safety, the executioners had left him
to his fate, and ridden away long since, to attend
to other important affairs of the colony.
The moment that Roland understood in whose
service he was drawing his sword, a change came
over the spirit of his thoughts and feelings, and he
returned it very composedly to its sheath,much
to the satisfaction of the negro, Emperor, who,
recognising the unfortunate Ralph at the same
instant
,
cried aloud, 'Top, massa! 't ar Captain
Stackpole, what stole Brown Briery! Reckon I'll
touch the pony on the rib, hah? Hanging too
good for him, white niggah t'ief, hah!
With that, the incensed negro made as if he
would have driven the pony from under the
luckless
Ralph; but was prevented by his master, who,
taking a second survey of the spectacle, motioned
to the horror-struck females to retire, and
prepared
himself to follow them.
'Tarnal death to you, captain! you won't
leave me? cried Ralph, in terror. Honour
bright! Help him that needs helpthat's the rule
for a Christian!
Villain! said Roland, sternly, I have no
help to give you. You are strung up according
to the laws of the settlements, with which I have
no desire to interfere. I am the last man you
should ask for pity.
I don't ax your pity, 'tarnal death to me,I
ax your
help
! roared Ralph: Cut me loose is
the word, and then sw'ar at me atter! I stole your
hoss thar:well, whar's the harm? Didn't he
fling me, and kick me, and bite me into the
bargain
,
the cursed savage? and ar'n't you got him
ag'in as good as ever? And besides, didn't that
etarnal old Bruce fob me off with a beast good
for nothing, and talk big to me besides? and warn't
that all fa'r provocation? And didn't you yourself
sw'ar ag'in shaking paws with me, and treat me
as if I war no gentleman? 'Tarnal death to me,
cut me loose, or I'll haunt you, when I'm a ghost,
I will, 'tarnal death to me!
Cut him down, Roland, for Heaven's sake!
said Edith, whom the surprise and terror of the
spectacle at first rendered speechless: you
surely
,no,
Roland, you surely can't mean to leave
him to perish?
Upon my soul, said the soldier, and we are
sorry to record a speech representing him in a
light so unamiable, I don't see what right I have
to release him; and I really have not the least
inclination
to do so. The rascal is the cause of all
our difficulties; and, if evil should happen us, he
will be the cause of that too. But for him, we
should be now safe with our party. And besides,
as I said before, he is hanged according to
Kentucky
law;a very good law, as far as it regards
horse-thieves, for whom hanging is too light a
punishment.
Nevertheless, release him,save the poor
wretch's life, reiterated Edith, to whom Stackpole,
perceiving in her his only friend, now addressed
the most piteous cries and supplications: the law
is murderous, its makers and executioners
barbarians
.
Save him, Roland I charge you, I entreat
you!
He owes his life to your intercession, said
the soldier; and drawing his sabre again, but with
no apparent good will, he divided the halter by
which Ralph was suspended, and the wretch was
free.
Cut the tug, the buffalo-tug! shouted the
culprit
,
thrusting his arms as far from his back as he
could, and displaying the thong of bison-skin, which
his struggles had almost buried in his flesh. A
single
touch of the steel, rewarded by such a yell of
transport as was never before heard in those
savage retreats, sufficed to sever the bond; and
Stackpole, leaping on the earth, began to testify
his joy in modes as novel as they were frantic.
His first act was to fling his arms round the neck
of his steed, which he hugged and kissed with the
most rapturous affection, doubtless in requital of
the docility it had shown when docility was so
necessary to its rider's life; his second, to leap
half a dozen times into the air, feeling his neck all
the time, and uttering the most singular and
vociferous
cries, as if to make double trial of the
condition
of his windpipe; his third, to bawl aloud,
directing the important question to the soldier,
How many days has it been since they hanged
me? War it to-day, or yesterday, or the day
before
?
or war it a whole year ago? for may I be
next hung to the horn of a buffalo, instead of the
limb of a beech-tree, if I did n't feel as if I had
been squeaking thar ever since the beginning of
creation! Cock-a-doodle-doo! him that ar'nt born
to be hanged, won't be hanged, no-how! Then
running to Edith, who sat watching his
proceedings
with silent amazement, he flung himself on his
knees, seized the hem of her riding-habit, which
he kissed with the fervour of an adorer,
exclaiming
with a vehement sincerity, that made the
whole action still more strangely ludicrous, Oh!
you splendiferous creatur'! you anngeliferous
anngel! here am I, Ralph Stackpole the
Screamer
,
that can whip all Kentucky, white, black,
mixed, and Injun; and I'm the man to go with
you to the ends of the 'arth, to fight, die, work,
beg, and steal hosses for you! I am, and you may
make a little dog of me; you may, or a niggur, or
a hoss, or a door-post, or a back-log, or a dinner,
'tarnal death to me, but you may
eat
me! I'm
the man to feel a favour, partickelarly when it
comes to helping me out of a halter; and so jist
say the word who I shall lick, to begin on; for
I'm your slave jist as much as that niggur, to go
with you, as I said afore, to the ends of the 'arth,
and the length of Kentucky over!
Away with you, you scoundrel and
jackanapes
,
said Roland, for to this ardent expression
of gratitude Edith was herself too much
frightened
to reply.
Strannger! cried the offended horse-thief,
you cut the tug, and you cut the halter; and so,
though you did it only on hard axing, I'd take as
many hard words of you as you can pick out of a
dictionary,I will, 'tarnal death to me. But as for
madam thar, the anngel, she saved my life, and I
go my death in her sarvice; and now's the time
to show sarvice, for thar's danger abroad in the
forest.
Danger! echoed Roland, his anxiety
banishing
the disgust with which he was so much
inclined
to regard the worthy horse-thief; what
makes you say that?
Strannger, replied Ralph, with a lengthened
visage and a gravity somewhat surprising for him,
I seed the Jibbenainosay! 'tarnal death to me,
but I seed him as plain as ever I seed old Salt! I
war a-hanging thar, and squeaking and cussing,
and talking soft nonsense to the pony, to keep him
out of his tantrums, when what should I see but a
great crittur' come tramping through the forest,
right off yander by the fallen oak, with a big b'ar
before him
Pish! said the soldier, what has this to do
with danger?
Beca'se and because, said Ralph, when you
see the Jibbenainosay, thar's always abbregynes
[7]
[7]
Abbregynes
aborigines.
in the cover. I never seed the crittur' before, but
I reckon it war he, for thar's nothing like him in
natur'. And so I'm for cutting out of the forest
jist on the track of a streak of lightning,now
h'yar, now thar, but on a full run without
stopping
.
And so, if anngeliferous madam is willing,
thump me round the 'arth with a crab-apple, if I
don't holp her out of the bushes, and do all her
fighting into the bargain,I will, 'tarnal death to
me!
You may go about your business, said
Roland
,
with as much sternness as contempt. We
will have none of your base company.
Whoop! whoo, whoo, whoo! don't rifle
To
rifle
,to
ruffle.
me,
for I'm danngerous! yelled the demibarbarian,
springing on his stolen horse, and riding up to
Edith: Say the word, marm, he cried; for I'll
fight for you, or run for you, take scalp or cut
stick, shake fist or show leg, any thing i nreason
or out of reason. Strannger thar's as brash
Brash
,rash, headstrong,
over-valiant.
as
a new hound in a b'ar fight, or a young hoss in a
corn-field, and no safe friend in a forest. Say the
word, marm,or if you think it ar'nt manners to
speak to a strannger, jist shake your little finger,
and I'll follow like a dog, and do you dog's
sarvice
.
VOL. I.11
Or if you don't like me, say the word, or
shake t'other finger, and 'tarnal death to me, but
I'll be off like an elk of the prairies!
You may go, said Edith, not at all solicitous
to retain a follower of Mr. Stackpole's
character
and conversation: we have no occasion
for your assistance.
Fawwell! said Ralph; and turning, and
giving
his pony a thump with his fist and a kick with
each heel, and uttering a shrill whoop, he darted
away through the forest, and was soon out of
sight.
CHAPTER IX.
The
course of Stackpole was through the
woods, in a direction immediately opposite to that
by which Roland had ridden to his assistance.
He is going to the Lower Ford, said Telie,
anxiously. It is not too late for us to follow
him. If there are Indians in the wood, it is the
only way to escape them!
And why should we believe there
are
Indians
in the wood? demanded Roland; because that
half-mad rogue, made still madder by his terrors,
saw something which his fancy converted into the
imaginary Nick of the Woods? You must give
me a better reason than that, my good Telie, if
you would have me desert the road.I have no
faith in your Jibbenainosays.
But a better reason than her disinclination to
travel it, and her fears lest, if Indians were
abroad, they would be found lying in ambush at
the upper and more frequented pass of the river,
the girl had none to give; and, in consequence,
Roland, (though secretly wondering at her
pertinacity
,
and still connecting it in thought with his
oft-remembered dream,) expressing some
impatience
at the delays they had already experienced,
led the way back to the buffalo-road, resolved to
prosecute it with vigour. But Fate had prepared
for him other and more serious obstructions.
He had scarce regained the path, before he
became
sensible, from the tracks freshly printed in
the damp earth, that a horseman, coming from the
very river towards which he was bending his
way, had passed by, whilst he was engaged in the
wood liberating the horse-thief. This was a
circumstance
that both pleased and annoyed him.
It was so far agreeable, as it seemed to offer the
best proof that the road was open, with none of
those dreadful savages about it, who had so long
haunted the brain of Telie Doe. But what chiefly
concerned the young soldier was the knowledge
that he had lost an opportunity of inquiring after
his friends, and ascertaining whether they had
really
pitched their camp on the banks of the river;
a circumstance which he now rather hoped than
dared to be certain of, the tempest not seeming
to have been so violent in that quarter, as, of a
necessity, to bring the company to a halt. If they
had
not
encamped in the expected place, but, on
the contrary, had continued their course to the
appointed Station, he saw nothing before him but
the gloomy prospect of concluding his journey
over an unknown road, after night-fall, or
returning
to the Station he had left, also by night; for
much time had been lost by the various delays,
and the day was now declining fast.
These considerations threw a damp over his
spirits, but taught him the necessity of activity;
and he was, accordingly, urging his little party
forward with such speed as he could, when there
was suddenly heard at a distance on the rear the
sound of fire-arms, as if five or six pieces were
discharged together, followed by cries not less
wild and alarming than those uttered by the
despairing
horse-thief.
These bringing the party to a stand, the quick
ears of the soldier detected the rattling of hoofs
on the road behind, and presently there came
rushing towards them with furious speed a
solitary
horseman, his head bare, his locks streaming
in the wind, and his whole appearance betraying
the extremity of confusion and terror; which was
the more remarkable, as he was well mounted,
and armed with the usual rifle, knife, and hatchet
of the back-woodsman. He looked as if flying
from pursuing foes, his eyes being cast backwards,
and that so eagerly, that he failed to notice the
party of wondering strangers drawn up before
him on the road, until saluted by a halloo from
Roland; at which he checked his steed, looking
for an instant ten times more confounded and
frightened than before.
You tarnation critturs! he at last bawled,
with the accents of one driven to desperation, if
there a'n't no dodging you, then there
a'n't
. Here's
for you, you everlasting varmintsdue your
darndest
!
With that, he clubbed his rifle, and advanced
towards the party in what seemed a paroxysm of
insane fury, brandishing the weapon and rolling
his eyes with a ferocity that could have only
arisen from his being in that happy frame of mind
which is properly termed frighted out of fear.
How, you villain! said Roland, in
amazement
,
do you take us for wild Indians?
What, by the holy hokey, and
a'n't
you?
cried the stranger, his rage giving way to the
most lively transports; Christian men! he
exclaimed
in admiration, and one of 'em a niggur,
and two of 'em wimming! oh hokey! You're
Capting Forrester, and I've heerd on you! Thought
there was nothing in the wood but Injuns, blast
their ugly picturs! and blast him, Sy Jones as
was, that brought me among em! And now I'm
talking of 'em, Capting, don't stop to ax questions,
but run,cut and run, Capting, for there's an
11 *
everlasting sight of 'em behind me!six of 'em,
Capting, or my name a'n't Pardon Dodge,six of
em,all except one, and
him
I shot, the blasted
crittur! for, you see, they followed me behind,
and they cut me off before; and there was no
dodging 'em,(Dodge's my name, and
dodging's
my natur',)without gitting lost in the
woods; and it was either losing myself or my
scalp; and so that riz my ebenezer, and I banged
the first of 'em all to smash,if I did'nt, then it
a'n't no matter!
What, in heaven's name, said Roland,
overcome
by the man's volubility and alarm together,
what means all this? Are there Indians
behind
us?
Five of 'em, and the dead feller,shocking
long-legged crittur he was; jumped out of a bush,
and seized me by the bridlehokey! how he
skeared me!Gun went off of her own accord, and
shot him into bits as small as fourpence-ha'pennies.
Then there was a squeaking and squalling, and
the hull of 'em let fly at me; and then I cut on the
back track, and they took and took atter; and, I
calculate, if we wait here a quarter of a minute
longer, they will be on us jist like devils and
roaring
lions.But where shall we run? You can't
gin us a hint how to make way through the woods?
Shocking bad woods to be lost in! Bad place
here for talking, Capting,right 'twixt two fires,
six Injuns behind (and one of 'em dead,) and an
almighty passel before,the Ford's full on 'em!
What! said Roland, did you pass the Ford?
and is not Colonel Johnson, with his emigrants,
there?
Not a man on 'em; saw 'em streaking through
the mud, half way to Jackson's. Everlasting
lying
critturs, them emigrants! told me there was
no Injuns on the road; when what should I do
but see a hull grist on 'em dodging among the
bushes at the river, to surround me, the tarnation
critturs. But I kinder had the start on 'em, and
I whipped and I cut, and I run, and I dodged.
And so says I, `I've beat you, you tarnation,
scalping varmints!' when up jumps that
long-legged
feller, and the five behind him; and, blast
'em, that riz my corruption. And I
In a word, said Roland, impatiently, and
with a stern accent, assumed perhaps to reassure
his kinswoman, whom the alarming
communications
of the stranger, uttered in an agony of terror
and haste, filled with an agitation which she could
not conceal, you have seen Indians, or you say
you have. If you tell the truth, there is no time
left for deliberation; if a falsehood
Why should we wait upon the road to
question
and wonder? said Telie Doe, with a
boldness
and firmness that at another moment would
have excited surprise; why should we wait here,
while the Indians may be approaching? The
forest
is open, and the Lower Ford is free.
If you can yet lead us thither, said Roland,
eagerly, all is not yet lost. We can neither
advance
nor return. On, maiden, for the love of
Heaven!
These hasty expressions revealed to Edith the
deep and serious light in which her kinsman
regarded
their present situation, though at first
seeking
to hide his anxiety under a veil of composure.
In fact, there was not an individual present, on
whom the fatal news of the vicinity of the
redman
had produced a more alarming impression
than on Roland. Young, brave, acquainted with
war, and accustomed to scenes of blood and peril,
it is not to be supposed that he entertained fear on
his own account; but the presence of one whom
he loved, and whom he would have rescued from
danger at any moment, at the sacrifice of his own
life thrice over, was enough to cause, and excuse,
a temporary fainting of spirit, and a desire to fly
the scene of peril, of which, under any other
circumstances, he would have been heartily
ashamed. The suddenness of the terrorfor up
to the present moment he had dreamed of no
difficulty
comprising danger, or of no danger
implying
the presence of savages in the forest,had
somewhat shocked his mind from its propriety,
and left him in a manner unfitted to exercise the
decision and energy so necessary to the welfare
of his feeble and well nigh helpless followers.
The vastness of his embarrassment, all disclosed at
once,his friends and fellow emigrants now far
away; the few miles which he had, to the last,
hoped separated him from them, converted into
leagues; Indian enemies at hand; advance and
retreat both alike cut off; and night approaching
fast, in which, without a guide, any attempt to
retreat
through the wild forest would be as likely to
secure his destruction as deliverance;these were
circumstances that crowded into his mind with
benumbing effect, engrossing his faculties, when
the most active use of them was essential to the
preservation of his party.
It was at this moment of weakness and
confusion
,
while uttering what was meant to throw
some little discredit over the story of Dodge, to
abate the terrors of Edith, that the words of Telie
Doe fell on his ears, bringing both aid and hope
to his embarrassed spirits.
She
, at least, was
acquainted
with the woods; she, at least, could
conduct
him, if not to the fortified Station he had
left, (and bitterly now did he regret having left it,)
to the neglected ford of the river, which her
former
attempts to lead him thither, and the memory
of his dream, caused him now to regard as a city
of refuge pointed out by destiny itself.
Yous hall have your way at last, fair Telie,
he said, with a laugh, but not of merriment: Fate
speaks for you; and whether I will or not, we
must to the Lower Ford.
You will never repent it, said the girl, the
bright looks which she had worn for the few
moments
she was permitted to controul the motions
of the party, returning to her visage, and seeming
to emanate from a rejoicing spirit;they will
not think of waylaying us at the Lower Ford!
With that, she darted into the wood, and,
followed
by the others, including the new-comer,
Dodge, was soon at a considerable distance from
the road.
Singular, said Roland to Edith, at whose
rein he now rode, endeavouring to remove her
terrors, which, though she uttered no words, were
manifestly overpowering,singular that the girl
should look so glad and fearless, while we are, I
believe, all horribly frightened. It is, however, a
good omen. When one so timorous as she casts
aside fear, there is little reason for others to be
frighted.
I hope,I hope so, murmured Edith. But
but I have had my omens, Roland, and they
were evil ones. I dreamedYou smile at
me!
I do, said the soldier, and not more at your
joyless tones, my fair cousin, than at the
coincidence
of our thoughts.
I
dreamed (for I also
have had my visions,) last night, that some one
came to me and whispered in my ear `to cross
the river at the Lower Ford,' the Upper being
dangerous.' Verily, I shall hereafter treat my
dreams with respect. I suppose,I hope, were it
only to prove we have a good angel in common,
that you dreamed the same thing?
No,it was not that, said Edith, with a
sad and anxious countenance. It was a dream
that has always been followed by evil. I dreamed
. But it will offend you, cousin?
What! said Roland, a dream? You
dreamed
perhaps that I forgot both wisdom and
affection
,
when, for the sake of this worthless beast,
Briareus, I drew you into difficulty and peril?
No, no, said Edith, earnestly, and then added
in a low voice, I dreamed of Richard Braxley!
Curse him! muttered the youth, with tones
of bitter passion: it is to him we owe all that
now afflicts us,poverty and exile, our distresses
and difficulties, our fears and our dangers. For
a wooer, he added, with a smile of equal
bitterness
,
methinks he has fallen on but a rough way
of proving his regard. But you dreamed of him.
Well, what was it? He came to you, with the
look of a beaten dog, fawned at your feet, and
displaying that infernal will, `Marry me,' quoth
he, `fair maid, and I will be a greater rascal than
before,I will burn this will, and consent to enjoy
Roland Forrester's lands and houses in right of
my wife, instead of claiming them in trust for an
heir no longer in the land of the living.' Cur!
and but for you, Edith, I would have repaid his
insolence as it deserved. But you ever intercede
for your worst enemies. There is that
confounded
Stackpole, now: I vow to heaven, I am sorry
I cut the rascal down!But you dreamed of
Braxley! What said the villain?
He said, replied Edith, who had listened
mournfully, but in silence, to the young man's
hasty expressions, like one who was too well
acquainted
with the impetuosity of his temper, to
think of opposing him in his angry moments, or
perhaps because her spirits were too much
subdued
by her fears to allow her to play the
monitress
,He
said, and frowningly, too, that `soft
words were with him the prelude to hard
resolutions
,
and that where he could not win as the
turtle
,
he could take his prey like a vulture;'or
some such words of anger. Now, Roland, I have
twice before dreamed of this man, and on each
occasion a heavy calamity ensued, and that on
the following day. I dreamed of him the night
before our uncle died. I dreamed a second time,
and the next day he produced and recorded the
will that robbed us of our inheritance. I dreamed
of him again last night; and what evil is now
hovering over us, I know not, but,it is foolish
of me to say so,yet my fears tell me it will be
something dreadful.
Your fears, I hope, will deceive you, said
Roland, smiling in spite of himself at this little
display of weakness on the part of Edith. I
have much confidence in this girl, Telie, though I
can scarce tell why. A free road and a round
gallop will carry us to our journey's end by
night-fall
;
and, at the worst, we shall have bright
star-light
to light us on. Be comforted, my cousin. I
begin heartily to suspect yon cowardly Dodge, or
Dodger, or whatever he calls himself, has been
imposed upon by his fears, and that he has
actually
seen no Indians at all. The springing up
of a bush from under his horse's feet, and the
starting away of a dozen frighted rabbits, might
easily explain his conceit of the long-legged
Indian
,
and his five murderous accomplices; and
as for the savages seen in ambush at the Ford,
the shaking of the cane-brake by the breeze, or by
some skulking bear, would as readily account for
them. The idea of his being allowed to pass a
crew of Indians in their lair, without being
pursued
,
or even fired on, is quite preposterous.
These ideas, perhaps devised to dispel his
kinswoman's
fears, were scarce uttered before they
appeared highly reasonable to the inventor
himself
;
and he straightway rode to Dodge's side,
and began to question him more closely than he
had before had leisure to do, in relation to those
wondrous adventures, the recounting of which
had produced so serious a change in the
destination
of the party. All his efforts, however, to
obtain
satisfactory confirmation of his suspicion were
unavailing. The man, now in a great measure
relieved of his terrors, repeated his story with a
thousand details, which convinced Roland that it
was, in its chief features, correct. That he had
actually been attacked, or fired upon by some
persons
,
Roland could not doubt, having heard the
shots himself. As to the ambush at the Ford, all
he could say was, that he had actually seen
several
Indians,he knew not the number,stealing
through the wood in the direction opposite the
river, as if on the outlook for some expected
party
,Captain
Forrester's, he supposed, of which
he had heard among the emigrants; and that this
giving him the advantage of the first discovery,
he had darted ahead with all his speed, until
arrested at an unexpected moment by the six
warriors, whose guns and voices had been heard
by the party.
Besides communicating all the information
which he possessed on these points, he proceeded
without waiting to be asked, to give an account
of his own history; and a very lamentable one it
was. He was from the Down-East country, a
representative of the Bay State, from which he
had been seduced by the arguments of his old
friend Josiah Jones, to go `a pedlering' with the
latter to the new settlements in the West; where
the situation of the colonists, so far removed from
all markets, promised uncommon advantages to
the adventurous trader. These had been in a
measure realized on the upper Ohio; but the
prospect
of superior gains in Kentucky had tempted
the two friends to extend their speculations
further
;
and in an evil hour they embarked their
assorted notions and their own bodies in a
flatboat
on the Ohio; in the descent of which it was
their fortune to be stripped of every thing, after
enduring risks without number and daily attacks
from Indians lying in wait on the banks of the
river; which misadventures had terminated in the
capture of their boat, and the death of Josiah, the
unlucky projector of the expedition, Pardon
himself
barely escaping with his life. These
calamities
were the more distasteful to the worthy
Dodge, whose inclinations were of no warlike
cast, and whose courage never rose to the
fighting
point, as he freely professed, until goaded into
action by sheer desperation. He had `got enough,'
as he said, `of the everlasting Injuns, and of
Kentucky
,
where there was such a shocking deal of
'em, that a peaceable trader's scalp was in no
more security than a rambling scout's;' and,
cursing
his bad luck and the memory of the friend
who had cajoled him into ruin, difficulty, and
constant
danger, his sole desire was now to return to
the safer lands of the East, which he expected to
effect most advantageously by advancing to some
of the South-eastern stations, and throwing
himself
in the way of the first band of militia, whose
VOL. I.12
tour of duty in the District was completed, and who
should be about to return to their native State.
He had got enough of the Ohio, as well as the
Indians; the wilderness-road possessed fewer
terrors
,
and, therefore, appeared to his imagination
the more eligible route of escape.
CHAPTER X.
Dodge's
story, which was not without its
interest
to Roland, though the rapidity of their
progress
through the woods, and the constant
necessity
of being on the alert, kept him a somewhat
inattentive listener, was brought to an abrupt close
by the motions of Telie Doe, who, having guided
the party for several miles with great confidence,
began at last to hesitate, and betray symptoms of
doubt and embarrassment, that attracted the
soldier's
attention. There seemed some cause for
hesitation: the glades, at first broad and open,
through which they had made their way, were
becoming smaller and more frequently interrupted
by copses; the wood grew denser and darker; the
surface of the ground became broken by rugged
ascents and swampy hollows, the one encumbered
by stones and mouldering trunks of trees, the
other converted by the rains into lakes and pools,
through which it was difficult to find a path;
whilst the constant turning and winding to right
and left, to avoid such obstacles, made it a still
greater task to preserve the line of direction which
Telie had intimated was the proper one to pursue.
`Was it possible,' he asked of himself, `the girl
could be at fault?' The answer to this question,
when addressed to Telie herself, confirmed his
fears. She was perplexed, she was frightened;
she had been long expecting to strike the
neglected
road, with which she professed to be so well
acquainted, and, sure she was, they had ridden far
enough to find it. But the hills and swamps had
confused her; she was afraid to proceed,she
knew not where she was.
This announcement filled the young soldier's
mind with alarm; for upon Telie's knowledge of
the woods he had placed his best reliance,
conscious
that his own experience in such matters
was as little to be depended on as that of any of
his companions. Yet it was necessary he should
now assume the lead himself, and do his best to
rescue the party from its difficulties; and this,
after a little reflection, he thought he could scarce
fail in effecting. The portion of the forest through
which he was rambling was a kind of triangle,
marked by the two roads on the east, with its base
bounded by the long looked for river; and one of
these boundaries he must strike, proceed in
whatsoever
direction he would. If he persevered in the
course he had followed so long, he must of
necessity
find himself, sooner or later, in the path
which Telie had failed to discover, and failed, as
he supposed, in consequence of wandering away
to the west, so as to keep it constantly on the right
hand, instead of in front. To recover it, then, all
that was necessary to be done was to direct his
course to the right, and to proceed until the road
was found.
The reasoning was just, and the probability was
that a few moments would find the party on the
recovered path. But a half-hour passed by, and
the travellers, all anxious and doubting and filled
with gloom, were yet stumbling in the forest,
winding amid labyrinths of bog and brake, hill
and hollow, that every moment became wilder
and more perplexing. To add to their alarm, it
was manifest that the day was fast approaching
its close. The sun had set, or was so low in the
heavens that not a single ray could be seen
trembling
on the tallest tree; and thus was lost the
only means of deciding towards what quarter of the
compass they were directing their steps. The
mosses on the trees were appealed to in vain,as
they will be by all who expect to find them
pointing
,
like the mariner's needle, to the pole. They
indicate the quarter from which blow the
prevailing
humid winds of any region of country; but in
the moist and dense forests of the interior, they
are often equally luxuriant on every side of the
tree. The varying shape and robustness of boughs
are thought to offer a better means of finding the
points of the compass; but none but Indians, and
hunters grown gray in the woods, can profit by
their
occult lessons. The attempts of Roland to
draw instruction from them served only to
complete
his confusion; and, by and by, giving over
all hope of succeeding through any exercise of
skill or prudence, he left the matter to fortune and
his good horse, riding, in the obstinacy of despair,
whithersoever the weary animal chose to bear
him, without knowing whether it might be afar
from danger, or backwards into the vicinity of the
very enemies whom he had laboured so long to
avoid.
As he advanced in this manner, he was once or
twice inclined to suspect that he was actually
retracing
his steps, and approaching the path by
which he had entered the depths of the wood; and
on one occasion he was almost assured that such
was the fact by the peculiar appearance of a
brambly thicket, containing many dead trees,
which he thought he had noticed while following
in confidence after the leading of Telie Doe. A
nearer approach to the place convinced him of his
2*
error, but awoke a new hope in his mind, by
showing
him that he was drawing nigh the haunts of
men. The blazes of the axe were seen on the
trees, running away in lines, as if marked by the
hands of the surveyor; those trees that were
dead, he observed, had been destroyed by
girdling
;
and on the edge of the tangled brake where
they were most abundant, he noticed several
stalks of maize, the relies of some former harvest,
the copse itself having once been, as he supposed,
a corn-field.
It is only a tomahawk-improvement, said
Telie Doe, shaking her head, as he turned towards
her a look of joyous inquiry; and she pointed
towards
what seemed to have been once a cabin of
logs of the smallest size,too small indeed for
habitation
,but
which, more than half fallen down,
was rotting away, half hidden under the weeds
and brambles that grew, and seemed to have
grown for years, within its little area; there are
many of them in the woods, that were never
settled.
Roland did not require to be informed that a
`tomahawk-improvement,' as it was often called
in those days, meant nothing more than the box
of logs in form of a cabin, which the hunter or
land-speculator could build with his hatchet in a
few hours, a few girdled trees, a dozen or more
grains of corn from his pouch thrust into the soil,
with perhaps a few poles laid along the earth to
indicate an enclosed field; and that such
improvements
,
as they gave pre-emption rights to the
maker, were often established by adventurers, to
secure a claim, in the event of their not lighting
on lands more to their liking. Years had
evidently
passed by since the maker of this neglected
improvement had visited his territory, and Roland
no longer hoped to discover such signs about it as
might enable him to recover his lost way. His
spirits sunk as rapidly as they had risen, and he
was preparing to make one more effort to escape
from the forest, while the day-light yet lasted, or
to find some stronghold in which to pass the
night; when his attention was drawn to Telie
Doe, who had ridden a little in advance, eagerly
scanning the trees and soil around, in the hope
that some ancient mark or footstep might point
out a mode of escape. As she thus looked about
her, moving slowly in advance, her pony on a
sudden began to snort and prance, and betray
other indications of terror, and Telie herself was
seen to become agitated and alarmed, retreating
back upon the party, but keeping her eyes wildly
rolling from bush to bush, as if in instant
expectation
of seeing an enemy.
What is the matter? cried Roland, riding
to her assistance. Are we in enchanted land, that
our horses must be frightened, as well as
ourselves
?
He smells the war-paint, said Telie, with a
trembling voice;there are Indians near us!
Nonsense! said Roland, looking around, and
seeing, with the exception of the copse just passed,
nothing but an open forest, without shelter or
harbour
for an ambushed foe.But at that moment
Edith caught him by the arm, and turned upon
him a countenance more wan with fear than that
she had exhibited upon first hearing the cries of
Stackpole. It expressed, indeed, more than alarm,
it was the highest degree of terror, and the
feeling was so overpowering, that her lips, though
moving as in the act of speech, gave forth no
sound whatever. But what her lips refused to
tell, her finger, though shaking in the ague that
convulsed every fibre of her frame, pointed out;
and Roland, following it with his eyes, beheld the
object that had excited so much emotion. He
started himself, as his gaze fell upon a naked
Indian
stretched under a tree hard by, and sheltered
from view only by a dead bough lately fallen from
its trunk, yet lying so still and motionless, that he
might easily have been passed by without
observation
in the growing dusk and twilight of the
woods, had it not been for the instinctive terrors
of the pony, which, like other horses, and, indeed,
all other domestic beasts in the settlements, often
thus pointed out to their masters the presence of
an enemy.
The rifle of the soldier was in an instant cocked
and at his shoulder, while the pedler and
Emperor
,
as it happened, were too much discomposed
at the spectacle to make any such show of battle.
They gazed blankly upon the leader, whose piece,
settling down into an aim that must have been
fatal, suddenly wavered, and then, to their
surprise
,
was withdrawn.
The slayer has been here before us, he
exclaimed,the man is dead and scalped
already
!
With these words, he advanced to the tree, and
the others following, they beheld with horror, the
body of a savage of vast and noble proportions,
lying on its face across the roots of the tree, and
glued, it might almost be said, to the earth by a
mass of coagulated blood, that had issued from
the scalped and axe-cloven skull. The fragments
of a rifle, shattered, as it seemed, by a violent blow
against the tree under which he lay, were
scattered
at his side, with a broken powder-horn, a
splintered
knife, the helve of a tomahawk, and other
equipments of a warrior, all in like manner
shivered
to pieces by the unknown assassin. The
warrior seemed to have perished only after a
fearful
struggle; the earth was torn where he lay,
and his hands, yet grasping the soil, were dyed
a double red in the blood of his antagonist, or
perhaps in his own.
While Roland gazed upon the spectacle,
amazed
,
and wondering in what manner the wretched
being had met his death, which must have
happened
very recently, and whilst his party was
within the sound of a rifle-shot, he observed a
shudder to creep over the apparently lifeless
frame; the fingers relaxed their grasp of the
earth, and then clutched it again with violence; a
broken, strangling rattle came from the throat;
and a spasm of convulsion seizing upon every
limb, it was suddenly raised a little upon one arm,
so as to display the countenance, covered with
blood, the eyes retroverted into their orbits, and
glaring with the sightless whites. It was a
horrible
spectacle,the last convulsion of many that
had shaken the wretched and insensible, yet still
suffering clay, since it had received its
deathstroke
.
The spasm was the last, and but
momentary
;
yet it sufficed to raise the body of the
mangled barbarian so far that, when the pang that
excited it suddenly ceased, and, with it, the life of
the sufferer, the body rolled over on the back, and
thus lay, exposing to the eyes of the lookers-on
two gashes wide and gory on the breast, traced
by a sharp knife and a powerful hand, and, as it
seemed, in the mere wantonness of a malice and
lust of blood which even death could not satisfy.
The sight of these gashes answered the question
Roland had asked of his own imagination; they
were in the form of a
cross;
and as the legend, so
long derided, of the forest-fiend recurred to his
memory, he responded, almost with a feeling of
superstitious awe, to the trembling cry of Telie
Doe:
It is the Jibbenainosay! she exclaimed,
staring
upon the corse with mingled horror and
wonder
;Nick
of the Woods is up again in the
forest!
CHAPTER XI.
There
was little really superstitious in the
temper
of Captain Forrester; and however his mind
might be at first stirred by the discovery of a
victim of the redoubted fiend so devoutly believed
in by his host of the preceding evening, it is
certain
that his credulity was not so much excited as
his surprise. He sprang from his horse and
examined
the body, but looked in vain for the mark
of the bullet that had robbed it of life. No
gunshot
wound, at least none of importance, appeared
in any part. There was, indeed, a bullet-hole in
the left shoulder, and, as it seemed, very recently
inflicted: but it was bound up with leaves and
vulnerary herbs, in the usual Indian way, showing
that it must have been received at some period
anterior to the attack which had robbed the
warrior
of life. The gashes across the ribs were the
only other wounds on the body; that on the head,
made by a hatchet, was evidently the one that had
caused the warrior's death.
If this circumstance abated the wonder the
soldier had first felt on the score of a man being
killed at so short a distance from his own party,
without any one hearing the shot, he was still
more at a loss to know how one of the dead man's
race, proverbial for wariness and vigilance, should
have been approached by any merely human
enemy so nigh as to render fire-arms unnecessary
to his destruction. But that a human enemy had
effected the slaughter, inexplicable as it seemed,
he had no doubt; and he began straightway to
search among the leaves strewn over the ground,
for the marks of his foot-steps; not questioning
that, if he could find and follow them for a little
distance, he should discover the author of the
deed, and, which was of more moment to
himself
,
a friend and guide to conduct his party from
the forest.
His search was, however, fruitless; for, whether
it was that the shadows of evening lay too dark
on the ground, or that eyes more accustomed than
his own to such duties were required to detect a
trail among dried forest leaves, it was certain that
he failed to discover a single footstep, or other
vestige of the slayer. Nor were Pardon Dodge
and Emperor, whom he summoned to his
assistance
,
a whit more successful; a circumstance,
however, that rathered proved their inexperience
than the supernatural character of the
Jibbenainosay
,
whose foot-prints, as it appeared, were not
more difficult to find than those of the dead Indian,
for which they sought equally in vain.
While they were thus fruitlessly engaged, an
exclamation from Telie Doe drew their attention
to a spectacle, suddenly observed, which, to her
awe-struck eyes, presented the appearance of the
very being, so truculent yet supernatural, whose
traces, it seemed, were to be discovered only on
the breasts of his lifeless victims; and Roland,
looking up, beheld with surprise, perhaps even for
a moment with the stronger feeling of awe, a
figure stalking through the woods at a distance,
looking as tall and gigantic in the growing
twilight
,
as the airy demon of the Brocken, or the
equally colossal spectres seen on the wild summits
of the Peruvian Andes. Distance and the
darkness
together rendered the vision indistinct; but
Roland could see that the form was human, that
it moved onwards with rapid strides, and with its
countenance bent upon the earth, or upon another
moving object, dusky and of lesser size, that rolled
before it, guiding the way, like the bowl of the
dervise in the Arabian story; and, finally, that it
held in its hands, as if on the watch for an enemy,
an implement wondrously like the firelock of a
human fighting-man. At first, it appeared as if
the figure was approaching the party, and that in
a direct line; but presently Roland perceived it
was gradually bending its course away to the
left, its eyes still so closely fixed on its dusky
guide,the very bear, as Roland supposed, which
was said so often to direct the steps of the
Jibbenainosay
,that
it seemed as if about to pass
the party entirely without observation.
But this it made no part of the young soldier's
resolutions to permit; and, accordingly, he sprang
upon his horse, determined to ride forwards and
bring the apparition to a stand, while it was yet at
a distance.
Man or devil, Jibbenainosay or rambling
settler
,
he cried, it is, at least, no Indian, and
therefore
no enemy. Holla, friend! he exclaimed
aloud, and dashed forward, followed, though not
without hesitation, by his companions.
At the sound of his voice the spectre started and
looked up; and then, without betraying either
surprise or a disposition to beat a mysterious
retreat
,
advanced to meet the soldier, walking
rapidly
,
and waving its hand all the while with an
impatient gesture, as if commanding the party to
halt;a command which was immediately
obeyed
by Roland and all.
VOL. I.13
And now it was, that, as it drew nigh, its stature
appeared to grow less and less colossal, and the
wild lineaments with which fancy had invested it,
faded from sight, leaving the phantom a mere
man, of tall frame indeed, but without a single
characteristic
of dress or person to delight the soul
of wonder. The black bear dwindled into a little
dog, the meekest and most insignificant of his
tribe, being nothing less or more, in fact, than the
identical Peter, which had fared so roughly in the
hands, or rather under the feet, of Roaring Ralph
Stackpole, at the Station, the day before; while
the human spectre, the supposed fiend of the
woods, sinking from its dignity in equal
proportion
of abasement, suddenly presented to Roland's
eyes, the person of Peter's master, the humble,
peaceful, harmless Nathan Slaughter.
The transformation was so great and
unexpected
,
for even Roland looked to find in the
wanderer
,
if not a destroying angel, at least some
formidable champion of the forest, that he could
scarce forbear a laugh, as Nathan came stalking
up, followed by little Peter, who stole to the rear,
as soon as strangers were perceived, as if to avoid
the kicks and cuffs which his experience had
doubtless taught him were to be expected on all
such occasions. The young man felt the more
inclined to indulge his mirth, as the character
which Bruce had given him of Wandering
Nathan
,
as one perfectly acquainted with the woods,
convinced him that he could not have fallen upon
a better person to extricate him from his
dangerous
dilemma, and thus relieved his breast of a
mountain of anxiety and distress. But the laugh
with which he greeted his approach found no
response
from Nathan himself, who, having looked
with amazement upon Edith and Telie, as if
marvelling
what madness had brought females at that
hour into that wild desert, turned at last to the
soldier, demanding, with inauspicious gravity,
Friend! does thee think thee is in thee own
parlour with thee women at home, that thee
shouts so loud, and laughs so merrily? or does
thee know thee is in a wild Kentucky forest, with
murdering Injuns all around thee?
I trust not, said Roland, much more
seriously
;
but, in truth, we all took you for Nick of the
Woods, the redoubtable Nick himself; and you
must allow, that our terrors were ridiculous
enough, when they could convert a peaceful man
like you into such a blood-thirsty creature. That
there are Indians in the wood I can well believe,
having the evidence of Dodge, here, who
professes
to have seen six, and killed one, and of my
own eyes into the bargain.Yonder lies one,
dead, at this moment, under the walnut-tree, killed
by some unknown hand,Telie Doe says by Nick
of the Woods himself.
Friend, said Nathan, interrupting the young
man, without ceremony, thee had better think of
living Injuns than talk of dead ones; for, of a
truth, thee is like to have trouble with them!
Not now, I hope, with such a man as you to
help me out of the woods. In the name of
heaven
,
where am I, and whither am I going?
Whither thee is going, replied Nathan, it
might be hard to say, seeing that thee way of
travelling
is none of the straightest: nevertheless, if
thee continues thee present course, it is my idea,
thee is travelling to the Upper Ford of the river,
and will fetch it in twelve minutes, or thereabouts,
and, in the same space, find theeself in the midst
of thirty ambushed Injuns.
Good heavens! cried Roland, have we then
been labouring only to approach the cut-throats?
There is not a moment, then, to lose, and your
finding us is even more providential than I thought.
Put yourself at our head, lead us out of this den of
thieves,conduct us to the Lower Ford,to our
companions, the emigrants; or, if that may not be,
take us back to the Station,or any where at all,
where I may find safety for these females.For
myself, I am incapable of guiding them longer.
Truly, said Nathan, looking embarrassed, I
would do what I could for thee, but
But!
Do you hesitate? cried the Virginian,
in extreme indignation; will you leave us to
perish
,
when you, and you alone, can guide us from
the forest?
Friend, said Nathan, in a submissive,
deprecating
tone, I am a man of peace; and
peradventure
,
the party being so numerous, the Injuns
will fall upon us; and, truly, they will not spare
me any more than another; for they kill the
non-fighting
men, as well as them that fight. Truly, I
am in much fear for myself; but a single man
might escape.
If you are such a knave, such a mean-spirited,
unfeeling dastard, as to think of leaving these
women to their fate, said Roland, giving way to
rage, be assured that the first step will be your
last;I will blow your brains out, the moment
you attempt to leave us!
At these ireful words, Nathan's eyes began to
widen.
Truly, said he, I don't think thee would be
so wicked! But thee takes by force that which I
would have given with good will. It was not my
purpose to refuse thee assistance; though it is
unseemly
that one of my peaceful faith should go
with fighting-men among men of war, as if to do
battle. But, friend, if we should fall upon the
angry red-men, truly, there will bloodshed come
of it; and thee will say to me, `Nathan, lift up
thee gun and shoot;' and peradventure, if I say
`Nay,' thee will call me hard names, as thee did
before, saying, `If thee don't, I will blow thee
brains out!'Friend, I am a man of peace; and
if
Trouble yourself no longer on that score,
said the soldier, who began to understand how the
land lay, and how much the meek Nathan's
reluctance
to become his guide was engendered by
his fears of being called on to take a share in such
fighting as might occur, trouble yourself no
longer
,
we will take care to avoid a contest.
Truly, said Nathan, that may not be as
thee chooses, the Injuns being all around thee.
If a rencontre should be inevitable, said
Roland
,
with a smile, mingling grim contempt of
Nathan's pusillanimity with secret satisfaction at
the thought of being thus able to secure the safety
of his kinswoman, all that I shall expect of you
will be to decamp with the females, whilst we
three, Emperor, Pardon Dodge, and myself, cover
your retreat: we can, at least, check the
assailants
,
if we die for it!
This resolute speech was echoed by each of the
other combatants, the negro exclaiming, though
with no very valiant utterance, Yes, massa! no
mistake in ole Emperor;will die for missie and
massa,while Pardon, who was fast relapsing
into the desperation that had given him courage
on a former occasion, cried out, with direful
emphasis
,
If there's no dodging the critturs, then
there a'n't; and if I must fight, then I
must;
and
them that takes my scalp must gin the worth on't,
or it a'n't no matter!
13*
Truly, said Nathan, who listened to these
several outpourings of spirit with much
complacency
,
I am a man of peace and amity,
according
to my conscience; but if others are men of
wrath and battle, according to theirs, I will not
take it upon me to censure them,nay, not even
if they should feel themselves called upon by hard
necessity to shed the blood of their Injun
fellow-creatures
,who,
it must be confessed, if we
should stumble on the same, will do their best to
make that necessity as strong as possible. But
now let us away, and see what help there is for
us; though whither to go, and what to do, there
being Injuns before, and Injuns behind, and Injuns
all around, truly, truly, it doth perplex me.
And so, indeed, it seemed; for Nathan
straightway
fell into a fit of musing, shaking his head,
and tapping his finger contemplatively on the stock
of that rifle, terrible only to the animals that
furnished
him subsistence, and all the while in such
apparent abstraction, that he took no notice of a
suggestion made by Roland,namely, that he
should lead the way to the deserted Ford, where,
as the soldier said, there was every reason to
believe
there were no Indians,but continued to
argue the difficulty in his own mind, interrupting
the debate only to ask counsel where there
seemed
the least probability of obtaining it:
Peter! said he, addressing himself to the little
dog, and that with as much gravity as if
addressing
himself to a human adviser, I have my
thoughts on the matter,what does
thee
think of
matters and things?
My friend, cried Roland, impatiently, this
is no affair to be intrusted to the wisdom of a brute
dog!
If there is any one here whose wisdom can
serve us better, said Nathan, meekly, let him
speak. Thee don't know Peter, friend, or thee
would use him with respect. Many a long day
has he followed me through the forest; and many
a time has he helped me out of harm and peril
from man and beast, when I was at sore shifts to
help myself. For truly, friend, as I told thee
before
,
the Injuns have no regard for men, whether
men of peace or war; and an honest, quiet,
peace-loving
man can no more roam the wood, hunting
for the food that sustains life, without the fear of
being murdered, than a fighting-man in search of
his prey.Thee sees now what little dog Peter is
doing? He runs to the tracks, and he wags his
tail:truly, I am of the same way of thinking!
What tracks are they? demanded Roland,
as he followed Nathan to the path which the
latter
had been pursuing, when arrested by the
soldier
,
and where the little cur was now smelling
about, occasionally lifting his head and wagging
his tail, as if to call his master's attention.
What
tracks! echoed Nathan, looking on the
youth first with wonder, and then with
commiseration
,
and adding,It was a tempting of
Providence, friend, for
thee
to lead poor helpless
women into a wild forest. Does thee not know
the tracks of thee own horses?
'Sdeath! said Roland, looking on the marks,
as Nathan pointed them out in the soft earth, and
reflecting with chagrin how wildly he had been
rambling, for more than an hour, since they had
been impressed on the soil.
Thee knows the hoof-marks, said Nathan,
now pointing, with a grin, at other tracks of a
different
appearance among them; perhaps thee
knows
these
footprints also?
They are the marks of footmen, said the sol
dier, in suprise; but how they came there I know
not, no footmen being of our party.
The grin that marked the visage of the man of
peace widened almost into a laugh, as Roland
spoke. Verily, he cried, thee is in the wrong
place, friend, in the forest! If thee had no
footmen
with thee, could thee have none
after
thee?
Look, friend, here are tracks, not of one man, but
of five, each stepping on tiptoe, as if to tread
lightly and look well before him,each with a
moccasin on,each with a toe turned in; each
Enough,they were Indians! said Roland,
with a shudder, and they must have been close
behind us!
Now, friend, said Nathan, thee will have
more respect for Peter; for, truly, it was Peter
told me of these things, when I was peaceably
hunting my game in the forest. He showed me
the track of five ignorant persons rambling
through the wood, as the hawk flies in the air,
round, round, round, all the time,or like an ox
that has been browsing on the leaves of the
buckeye
;
[8]
[8]
The buck-eye, or American horse-chestnut, seems to be
universally considered, in the West, a mortal poison, both fruit
and leaves. Cattle affected by it, are said to play many
remarkable
antics, as if intoxicatedturning, twisting, and
rolling
about and around, until death closes their agonies.
and he showed me that five evil-minded
Shawnees were pursuing in their trail. So thinks
I to myself, `these poor creatures will come to
mischief, if no one gives them warning of their
danger;' and therefore I started to follow, Peter
showing me the way. And truly, if there can any
good come of my finding thee in this hard case,
thee must give all the thanks and all the praise to
poor Peter!
I will never more speak ill of a dog as long
as I live, said Roland. But let us away. I
thought our best course was to the Lower Ford;
but, I find, I am mistaken. We must away in the
opposite direction.
Not so, said Nathan, coolly; Peter is of
opinion that we must run the track over again;
and, truly, so am I. We must follow these same
five Injuns: it is as much as our lives are worth.
You are mad! said Roland. This will be
to bring us right upon the skulking cut-throats.
Let us fly in another direction: the forest is open
before us.
And how long does thee think it will keep
open? Friend, I tell thee, thee is surrounded by
Injuns. On the south, they lie at the Ford; on the
west, is the river rolling along in a flood; and at
the east, are the roads full of Shawnees on the
scout. Verily, friend, there is but little comfort
to think of proceeding in any direction, even to
the north, where there are five murdering
creatures
full before us. But this is my thought, and,
I rather think, it is Peter's: if we go to the north,
we know pretty much all the evil that lies before
us, and how to avoid it; whereas, by turning in
either of the other quarters, we go into danger
blindfold.
And how shall we avoid these five villains
before us? asked Roland, anxiously.
By keeping them before us, replied Nathan;
that is, friend, by following
them
, until such time
as they turn where thee turned before them, (and,
I warrant me, the evil creatures will turn
wheresoever
thee trail does;) when we, if we have good
luck, may slip quietly forward, and leave them to
follow us, after first taking the full swing of all
thee roundabout vagaries.
Take your own course, said Roland; it
may be the best. We can, at the worst, but
stumble
upon these five; and then, (granting that you
can, in the meanwhile, bear the females off,) I will
answer for keeping two or three of the villains
busy. Take your own course, he repeated; the
night is darkening around us; we must do
something
.
Thee says the truth, cried Nathan. As for
stumbling unawares on the five evil persons thee
is in dread of, trust Peter for that: thee shall soon
see what a friend thee has in little dog Peter.
Truly, for a peaceful man like me, it is needful I
should have some one to tell me when dangerous
persons are nigh.
With these words, which were uttered with a
good countenance, showing how much his
confidence
in the apparently insignificant Peter
preserved
him from the fears natural to his character
and situation, the man of peace proceeded to
marshal
the company in a line, directing them to
follow
him in that order, and earnestly impressing
upon all the necessity of preserving strict silence
upon the march. This being done, he boldly strode
forwards, taking a post at least two hundred paces
in advance of the others, at which distance, as he
gave Roland to understand, he desired the party
to follow, as was the more necessary, since their
being mounted rendered them the more liable to
be observed by distant enemies. If thee sees me
wave my hand above my head, were his last
instructions
to the young soldier, who began to be
well pleased with his readiness and forecast,
bring thee people to a halt; if thee sees me drop
upon the ground, lead them under the nearest
cover, and keep them quiet; for thee may then be
certain there is mischief, or mischievous people,
nigh at hand. But verily, friend, with Peter's
help, we will circumvent them all.
With this cheering assurance, he now strode
forward to his station, and coming to a halt with
his dog Peter, Roland immediately beheld the
latter
run to a post forty or fifty paces further in
advance, when he paused to receive the final
orders of his master, which were given with a
motion of the same hand that a moment after
beckoned the party to follow. Had Roland been
sufficiently nigh to take note of proceedings, he
would have admired the conduct of the little brute,
the unerring accuracy with which he pursued the
trail, the soft and noiseless motion with which he
stepped from leaf to leaf, casting his eyes ever
and anon to the right and left, and winding the
air before him, as if in reality conscious of peril,
and sensible that the welfare of the six mortals at
his heels depended upon the faithful exercise of
all his sagacity. These things, however, from the
distance, Roland was unable to observe; but he
saw enough to convince him that the animal
addressed
itself to its task with as much zeal and
prudence as its master. A sense of security, the
first felt for several hours, now began to disperse
the gloom that had oppressed his spirits; and
Edith's countenance, throughout the whole of the
adventure a faithful, though doubtless somewhat
exaggerated, reflection of his own, also lost much
of its melancholy and terror, though without at
any moment regaining the cheerful smiles that
had decked it at the setting-out. It was left for
Roland alone, as his mind regained its elasticity,
to marvel at the motley additions by which his
party had increased in so short a time to twice
its original numbers, and to speculate on the
prospects
of an expedition committed to the guidance
of such a conductor as little Peter.
CHAPTER XII.
The
distance at which Roland with his party
followed the guides, and the gloom of the woods,
prevented his making any close observations upon
their motions, unless when some swelling ridge,
nearly destitute of trees, brought them nearer the
light of the upper air. At other times, he could
do little more than follow with his eye the tall
figure of Nathan, plunging from shadow to
shadow
,
and knoll to knoll, with a pace both free and
rapid, and little resembling the shambling,
hesitating
step with which he moved among the haunts
of his contemners and oppressors. As for the dog,
little Peter, he was only with difficulty seen when
ascending some such illuminated knoll as has been
mentioned, when he might be traced creeping
along with unabated vigilance and caution.
It was while ascending one of these low, and
almost bare swells of ground, that the little
animal
gave the first proof of that sagacity, or
wisdom
,
as Nathan called it, on which the latter
seemed to rely for safety so much more than on
his own experience and address. He had no
sooner reached the summit of the knoll than he
abruptly came to a stand, and by and by cowered
to the earth, as if to escape the observation of
enemies in front, whose presence he indicated in
no other way, unless by a few twitches and
flourishes
of his tail, which, a moment after, became
as rigid and motionless as if, with his body, it had
been suddenly converted into stone. The whole
action, as far as Roland could note it, was similar
to that of a well-trained spaniel marking game,
and such was the interpretation the soldier put
upon it, until Nathan, suddenly stopping, waved
his hand as a signal to the party to halt, which
was immediately obeyed. The next moment,
Nathan
was seen creeping up the hill, to investigate
the cause of alarm, which he proceeded to do
with great caution, as if well persuaded there was
danger at hand. Indeed, he had not yet reached
the brow of the eminence, when Roland beheld
him suddenly drop upon his face, thereby giving
the best evidence of the existence of peril of an
extreme and urgent character.
The young Virginian remembered the
instructions
of his guide to seek shelter for his party, the
moment this signal was given; and, accordingly,
he led his followers without delay into a little
tangled brake hard by, where he charged them
to remain in quiet, until the cause of the
interruption
should be ascertained and removed. From
the edge of the brake he could see the guide, still
maintaining his position on his face, yet dragging
himself upward like a snake, until he had reached
the top of the hill and looked over into the maze
of forest beyond. In this situation he lay for
several
moments, apparently deeply engaged with the
scene before him; when Forrester, impatient of
his silence and delay, anxiously interested in every
turn of events, and perhaps unwilling at a season
of difficulty, to rely altogether on Nathan's
unaided
observations, gave his horse in charge of
Emperor
,
and ascended the eminence himself; taking
care, however, to do as Nathan had done, and
throw himself upon the ground, when near its
summit. In this way, he succeeded in creeping
VOL. I.14
to Nathan's side, when the cause of alarm was
soon made manifest.
The forest beyond the ridge was, for a
considerable
distance, open and free from undergrowth,
the trees standing wide apart, and thus admitting
a broad extent of vision, though now contracted
by the increasing dusk of evening. Through this
expanse, and in its darkest corner, flitting dimly
along, Roland's eyes fell upon certain shadows, at
first vague and indistinct, but which soon assumed
the human form, marching one after the other in
a line, and apparently approaching the very ridge
on which he lay, each with the stealthy yet rapid
pace of a wild-cat. They were but five in
number
;
but the order of their march, the
appearance
of their bodies seemingly half naked, and the
busy intentness with which they pursued the trail
left so broad and open by the inexperienced
wanderers
,
would have convinced Roland of their
savage
character, had he possessed no other
evidence
than that of his own senses.
They are Indians! he muttered in Nathan's
ear.
Shawnee creatures, said the latter, with
edifying
coolness;and will think no more of
taking
the scalps of thee two poor women than of
digging off thee own.
There are but five of them, and The
young man paused, and the gloom that a spirit so
long harassed by fears, though fears for another,
had spread over his countenance, was exchanged
for a look of fierce decision that better became
his features. Harkee, man, he abruptly
resumed
,
we cannot pass the ridge without being seen
by them; our horses are exhausted, and we
cannot
hope to escape them by open flight?
Verily, said Nathan, thee speaks the
truth.
Nor can we leave the path we are now
pursuing
,
without fear of falling into the hands of a
party more numerous and powerful. Our only
path of escape, you said, was over this ridge, and
towards yonder Lower Ford?
Truly, said Nathan, with a lugubrious look
of assent,what thee says is true: but how we
are to fly these evil-minded creatures, with poor
frightened women hanging to our legs
We will not fly them! said Roland, the frown
of battle gathering on his brows. Yonder
crawling
reptiles,reptiles in spirit as in movement,
have been dogging our steps for hours, waiting for
the moment when to strike with advantage at my
defenceless followers; and they will dog us
still, if permitted, until there is no escape from
their knives and hatchets, for either man or
woman
.
There is a way of stopping them,there
is a way of requiting them!
Truly, said Nathan, there is no such way;
unless we were wicked men of the world and
fighting-men, and would wage battle with them.
Why not meet the villains in their own way?
There are but five of them,and footmen too!
By heavens, man, we will charge them,cut them
to pieces, and so rid the wood of them! Four
strong men like us, fighting, too, in defence of
women,
Four!
echoed Nathan, looking wonder and
alarm together; does thee think to have
me
do
the wicked thing of shedding blood? Thee should
remember, friend, that I am a follower of
peaceful
doctrines, a man of peace and amity.
What! said Roland, warmly, would you
not defend your life from the villains? Would you
suffer yourself to be tomahawked, unresisting,
when a touch of the trigger under your finger, a
blow of the knife at your belt, would preserve
the existence nature and heaven alike call on you
to protect? Would you lie still, like a fettered
ox, to be butchered?
Truly, said Nathan, I would take myself
away; or, if that might not be, why then, friend,
verily, friend, if I could do nothing else,truly,
I must then give myself up to be murdered.
Spiritless, mad, or hypocritical! cried
Roland
,
with mingled wonder and contempt. Then
grasping his strange companion by the arm, he
cried, Harkee, man, if you would not strike a
blow for yourself,would you not strike it for
another? What if you had a wife, a parent, a
child, lying beneath the uplifted hatchet, and you
with these arms in your hands,what! do you
tell me you would stand by and see them
murdered
?I
say, a wife or child!the wife of your
bosom,the child of your heart!would you see
them
murdered?
At this stirring appeal, uttered with
indescribable
energy and passion, though only in a whisper,
Nathan's countenance changed from dark to pale,
and his arm trembled in the soldier's grasp. He
turned upon him also a look of extraordinary
wildness, and muttered betwixt his teeth an
answer
that betokened as much confusion of mind
as agitation of spirits: Friend, he said,
whoever
thee is, it matters nothing to thee what
might happen, or has happened, in such case made
and provided. I am a man, thee is another; thee
has thee conscience, and I have mine. If thee will
fight, fight: settle it with thee conscience. If thee
don't like to see thee kinswoman murdered, and
thee thinks thee has a call to battle, do thee best
with sword and pistol, gun and tomahawk; kill
and slay to thee liking: if thee conscience finds no
fault with thee, neither will I. But as for me, let
the old Adam of the flesh stir me as it may, I
have no one to fight for,wife or child, parent or
kinsman, I have none: if thee will hunt the world
over, thee will not find one in it that is my
kinsman
or relative.
But I ask you, said Roland, somewhat
surprised
at the turn of Nathan's answer, I ask
you, if you
had
a wife or child
But I have
not,
cried Nathan, interrupting
him vehemently; and therefore, friend, why
should thee speak of them? Them that are dead,
let them rest: they can never cry to me more.
Think of thee own blood, and do what seems best
to thee for the good thereof.
Assuredly I would, said Roland, who,
however
much his curiosity was roused by the
unexpected
agitation of his guide, had little time to
think of any affairs but his own,Assuredly I
would, could I only count upon your hearty
assistance
.
I tell you, man, my blood boils to look
at yonder crawling serpents, and to think of the
ferocious object with which they are dogging at
my heels; and I would give a year of my life,
ay, if the whole number of years were but ten,
one whole year of all,for the privilege of
paying
them for their villany beforehand.
Thee has thee two men to back thee, said
Nathan, who had now recovered his composure;
and with these two men, if thee is warlike
enough, thee might do as much mischief as thee
conscience calls for. But, truly, it becomes not a
man of peace like me to speak of strife and
bloodshed
Yet,
truly, he added, hastily, I think
there must mischief come of this meeting; for,
14*
verily, the evil creatures are leaving thee tracks,
and coming towards us!
They stop! said Forrester, eagerly,they
look about them,they have lost the track,they
are coming this way! You will not fight, yet you
may counsel.What shall I do? Shall I attack
them? What
can
I do?
Friend, replied Nathan, briskly, I can't tell
what thee can do; but I can tell thee what a man
of Kentucky, a wicked fighter of Injuns, would
do in such a case made and provided. He would
betake him to the thicket where he had hidden his
women and horses, and he would lie down with
his fighting men behind a log; and truly, if these
ill-disposed Injun-men were foolish enough to
approach
,
he would fire upon them with his three
guns, taking them by surprise, and perhaps,
wicked
man, killing the better half of them on the spot:
and then
And then, interrupted Roland, taking fire at
the idea, he would spring on his horse, and make
sure of the rest with sword and pistol?
Truly, said Nathan, he would do no such
thing; seeing that, the moment he lifted up his
head above the log, he would be liker to have an
Injun bullet through it than to see the wicked
creature that shot it. Verily, a man of Kentucky
would be wiser. He would take the pistols thee
speaks of, supposing it were his good luck to have
them, and let fly at the evil-minded creatures with
them also; not hoping, indeed, to do any execution
with such small ware, but to make the Injuns
believe
there were as many enemies as fire-arms:
and, truly, if they did not take to their heels after
such a second volley, they would be foolisher
Injuns
than were ever before heard of in
Kentucky
.
By Heaven, said Forrester, it is good
advice
;
and I will take it!
Advice, friend! I don't advise thee, said
Nathan
,
hastily: truly, I advise to nothing but peace
and amity.I only tell thee what a wicked
Kentucky
fighting-man would do,a man that might
think it, as many of them do, as lawful to shoot a
prowling Injun as a skulking bear.
And I would to Heaven, said Roland, I had
but two,nay, but one of them with me this
instant
.
A man like Bruce were worth the lives of
a dozen such scum.I must do my best.
Truly, friend, said Nathan, who had listened
to the warlike outpourings of the young soldier
with a degree of complacency and admiration one
would have scarce looked for in a man of his
peaceful character, thee has a conscience of
thee own, and if thee will fight these Injun-men
from an ambush, truly, I will not censure nor
exhort
thee to the contrary. If thee can rely upon
thee two men, the coloured person and the other,
thee may hold the evil creatures exceeding
uneasy
.
Alas, said Roland, the fire departing from
his eyes, you remind me of my weakness. My
men will
not
fight, unless from sheer desperation.
Emperor I know to be a coward, and Dodge, I
fear, is no braver.
Verily, said Nathan, bluffly, it was foolish
of thee to come into the woods in such company,
foolisher still to think of fighting five Injun-men
with such followers to back thee; and truly, he
added, it was foolishest of all to put the
safekeeping
of such helpless creatures into the hands
of one who can neither fight for them nor for
himself
.
Nevertheless, thee is as a babe and suckling
in the woods, and Peter and I will do the best we
can for thee. It is lucky for thee, that as thee
cannot
fight, thee has the power to fly; and, truly, for
the poor women's sake, it is better thee should
leave the woods in peace.
With that, Nathan directed the young man's
attention
to the pursuing foes, who, having by some
mischance, lost the trail, had scattered about in
search of it, and at last recovered it; though not
before two of them had approached so nigh the
ridge on which the observers lay as to give just
occasion for fear lest they should cross it
immediately
in front of the party of travellers. The
deadly purpose with which the barbarians were
pursuing him Roland could infer from the
cautious
silence preserved while they were searching
for the lost tracks; and even when these were
regained, the discovery was communicated from
one to another merely by signs, not a man
uttering
so much as a word. In a few moments, they
were seen again, formed in single file, stealing
through the woods with a noiseless but rapid
pace, and, fortunately, bending their steps towards
a distant part of the ridge, where Roland and his
companions had so lately crossed it.
Get thee down to thee people, said Nathan;
lead them behind the thicket, and when thee sees
me beckon thee, carry them boldly over the hill.
Thee must pass it, while the Shawnee-men are
behind yonder clump of trees, which is so luckily
for thee on the very comb of the swell. Be quick
in obeying, friend, or the evil creatures may catch
sight of thee: thee has no time to lose.
The ardour of battle once driven from his mind,
Roland was able to perceive the folly of risking
a needless contest betwixt a superior body of wild
Indian warriors and his own followers. But had
his warlike spirit been at its height, it must have
been quelled in a moment by the appearance of
his party, left in the thicket, during his brief
absence
on the hill, to feed their imaginations with
terrors of every appalling character; in which
occupation
,
as he judged at a glance, the gallant
Dodge and Emperor had been even more
industrious
than the females, the negro looking the
very personification of mute horror, and bending
low on his saddle as if expecting every instant a
shower of Indian bullets to be let fly into the
thicket; while Pardon expressed the state of his
feelings by crying aloud, as soon as Roland
appeared
,
I say, capting, if you seed 'em, a'n't
there no dodging of 'em no how?
We can escape, Roland! exclaimed Edith,
anticipating the soldier's news from his
countenance
;
the good man can save us?
I hope, I trust so, replied the kinsman: we
are in no immediate danger. Be composed, and
for your lives, all now preserve silence.
A few words served to explain the posture of
affairs, and a few seconds to transfer the party
from its ignoble hiding-place to the open wood
behind it; when Roland, casting his eyes to where
Nathan lay motionless on the hill, awaited
impatiently
the expected signal. Fortunately, it was
soon given; and, in a few moments more, the
party, moving briskly but stealthily over the
eminence
,
had plunged into the dark forest beyond,
leaving the baffled pursuers to follow afterwards as
they might.
Now, said Nathan, taking post at Roland's
side, and boldly directing his course across the
track of the enemy, we have the evil creatures
behind us, and, truly, there we will keep them.
And now, friend soldier, since such thee is, thee
must make thee horses do duty, tired or not; for
if we reach not the Old Ford before darkness
closes on us, we may find but ill fortune crossing
the waters.Hark, friend! does thee hear? he
exclaimed, coming to a pause, as a sudden and
frightful yell suddenly rose in the forest beyond
the ridge, obviously proceeding from the five foes,
and expressing at once surprise, horror, and
lamentation
:
Did thee not say thee found a dead Injun
in the wood?
We did, replied the soldier, the body of an
Indian, horribly mangled; and, if I am to believe
the strange story I have heard of the
Jibbenainosay
,
it was some of his bloody work.
It is good for thee, then, and the maidens that
is with thee, said Nathan; for, truly, the evil
creatures have found that same dead man, being
doubtless one of their own scouting companions;
and, truly, they say the Injuns, in such cases made
and provided, give over their evil designs in
terror
and despair; in which case, as I said, it will
be good for thee and thee companions. But
follow
,
friends, and tarry not to ask questions. Thee
poor women shall come to no harm, if Nathan
Slaughter or little dog Peter can help them.
With these words of encouragement, Nathan,
bounding along with an activity that kept him
ever in advance of the mounted wanderers, led
the way from the open forest into a labyrinth of
brakes and bogs, through paths traced rather by
wolves and bears than any nobler animals, so
wild, so difficult, and sometimes, in appearance, so
impracticable to be pursued, that Roland,
bewildered
from the first, looked every moment to find
himself plunged into difficulties from which neither
the zeal of Nathan nor the sagacity of the
unpretending
Peter could extricate his weary followers.
The night was coming fast, and coming with
clouds and distant peals of thunder, the harbingers
of new tempests; and how the journey was to be
continued, when darkness should at last invest
them, through the wild mazes of vine and brake
in which they now wandered, was a question
which he scarce durst answer. But night came,
and still Nathan led the way with unabated
confidence
and activity, professing a very hearty
contempt
for all perils and difficulties of the woods,
except such as proceeded from evil-minded
Shawnee creatures; and, indeed, averring that
there was scarce a nook in the forest for miles
around, with which he was not as well acquainted
as with the patches of his own leathern garments.
Truly, said he, when I first came to this land,
I did make me a little cabin in a place hard by;
but the Injuns burned the same; and, verily, had
it not been for little Peter, who gave me a hint of
their coming, I should have been burned with it.
Be of good heart, friend: if thee will keep the
ill-meaning
Injun-men out of my way, I will
adventure
to lead thee any-where thee will, within
twenty miles of this place, on the darkest night,
and that through the thickest cane, or deepest
swamp, thee can lay eyes on,that is, if I have
but little dog Peter to help me. Courage, friend;
thee is now coming fast to the river; and, if we
have but good luck in crossing it, thee shall,
peradventure
,
find theeself nearer thee friends than
thee thinks for.
This agreeable assurance was a cordial to the
spirits of all, and the travellers now finding
themselves
,
though still in profound darkness, moving
through the open woodlands again, instead of the
maze of copses that had so long confined them,
Roland took advantage of the change to place
himself at Nathan's side, and endeavour to draw
from him some account of his history, and the
causes that had brought him into a position and
way of life so ill suited to his faith and peaceful
habits. To his questions, however, Nathan seemed
little disposed to return satisfactory answers,
except
in so far as they related to his adventures since
the period of his coming to the frontier; of which
he spoke very freely, though succinctly. He had
built him cabins, like other lonely settlers, and
planted cornfields, from which he had been driven,
time after time, by the evil Shawnees, incurring
frequent perils and hardships; which, with the
persecutions he endured from his more warlike
and intolerant neighbours, gradually drove him
into the forest to seek a precarious subsistence
from the spoils of the chase. As to his past life,
and the causes that had made him a dweller of the
wilderness, he betrayed so little inclination to
satisfy the young man's curiosity, that Roland
dropped the subject entirely, not however without
suspecting, that the imputations Bruce had cast
upon his character might have had some
foundation
in truth.
But while conning these things over in his
mind, on a sudden the soldier stepped from the
dark forest into a broad opening, canopied only
by the sky, sweeping like a road through the
wood, in which it was lost behind him; while, in
front, it sank abruptly into a deep hollow or gulf,
in which was heard the sullen rush of an impetuous
river.
CHAPTER XIII.
The
roar of the moving flood, for such, by its
noise, it seemed, as they descended the river-bank,
to which Nathan had so skilfully conducted them,
awoke in Roland's bosom a feeling of dismay.
Fear not, said the guide, to whom he
imparted
his doubts of the safety of the ford; there
is more danger in one single skulking Shawnee
than ten thousand such sputtering brooks. Verily,
the ford is good enough, though deep and rough;
and if the water should soil thee young women's
garments a little, thee should remember it will not
make so ugly a stain as the blood-mark of a
scalping savage.
Lead on, said Pardon Dodge, with
unexpected
spirit; I am not one of them 'ere fellers as
fears a big river; and my hoss is a dreadful fine
swimmer.
In that case, said Nathan, if thee consents
to the same, I will get up behind thee, and so pass
over dry-shod; for the feel of wet
leather-breeches
is quite uncomfortable.
This proposal, being reasonable enough, was
readily acceded to, and Nathan was in the act of
climbing to the crupper of Dodge's horse, when
little Peter began to manifest a prudent desire to
pass the ford dry-shod also, by pawing at his
master's
heels, and beseeching his notice with sundry
ow but expressive whinings. Such, at least, was
the interpretation which Roland, who perceived the
VOL. I.15
animal's motions, was inclined to put upon them.
He was, therefore, not a little surprised when
Nathan
,
starting from the stirrup, into which he had
climbed, leaped again to the ground, staring around
him from right to left with every appearance of
alarm.
Right, Peter! he at last muttered, fixing his
eye upon the further bank of the river, a dark
mass of hill and forest that rose in dim relief
against the clouded sky, overshadowing the whole
stream, which lay like a pitchy abyss betwixt it
and the travellers,right, Peter! thee eyes is as
good as thee nosethee is determined the poor
women shall not be murdered!
What is it you see? demanded Forrester,
and why do you talk of murdering?
Speak low, and look across the river,
whispered
the guide, in reply; does thee see the
light glimmering among the rocks by the
road-side
?
I see neither rocks nor road,all is to my
eyes confused blackness; and as for a light, I see
nothingStay! No; 'tis the gleam of a
fire-fly
.
The gleam of a fire-fly! murmured Nathan,
with tones that seemed to mingle wonder and
derision
with feelings of a much more serious
character
;
it is such a fire-fly as might burn a house,
or roast a living captive at the stake:it is a
brand in the hands of a 'camping Shawnee!
Look, friend; he is blowing it into a flame; and
presently thee will see the whole bank around it
in a glow.
It was even as Nathan said. Almost while he
was yet speaking, the light, which all now clearly
beheld, at first a point as small and faint as the
spark of a lampyris, and then a star scarce
bigger
or brighter than the torch of a jack-o'-lantern,
suddenly grew in magnitude, projecting a long
and lance-like, though broken, reflection over the
wheeling current, and then as suddenly shot into
a bright and ruddy blaze, illumining hill and river,
and even the anxious countenances of the
travellers
.
At the same time, a dark figure, as of a man
engaged
feeding the flame with fresh fuel, was plainly
seen twice or thrice to pass before it. How many
others, his comrades, might be watching its
increasing
blaze, or preparing for their wild
slumbers
,
among the rocks and bushes where it was
kindled, it was impossible to divine. The sight of
the fire itself in such a solitary spot, and under
such circumstances, even if no attendant had been
seen by it, would have been enough to alarm the
travellers, and compel the conviction that their
enemies had not forgotten to station a force at
this neglected ford, as well as at the other more
frequented one above, and thus to deprive them of
the last hope of escape.
This unexpected incident, the climax of a long
series of disappointments, all of a character so
painful and exciting, drove the young soldier again
to despair; which feeling the tantalizing sense
that he was now within but a few miles of his
companions in exile, and separated from them only
by the single obstruction before him, exasperated
into a species of fury bordering almost upon
phrensy.
There is but one way of escape, he
exclaimed
,
without venturing even a look towards his
kinswoman, or seeking by idle words to conceal
the danger of their situation: we must pass the
river. The roar of the water will drown the
noise of our footsteps; we can cross unheard and
unlooked for; and then, if there be no way of
avoiding them, we can pour a volley among the
rascals at their fire, and take advantage of their
confusion to gallop by. Look to the women,
Nathan
Slaughter; and you, Pardon Dodge, and
Emperor, follow me, and do as you see me do.
Truly, said Wandering Nathan, with
admirable
coolness and complacency, thee is a
courageous young man, and a young man of sense
and spirit,that is to say, after thee own sense of
matters and things: and, truly, if it were not for
the poor women, and for the blazing fire, thee
might greatly confound and harmfully vanquish
the evil creatures, there placed so unluckily on
the bank, in the way and manner which thee
thinks of. But, friend, thee plan will not do: thee
might pass unheard indeed, but not unseen. Does
thee not see how brightly the fire blazes on the
water? Truly, we should all be seen and fired at,
before we reached the middle of the stream; and,
truly, I should not be surprised if the gleam of the
fire on the pale faces of thee poor women should
bring a shot upon us where we stand; and,
therefore, friend, the sooner we get us out of the
way, the better.
And where shall we betake us? demanded
Roland, the sternness of whose accents but ill
disguised the gloom and hopelessness of his
feelings
.
To a place of safety and of rest, replied the
guide, and to one that is nigh at hand; where
we may lodge us, with little fear of Injuns, until
such time as the waters shall abate a little, or the
stars give us light to cross them at a place where
are no evil Shawnees to oppose us. And then,
friend, as to slipping by these foolish creatures
who make such bright fires on the public
highway
,
truly, with little Peter's assistance, we can
do it with great ease.
Let us not delay, said Roland; and added
sullenly, though where a place of rest and safety
can be found in these detestable woods, I can no
longer imagine.
It is a place of rest, at least, for the dead,
said Nathan, in a low voice, at the same time
leading the party back again up the bank, and
taking care to shelter them as he ascended, as
much as possible from the light of the fire, which
was now blazing with great brilliancy: nine
human corses,father and mother, grandam and
children,sleep under the threshold at the door;
and there are not many, white men or Injuns, that
will, of their free will, step over the bosoms of
the poor murdered creatures, after nightfall; and,
the more especially, because there are them that
believe they rise at midnight, and roam round the
house and the clearings, mourning. Yet it is a
good hiding-place for them that are in trouble;
and many a night have little Peter and I sheltered
us beneath the ruined roof, with little fear of either
ghosts or Injuns; though, truly, we have
sometimes
heard strange and mournful noises among
the trees around us. It is but a poor place and a
sad one; but it will afford thee weary women a
safe resting-place till such time as we can cross
the river.
These words of Nathan brought to Roland's
recollection the story of the Ashburns, whom
Bruce had alluded to, as having been all
destroyed
at their Station in a single night by the Indians,
and whose tragical fate, perhaps, more than any
other circumstance, had diverted the course of
travel from the ford, near to which they had
15 *
seated themselves, to the upper, and, originally,
less frequented one.
It was not without reluctance that Roland
prepared
to lead his little party to this scene of
butchery
and sorrow; for, though little inclined himself
to superstitious feelings of any kind, he could
easily imagine what would be the effect of such
a scene, with its gloomy and blood-stained
associations
,
on the harassed mind of his cousin. But
suffering and terror, even on the part of Edith,
were not to be thought of, where they could
purchase
escape from evils far more real and
appalling
;
and he therefore avoided all remonstrance
and opposition, and even sought to hasten the
steps of his conductor towards the ruined and
solitary pile.
The bank was soon re-ascended; and the party,
stealing along in silence, presently took their last
view of the ford, and the yet blazing fire that
had warned them so opportunely from its
dangerous
vicinity. In another moment they had crept a
second time into the forest, though in the opposite
quarter from that whence they had come; making
their way through what had once been a broad
path, evidently cut by the hands of man, through
a thick cane-brake, though long disused, and now
almost choked by brambles and shrubs; and, by
and by, having followed it for somewhat less than
half a mile, they found themselves on a kind of
clearing, which, it was equally manifest, had been
once a cultivated field of several acres in extent.
Throughout the whole of this space, the trunks of
the old forest-trees, dimly seen in the light of a
clouded sky, were yet standing, but entirely
leafless
and dead, and presenting such an aspect of
desolation as is painful to the mind, even when
sunshine, and the flourishing maize at their roots,
invest them with a milder and more cheerful
character
.
Such prospects are common enough in
all new American clearings, where the
husbandman
is content to deprive the trees of life, by
girdling,
and then leave them to the assaults of
the elements and the natural course of decay; and
where a thousand trunks, of the gigantic growth
of the West, are thus seen rising together in the
air, naked and hoary with age, they impress the
imagination with such gloom as is engendered by
the sight of ruined colonnades.
Such was the case with the present prospect:
years had passed since the axe had sapped
the strength of the mighty oaks and beeches;
bough after bough, and limb after limb, had fallen
to the earth, with here and there some huge trunk
itself, overthrown by the blast, and now rotting
among weeds on the soil which it cumbered. At
the present hour, the spectacle was peculiarly
mournful and dreary. The deep solitude of the
spot,the hour itself,the gloomy aspect of the
sky veiled in clouds,the occasional rush of the
wind sweeping like a tempest through the woods,
to be succeeded by a dead and dismal calm,the
roll of distant thunder reverberating among the
hills,but, more than all, the remembrance of the
tragical event that had consigned the ill-fated
settlement
to neglect and desolation, gave the
deepest
character of gloom to the scene.
As the travellers entered upon the clearing,
there occurred one of those casualties which so
often increase the awe of the looker-on, in such
places. In one of the deepest lulls and hushes of
the wind, when there was no apparent cause in
operation to produce such an effect, a tall and
majestic trunk was seen to decline from the
perpendicular
,
topple slowly through the air, and then
fall to the earth with a crash like the shock of an
earthquake.
The poet and the moralizing philosopher may
find food for contemplation in such a scene, and
such a catastrophe. He may see, in the lofty and
decaying trunks, the hoary relics and
representatives
of a generation of better and greater spirits
than those who lead the destinies of his own,
spirits, left not more as monuments of the past
than as models for the imitation of the present;
he may contrast their majestic serenity and rest,
their silence and immoveableness, with the
turmoil
of the greener growth around, the uproar
and collision produced by every gust, and trace
the resemblance to the scene where the storms of
party, rising among the sons, hurtle so indecently
around the gray fathers of a republic, whose
presence
should stay them; and, finally, he may
behold
in the trunks, as they yield at last to decay,
and sink one by one to the earth, the fall of each
aged parent of his country,a fall, indeed, as of
an oak of a thousand generations, shocking the
earth around, and producing for a moment,
wonder
,
awe, grief, and then a long forgetfulness.
But men in the situation of the travellers have
neither time nor inclination for moralizing. The
fall of the tree only served to alarm the weaker
members of the party, to some of whom, perhaps,
it appeared as an inauspicious omen. Apparently,
however, it woke certain mournful recollections in
the brains of both little Peter and his master, the
former of whom, as he passed it by, began to
snuffle and whine in a low and peculiar manner;
while Nathan immediately responded, as if in
reply
to his counsellor's address, Ay, truly, Peter!
thee has a good memory of the matter; though
five long years is a marvellous time for thee little
noddle to hold things. It was under this very tree
they murdered the poor old granny, and brained
the innocent, helpless babe. Of a truth, it was a
sight that made my heart sick within me.
What! asked Roland, who followed close at
his heels, and overheard the half-soliloquized
expressions
;
were
you
present at the massacre?
Alas, friend, replied Nathan, it was neither
the first nor last massacre that I have seen with
these eyes. I dwelt, in them days, in a cabin a
little distance down the river; and these poor
people
,
the Ashburns, were my near neighbours;
though, truly, they were not to me as neighbours
should be, but held me in disfavour, because of
my faith, and ever repelled me from their doors
with scorn and ill-will. Yet was I sorry for them,
because of the little children they had in the
house, the same being afar from succour; and
when I found the tracks of the Injun party in the
wood, as it was often my fate to do, while
rambling
in search of food, and saw that they were
bending their way towards my own little
wigwam
,
I said to myself, `Whilst they are burning
the same, I will get me to friend Ashburn, that he
may be warned and escape to friend Bruce's
Station
in time, with his people and cattle.' But,
verily
,
they held my story light, and laughed at and
derided me; for, in them days, the people
hardened
their hearts and closed their ears against
me, because I held it not according to conscience
to kill Injuns as they did, and so refused. And so,
friend, they drove me from their doors; seeing
which, and perceiving the poor creatures were in
a manner besotted, and bent upon their own
destruction
,
and the night coming on fast, I turned
my steps and ran with what speed I could to
friend Bruce's, telling him the whole story, and
advising that he should despatch a strong body of
horsemen to the place, so as to frighten the evil
creatures away; for, truly, I did not hold it right
that there should be bloodshed. But, truly and
alas, friend, I fared no better, and perhaps a little
worse, at the Station than I had fared before at
Ashburn's; wherefore, being left in despair, I said
to myself, I will go into the woods, and hide me
away, not returning to the river, lest I should be
compelled to look upon the shedding of the blood
of the women and little babes, which I had no
power to prevent. But it came into my mind,
that, perhaps, the Injuns, not finding me in my
wigwam, might lie in wait round about it,
expecting
my return, and so delaying the attack upon
friend Ashburn's house; whereby I might have
time to reach him, and warn him of his danger
again; and this idea prevailed with me, so that I rose
me up again, and, with little Peter at my side, I
ran back again, until I had reached this very field;
when Peter gave me to know the Injuns were
hard by. Thee don't know little Peter, friend;
truly, he has the strongest nose for an Injun thee
ever saw. Does thee not hear how he whines and
snuffs along the grass? Now, friend, were it not
that this is a bloody spot that Peter remembers
well, because of the wicked deeds he saw
performed
,
I would know by his whining, as truly as
if he were to open his mouth and say as much in
words, that there were evil Injuns nigh at hand,
and that it behooved me to be up and a-doing.
Well, friend, as I was saying,it was with such
words as these that little Peter told me that
mischief
was nigh; and, truly, I had scarce time to
hide me in the corn, which was then in the ear,
before I heard the direful yells with which the
blood-thirsty creatures, who were then round about
the house, woke up its frighted inmates. Verily,
friend, I will not shock thee by telling thee what I
heard and saw. There was a fate on the family,
and even on the animals that looked to it for
protection
.
Neither horse nor cow gave them the
alarm; and even the house-dog slept so soundly,
that the enemies dragged loose brush into the porch
and fired it, before any one but themselves
dreamed
of danger. It was when the flames burst out
that the warwhoop was sounded; and when the
eyes of the sleepers opened, it was only to see
themselves surrounded both by flames and raging
Shawnees. Then, friend, continued Nathan,
speaking with a faltering and low voice, graduated
for the ears of Roland, for whom alone the story
was intended, though others caught here and there
some of its dismal revealments, then, thee may
think, there was rushing out of men, women, and
children, with the cracking of rifles, the crashing
of hatchets, the plunge of knives, with yells and
shrieks such as would turn thee spirit into ice and
water, to hear. It was a fearful massacre; but,
friend, fearful as it was, these eyes of mine had
looked on one more dreadful before: thee would
not believe it, friend, but thee knows not what
them see, who have spent their lives on the Injun
border.Well, friend, continued the narrator,
after this brief digression, while they were
murdering
the stronger, I saw the weakest of all,
the old grandam, with the youngest babe in her
arms, come flying into the corn; and she had
reached this very tree that has fallen but now, as
if to remind me of the story, when the pursuer,
for it was but a single man they sent in chase of
the poor feeble old woman, caught up with her,
and struck her down with his tomahawk. Then,
friend,for, truly, I saw it all in the light of the
fire, being scarce two rods off,he snatched the
poor babe from the dying woman's arms, and
struck it with the same bloody hatchet.
And you! exclaimed Roland, leaning from
his horse and clutching the speaker by the collar,
for he was seized with ungovernable indignation,
or rather fury, at what he esteemed the
coldblooded
cowardice of Nathan,
You!
he cried,
grasping him as if he would have torn him to
pieces, You, wretch! stood by and saw the
child murdered!
Friend! said Nathan, with some surprise at
the unexpected assault, but still with great
submissiveness
,
thee is as unjust to me as others.
Had I been as free to shed blood as thee theeself,
yet could I not have saved the babe in that way,
seeing that my gun was taken from me, and I was
unarmed. Thee forgets,or rather I forgot to
inform thee,how, when I told friend Bruce my
story, he took my gun from me, saying that `as I
was not man enough to use it, I should not be
allowed
to carry it,' and so turned me out naked
from the fort. Truly, it was an ill thing of him
to take from me that which gave me my meat;
and, truly too, it was doubly ill of him, as it
concerned
the child; for I tell thee, friend, when I
stood in the corn and saw the great brutal Injun
raise the hatchet to strike the little child, had
there been a gun in my hand, I shouldI can't
tell thee, friend, what I might have done; but,
truly, I should not have permitted the evil
creature
to do the bloody deed!
I thought so, by heaven! said Roland, who
had relaxed his grasp, the moment Nathan
mentioned
the seizure of the gun, which story was
corroborated
by the account Bruce had himself
given of that stretch of authority,I thought
so: no human creature, not an Indian, unless the
veriest dastard and dog that ever lived, could have
had arms in his hand, and, on such an occasion,
failed to use them! But you had humanity,
you did something?
Friend, said Nathan, meekly, I did what I
could,but, truly, what could I? Nevertheless,
friend, I did, being set beside myself by the sight,
snatch the little babe out of the man's hands, and
fly to the woods, hoping, though it was sore
wounded, that it might yet live. But alas, before
I had run a mile, it died in my arms, and I was
covered from head to foot with its blood. It was
a sore sight for friend Bruce, whom I found with
his people galloping to the ford, to see what there
might be in my story: for, it seems, as he told me
himself, that, after he had driven me away, he
could not sleep for thinking that perhaps I had
told the truth. And truth enough, he soon found,
I had spoken; for, galloping immediately to
Ashburn's
house, he found nothing there but the corses
of the people, and the house partly consumed,
for, being of green timber, it could not all burn.
There was not one of the poor family that
escaped
.
But they were avenged? muttered the
soldier
.
If thee calls killing the killers avenging, replied
Nathan, the poor deceased people had vengeance
enough. Of the fourteen murderers, for that was
the number, eleven were killed before day-dawn,
the pursuers having discovered where they had
built their fire, and so taken them by surprise;
and of the three that escaped, it was afterwards
said by returning captives, that only one made his
way home, the other two having perished in the
woods, in some way unknown.But, truly,
continued
VOL. I.16
Nathan, suddenly diverting his attention
from the tragic theme to the motions of his dog,
little Peter is more disturbed than is his wont.
Truly, he has never had a liking to the spot: I
have heard them that said a dog could scent the
presence of spirits!
To my mind, said Roland, who had not
forgotten
Nathan's eulogium on the excellence of the
animal's nose for scenting Indians, and who was
somewhat alarmed at what appeared to him the
evident uneasiness of little Peter, he is more like
to wind another party of cursed Shawnees, than
any harmless disembodied spirits.
Friend, said Nathan, it may be that Injuns
have trodden upon this field this day, seeing that
the wood is full of them; and it is like enough that
those very evil creatures at the ford hard-by have
stolen hither, before taking their post, to glut their
eyes with the sight of the ruins, where the blood
of nine poor white persons was shed by their
brothers in a single night; though, truly, in that
case, they must have also thought of the thirteen
murderers that bled for the victims; which would
prove somewhat a drawback to their satisfaction.
No, friend: Peter has his likes and his dislikes,
like a human being; and this is a spot he ever
approaches with abhorrence,as, truly, I do
myself
,
never coming hither, unless when driven, as
now, by necessity. But, friend, if thee is in fear,
thee shall be satisfied there is no danger before
thee: it shall never be said that I undertook to
lead thee poor women out of mischief, only to
plunge them into peril. I will go before thee to
the ruin, which thee sees there by the hollow, and
reconnoitre.
It needs not, said Roland, who now seeing
the cabin of which they were in search close at
hand, and perceiving that Peter's uneasiness had
subsided, dismissed his own as being groundless.
But notwithstanding, he thought proper, as
Nathan
advanced, to ride forward himself, and
inspect
the condition of the building, in which he
was about to commit the safety of the being he
held most dear, and on whose account, only, he
felt the thousand anxieties and terrors he never
could have otherwise experienced.
The building was a low cabin of logs, standing,
as it seemed, on the verge of an abyss, in which
the river could be heard dashing tumultuously, as
if among rocks and other obstructions. It was
one of those double cabins so frequently found in
the west; that is to say, it consisted of two
separate
cots, or wings, standing a little distance apart,
but united by a common roof; which thus afforded
shelter to the open hall, or passage, between them;
while the roof being continued also from the
eaves, both before and behind, in
pent-house-fashion
,
it allowed space for wide porches, in
which, and in the open passage, the summer
traveller
,
resting in such a cabin, will always find
the most agreeable quarters.
How little soever of common wisdom and
discretion
the fate of the builders might have shown
them to possess, they had not forgotten to provide
their solitary dwelling with such defences as were
common to all others in the land at that period.
A line of palisades, carelessly and feebly
constructed
indeed, but perhaps sufficient for the purpose
intended, enclosed the ground on which the cabin
stood; and this being placed directly in the centre,
and joining it at the sides, thus divided it into two
little yards, one in front the other in the rear, in
which was space sufficient for horses and cattle,
as well as for the garrison, when called to repel
assailants. The enclosure behind extended to
the verge of the river-bank, which, falling down
a sheer precipice of forty or fifty feet, required
no defence of stakes, and seemed never to have
been provided with them; while that in front
circumscribed
a portion of a cleared field entirely
destitute of trees, and almost of bushes.
Such had been the original plan and condition
of a fortified private-dwelling, a favourable
specimen
,
perhaps, of the
family-forts
of the day, and
which, manned by five or six active and
courageous
defenders, might have bidden defiance to
thrice the number of barbarians that had actually
succeeded in storming it. Its present appearance
was ruinous and melancholy in the extreme. The
stockade was in great part destroyed, especially
in front, where the stakes seemed to have been
rooted up by the winds, or to have fallen from
sheer decay: and the right wing or cot, that
had suffered most from the flames, lay a
blackened
and mouldering pile of logs, confusedly
heaped on its floor, or on the earth beneath. The
only part of the building yet standing was the
cot on the left hand, which consisted of but a
single room, and that, as Roland perceived at a
glance, almost roofless and ready to fall.
Nothing could be more truly cheerless and
forbidding
than the appearance of the ruined pile;
and the hoarse and dismal rush of the river
below
,
heard the more readily by reason of a deep
rocky fissure, or ravine, running from the rear
yard to the water's edge, through which the
sound ascended in hollow echoes, added double
horror to its appearance. It was, moreover,
obviously
insecure and untenable against any
resolute
enemy, to whom the ruins of the fallen wing
and stockade and the rugged depths of the
ravine
offered much more effectual shelter, as well
as the best place of annoyance. The
repugnance
,
however, that Roland felt to occupy it
even for a few hours, was combatted by
Nathan
,
who represented that the ford at which
he designed crossing the river, several miles
farther down, could not be safely attempted until
the rise of the waning moon, or until the clouds
should disperse, affording them the benefit of the
dim star-light; that the road to it ran through
swamps and hollows, now submerged, in which
could be found no place of rest for the females,
exhausted by fatigue and mental suffering; and
that the ruin might be made as secure as the
Station
the travellers had left; for truly, said he,
it is not according to my ways or conscience to
leave any thing to chance or good luck, when
there is Injun scent in the forest, though it be
in the forest ten miles off. Truly, friend, I
design
,
when thee poor tired women is sleeping, to
keep watch round the ruin, with Peter to help
me; and if theeself and thee two male persons
have strength to do the same, it will be all the
better for the same.
It shall be done, said Roland, as much
relieved
by the suggestion as he was pleased by the
humane spirit that prompted it: my two soldiers
can watch, if they cannot fight, and I shall take
care they watch well.
Thus composing the difficulty, preparations
were immediately made to occupy the ruin, into
which Roland, having previously entered with
Emperor, and struck a light, introduced his weary
kinswoman with her companion Telie; while
Nathan
16*
and Pardon Dodge led the horses into the
ravine, where they could be easily confined, and
allowed to browse and drink at will, being at the
same time beyond the reach of observation from
any foe that might be yet prowling through the
forest.
CHAPTER XIV.
The
light struck by the negro was soon
succeeded
by a fire, for which ample materials lay
ready at hand among the ruins; and as it blazed
up from the broken and long deserted hearth, the
travellers could better view the dismal aspect of
the cabin. It consisted, as has been mentioned, of
but a single remaining apartment, with walls of
logs, from whose chinks the clay, with which they
had been originally plastered, had long since
vanished
,
with here and there a fragment of a log
itself, leaving a thousand gaps for the admission
of wind and rain. The ceiling of poles (for it had
once possessed a kind of garret) had fallen down
under the weight of the rotting roof, of which but
a small portion remained, and that in the craziest
condition; and the floor of
puncheons,
or planks
of split logs, was in a state of equal dilapidation,
more than half of it having rotted away, and
mingled with the earth on which it reposed.
Doors and windows there were none; but two
mouldering gaps in the front and the rear walls,
and another of greater magnitude opening from
the side into what had once been the hall or
passage
,
(though now a platform heaped with
fragments
of charred timber,) showed where the
narrow
entrance and loop-hole windows had once
existed. The former was without leaf or defence
of any kind, unless such might have been found
in three or four logs standing against the wall hard
by, whence they could be easily removed and
piled against the opening; for which purpose,
Roland
did not doubt they had been used, and by
the houseless Nathan himself. But a better
protection
was offered by the ruins of the other
apartment
,
which had fallen down in such a way as
almost to block up the door, leaving a passage in
and out, only towards the rear of the building;
and, in case of sudden attack and seizure of this
sole entrance, there were several gaps at the
bottom
of the wall, through one of which, in
particular
,
it would be easy enough to effect a retreat.
At this place, the floor was entirely wanting, and
the earth below washed into a gully
communicating
with the rocky ravine, of which it might be
considered the head.
But the looks of the soldier did not dwell long
upon the dreary spectacle of ruin; they were
soon cast upon the countenance of Edith,
concealed
so long by darkness. It was even wanner
and paler than he feared to find it, and her eye
shone with an unnatural lustre, as it met his own.
She extended her hands and placed them in his,
gazed upon him piercingly, but without speaking,
or indeed seeming able to utter, a single word.
Be of good heart, he said, replying to the
look of inquiry; we are unfortunate, Edith, but
we are safe.
Thank Heaven! she exclaimed, but more
wildly than fervently: I have been looking every
moment to see you shot dead at my feet! Would
I had died, Roland, my brother, before I brought
you to this fatal landBut I distress you! Well,
I will not be frightened more. But is not this an
adventure for a woman that never before looked
upon a cut finger without fainting? Truly,
Roland
,`truly,'
as friend Nathan says,it is as
ridiculous as frightful: and then this cabin, where
they killed so many poor women and children,
is it not a ridiculous lodging place for Edith
Forrester
?
a canopy of clouds, a couch of clay, with
owls and snakes for my bed-fellowstruly, truly,
truly, it is very ridiculous!
It seemed, for a moment, as if the maiden's
effort
to exchange her melancholy and terror for a
more joyous feeling, would have resulted in
producing
even greater agitation than before; but
the soothing words of Roland, and the
encouraging
countenance maintained by Telie Doe, who
seemed little affected by their forlorn situation,
gradually tranquillized her mind, and enabled her
the better to preserve the air of levity and
mirthfulness
,
which she so vainly attempted at first to
assume. This moment of calm Roland took
advantage
of to apprise her of the necessity of
recruiting
her spirits with a few hours' sleep; for
which purpose he began to look about him for
some suitable place in which to strew her a bed
of fern and leaves.
Why, here is one strewn for me already, she
cried, with an affected laugh, pointing to a corner,
in which lay a mass of leaves so green and fresh
that they looked as if plucked but a day or two
before; truly, Nathan has not invited me to his
hiding-place to lodge me meanly; (Heaven
forgive
me for laughing at the poor man; for we
owe him our lives!) nay, nor to send me
supperless
to bed. See! she added, pointing to a small
brazen kettle, which her quick eye detected among
the leaves, and which was soon followed by a
second that Emperor stirred up from its
concealment
,
and both of them, as was soon perceived,
still retaining the odour of a recent savoury stew:
Look well, Emperor: where the kitchen is, the
larder cannot be far distant. I warrant me we
shall find that Nathan has provided us a good
supper.
Such, perhaps, as a woodman only can eat,
said Roland, who, somewhat surprised at the
superfluous
number of Nathan's valuables, (for to
Nathan, he doubted not, they belonged,) had
begun
stirring the leaves, and succeeded in raking
up with his rifle, which he had not laid aside, a
little earthen pouch, well stored with parched
corn: A strange fellow, this Nathan, he
muttered
:
he really spoke as if he had not visited
the ruin for a considerable period; whereas it is
evident he must have slept here last night. But he
seems to affect mystery in all that concerns his
own private movementsIt is the character of
his persuasion.
While Roland with the females, was thus
laying
hands, and speculating, upon the supposed
chattels of their conductor, Nathan himself
entered
the apartment, betraying some degree of
agitation
in his countenance; whilst the faithful Peter,
who followed at his side, manifested equal
uneasiness
,
by snuffing the air, whining, and rubbing
himself frequently against his master's legs.
Friends, he cried, abruptly, Peter talks too
plainly to be mistaken: there is mischief nigh at
hand, though where, or how it can be, sinner and
weak foolish man that I am, I know not: we must
leave warm fires and soft beds, and take refuge
again in the woods.
This unexpected announcement again banished
the blood from Edith's cheeks. She had, on his
entrance, caught the pouch of corn from Roland's
hands, intending to present it to the guide, with
some such light expressions as should convince
her kinsman of her recovered spirits; but the
visage and words of Nathan struck her dumb,
and she stood holding it in her hand, without
speaking a word, until it caught Nathan's eye.
He snatched it from her grasp, surveying it with
astonishment and even alarm, and only ceased to
look at it, when little Peter, who had run into the
corner and among the bed of leaves, uttered a
whine louder than before. The pouch dropped
from Nathan's hand as his eye fell upon the
shining
kettles, on which he gazed as if petrified.
What, in Heaven's name, is the matter?
demanded
Roland, himself taking the alarm: are
you frighted at your own kettles?
Mine! cried Nathan, clasping his hands, and
looking terror and remorse togetherIf thee
will kill me, friend, thee will scarce do amiss; for,
miserable, blind sinner that I am, I have led thee
poor luckless women into the very lion's den! into
the hiding-place and head-quarters of the very
cut-throats that is seeking to destroy thee! Up
and awaydoes thee not hear Peter howling at
the door? Hist! Peter, hist!Truly, this is a pretty
piece of business for thee, Nathan Slaughter!
Does thee not hear them close at hand?
I hear the hooting of an owl and the answer
of his fellow, replied Roland; but his words were
cut short by a second howl from Peter, and the
cry of his master, Up, if thee be not besotted;
drag thee women by the hands, and follow me.
With these words, Nathan was leaping towards
the door, when a cry from Roland arrested him.
He looked round and perceived Edith had fainted
in the soldier's arms. I will save the poor thing
for theehelp thou the other, he cried, and
snatching her up as if she had been but a feather,
he was again in the act of springing to the door,
when brought to a stand by a far more exciting
impediment. A shriek from Telie Doe, uttered in
sudden terror, was echoed by a laugh, strangely
wild, harsh, guttural, and expressive of equal
triumph and derision, coming from the door;
looking to which, the eyes of Nathan and the
soldier
fell upon a tall and naked Indian, shorn and
painted, who, rifle in hand, the grim smile yet
writhing on his features, and exclaiming with a
mockery of friendly accost,
Bo-zhoo,
*
*
Bo-zhoo,
a corruption of the French
bon jour,
a word of
salutation adopted by Western Indians from the
Voyageurs
of Canada, and used by them with great zeal by night as well
as by day.
brudders,
Injun good friend! was stepping that moment
into the hovel; and as if that spectacle and those
sounds were not enough to chill the heart's blood
of the spectators, there were seen over his
shoulders, the gleaming eyes, and heard behind
his back, the malign laughter of three or four
equally wild and ferocious companions.
To the door, if thee is a man,rush! cried
Nathan, with a voice more like the blast of a
bugle than the tone of a frighted man of peace;
and casting Edith from his arms, he set the
example
of attack or flightRoland scarcely knew
which,by leaping against the breast of the daring
intruder. Both fell together across the threshold,
and Roland, obeying the call with desperate and
frantic ardour, stumbled over their bodies,
pitching
headlong into the passage, whereby he
escaped
the certain death that otherwise awaited
him, three several rifle shots having been that
instant
poured upon him from a distance of scarce
as many feet.
Strike, if thee conscience permits thee! he
heard the voice of Nathan cry in his ears, and
the next moment, a shot from the interior of the
hovel, heralded by a quavering cry from the
faithful
Emperor,Lorra-gor! nebber harm an
Injun
in my life! struck the hatchet from the
shattered
hand of a foeman, who had taken
advantage
of his downfall to aim a fatal blow at him
while rising. A yell of pain came from the
maimed and baffled warrior, who, springing over
the blackened ruins before the door, escaped the
stroke of the clubbed rifle which the soldier aimed
at him in return, the piece having been discharged
by the fall. The cry of the flying assailant was
echoed by what seemed in Roland's ears the yells
of fifty supporters, two of whom he saw within
six feet of him, brandishing their hatchets, as if
in the act of flinging them at his almost
defenceless
person. It was at this moment that he
experienced
aid from a quarter whence it was
almost least expected; a rifle was discharged
from the ravine, and as one of the fierce foes
suddenly
dropped, mortally wounded, upon the floor,
he heard the voice of Pardon, the Yankee,
crying
,
in tones of desperation, When there's no
dodging 'em, then I'm the man for 'em, or it an't
no matter!
Bravo! bravely done, Emperor and Dodge
both! cried Roland, to whom this happy and
quite unexpected display of courage from his
followers
,
and its successful results, imparted a
degree
of assurance and hope not before felt; for,
indeed, up to this moment, his feeling had been
the mere frenzy of despair; courage, and rush
on! And with these words, he did not hesitate
to dash against the remaining foe, striking up the
uplifted hatchet with his rifle, and endeavouring
with the same effort to dash his weapon into the
warrior's face. But the former part only of the
VOL. I.17
manuvre succeeded; the tomahawk was indeed
dashed aside, but the rifle was torn from his own
grasp, and the next moment he was clutched as
in the embrace of a bear, and pressed with
suffocating
force upon the breast of his undaunted
adversary.
Brudder! growled the savage, and the foam
flew from his grinning lips, advanced until they
were almost in contact with the soldier's face,
Brudder! he cried, as he felt his triumph, and
twined his arms still more tightly around Roland's
frame, Long-knife nothing! hab a scalp,
Shawnee
!
With these words, he sprang from the broken
floor of the passage, on which the encounter
began
,
and dragging the soldier along, made as if
he would have carried him off alive. But
although
in the grasp of a man of much superior
strength, the resolution and activity of Roland
preserved him from a destiny at once so fearful
and ignoble. He exerted the strength he
possessed
at the instant when the bulky captor was
springing from the floor to the broken ground
beneath, and with such effect, that, though it did
not entirely release him from his grasp, it
carried
them headlong to the earth together; whence,
after a brief and blind struggle, both rose
together
,
each clutching at the weapon that promised
soonest to terminate the contest. The pistols of
the soldier, which, as well as Emperor's, the
peaceful Nathan had taken the precaution to carry
with him into the ruin, had been forgotten in the
suddenness and hurry of the assault; his rifle had
been wrested from his hands, and thrown he
knew not where. The knife, which, like a true
adventurer of the forest, he had buckled in his
belt, was ready to be grasped; but the instinct of
long habits carried his hand to the broad-sword,
which was yet strapped to his thigh; and this, as
he rose, he attempted to draw, not doubting that
a single blow of the trusty steel would rid him of
his brown enemy. But the Shawnee, as bold, as
alert, and far more discreet, better acquainted,
too, with those savage personal rencontres which
make up so large a portion of Indian warfare,
had drawn his knife before he had yet regained
his footing; and before the Virginian's sword was
half unsheathed, the hand that tugged at it was
again seized and held as in a vice, while the
warrior, elevating his own free weapon above his
head, prepared, with a laugh and whoop of
triumph
,
to plunge it into the soldier's throat. His
countenance, grim with war-paint, grimmer still
with ferocious exultation, was distinctly
perceived
,
the bright blaze of the fire shining through the
gaps of the hovel, so as to illuminate every
feature
;
and Roland, as he strove in vain to clutch
at the uplifted arm so as to avert the threatened
blow, could distinguish every motion of the
weapon
and every change of his foeman's visage.
But he did not even then despair, for he was in
all circumstances affecting only himself, a man of
true intrepidity; and it was only when, on a
sudden
,
the light wholly vanished from the hovel, as
if the brands had been scattered and trodden out,
that he began to anticipate a fatal result from the
advantage possessed by his opponent. But at that
very instant, and while, blinded by the sudden
darkness, he was expecting the blow which he no
longer knew how to avoid, the laugh of the
warrior, now louder and more exultant than
before
,
was suddenly changed to a yell of agony.
A jet of warm blood, at the same moment,
gushed
over Roland's right arm; and the savage,
struck by an unknown hand, or by a random ball,
fell a dead man at his feet, overwhelming the
soldier
in his fall.
Up, and do according to thee conscience!
cried Nathan Slaughter; whose friendly arm,
more nervous than that of his late foe, at this
conjuncture
jerked Roland from beneath the body;
for truly, thee fights like unto a young lion, or
an old bear; and, truly, I will not censure thee, if
thee kills a whole dozen of the wicked cut-throats!
Here is thee gun and thee pistols: fire and shout
aloud with thee voice; for, of a verity, thee
enemies
is confounded by thee resolution: do thee
make them believe thee has been reinforced by
numbers.
And with that, the peaceful Nathan, uplifting
his voice, and springing among the ruins from
log to log, began to utter a series of shouts, all
designed to appear as if coming from different
throats, and all expressing such manly courage
and defiance, that even Pardon Dodge, who yet
lay ensconced among the rocks of the ravine, and
Emperor, the negro, who, it seems, had taken post
behind the ruins at the door, felt their spirits wax
resolute and valiant, and added their voices to the
din, the one roaring, Come on, ye 'tarnal
critturs
,
if you
must
come! while the other
bellowed
,
with equal spirit, Don't care for niggah Injun
no waywill fight and die for massa and
missie!
All these several details, from the moment of
the appearance of the warrior at the door until
the loud shouts of the besieged travellers took the
place of the savage whoops previously sounded,
passed in fewer moments than we have taken
pages to record them. The rush of Nathan
against the leader, the discomfiture of one, and
the death of his two other comrades, were indeed
the work of but an instant, as it seemed to
Roland
;
and he was scarce aware of the assault,
before he perceived that it was over. The
successful
,
and, doubtless, the wholly unexpected,
resistance
of the little party, resulting in a manner
so fatal to the advanced guard of assailants, had
struck terror and confusion into the main body,
whose presence had been only made known by
their yells, not a single shot having yet been fired
by them.
It was in this moment of confusion that Nathan
sprang to the side of Roland, who was hastily
recharging
his piece, and catching him by the hand,
said, with a voice that betrayed the deepest
agitation
,
though his countenance was veiled in night,
Friend, I have betrayed thee poor women into
danger, so that the axe and scalping-knife is now
near their innocent poor heads!
It needs not to speak of it, said Roland;
adding
hastily, The miscreant that entered the
cabindid you kill him?
Kill,
friend!
I
kill! echoed Nathan, with
accents
more disturbed than ever; would thee have
me a murderer? Truly, I did creep over him,
and leave the cabin.
And left him in it alive! cried Roland, who
was about to rush into the hovel, when Nathan
detained him, saying, Don't thee be alarmed,
friend. Truly, thee may think it was ill of me to
fall upon him so violently; but, truly, he must
have split his head on a log, or wounded himself
with a splinter;or perhaps the coloured person
stuck him with a knife; but, truly, as it
happened
,
his blood spouted on my hand, by reason of
the hurt he got; so that I left him clean dead.
Good! said Roland; but, by Heaven, I
17*
hoped and believed you had yourself finished him
like a man. But time presses: we must retreat
again to the woods,they are yet open behind
us.
Thee is mistaken, said Nathan; and, as if to
confirm his words, there arose at that instant a
loud whooping, with the crack of a dozen or more
rifles, let fly with impotent rage by the enemy,
showing plainly enough that the ruin was already
actually environed.
The ravine,the river! cried Forrester; we
can swim it with the horses, if it be not
fordable
.
It is a torrent that would sweep thee, with thee
strongest war-horse, to perdition, muttered
Nathan
:
does thee not hear how it roars among
the rocks and cliffs? It is here deep, narrow, and
rocky; and, though, in the season of drought, a
child might step across it from rock to rock, it is
a cataract in the time of floods. No, friend; I
have brought thee into a trap whence thee has no
escape, unless thee would desert thee poor helpless
women.
Put but them in safety, said Roland, and
care not for the rest.And yet I do not despair:
we have shown what we can do by resolution:
we can keep the cut-throats at bay till the
morning
.
And what will that advantage thee, except to
see thee poor females murdered in the light of
the sun, instead of having them killed out of thee
sight in darkness? Truly, the first glimmer of
dawn will be the signal of death to all; for then
the Shawnees will find thee weakness, if indeed
they do not find it before.
Man! said Roland, why should you drive
me to despair? Give me better comfort,give me
counsel, or say no more. You have brought us to
this pass: do your best to save us, or our blood be
upon your head.
To these words of unjust reproach, wrung from
the young soldier by the bitterness of his feelings,
Nathan at first made no reply. Preserving silence
for awhile, he said, at last,
Well, friend, I counsel thee to be of good
heart, and to do what thee can, making thee
enemies
,
since thee cannot increase thee friends, as
few in numbers as possible; to do which, friend,
he added, suddenly, if thee will shoot that evil
creature that lies like a log on the earth, creeping
towards the ruin, I will have no objection!
With these words, which were uttered in a low
voice, Nathan, pulling the young man behind a
screen of fallen timbers near to which they stood,
endeavoured to point him out the enemy whom
his eye had that moment detected crawling
towards
the hovel with the subtle motion of a
serpent
.
But the vision of Roland, not yet
accustomed
to trace objects in the darkness of a wood,
failed to discover the approaching foe.
Truly, said Nathan, somewhat impatiently,
if thee will not consider it as an evil thing of
me, and a blood-guiltiness, I will hold thee gun for
thee, and thee shall pull the trigger!which
piece of service the man of peace, having
doubtless
satisfied his conscience of its lawfulness, was
actually about to render the soldier, when the
good intention was set at naught by the savage
suddenly leaping to his feet, followed by a dozen
others, all springing, as it seemed, out of the
earth, and rushing with wild yells against the
ruin. The suddenness and fury of the attack
struck dismay to the bosom of the soldier, who
discharging his rifle, and snatching up his pistols,
already in imagination beheld the bloody fingers
of a barbarian grasped among the bright locks of
his Edith; when Nathan, crying, Blood upon
my hands, but not upon my head!give it to
them, murdering dogs! let fly his own piece upon
the throng; the effect of which, together with the
discharge of Roland's pistols immediately after,
was such as to stagger the assailants, of whom
but a single one preserved resolution enough to
advance upon the defenders, whooping to his
companions
in vain to follow. Thee will remember I
fight to save the lives of thee helpless women!
muttered Nathan, in Roland's ear; and then, as if
the first act of warfare had released him for ever
from all peaceful obligations, awoke a courage and
appetite for blood superior even to the soldier's,
and, in other words, set him entirely beside
himself
,
he rushed against the advancing Shawnee,
dealing him a blow with the butt of his
heavy-stocked
rifle that crushed through skull and brain
as through a gourd, killing the man on the spot.
Then, leaping like a buck to avoid the shot of the
others, he rushed back to the ruin, and grasping
the hand of the admiring soldier, and wringing it
with all his might, he cried, Thee sees what thee
has brought me to! Friend, thee has seen me shed
a man's blood!But, nevertheless, friend, the
villains
shall not kill thee poor women, nor harm a
hair of their heads.
The valour of the man of peace was fortunately
seconded on this occasion by Dodge and the
negro
,
the former from his hiding place in the ravine,
the latter from among the ruins; and the enemy,
thus seriously warned of the danger of
approaching
too nigh a fortress manned by what very
naturally appeared to them eight different
persons
,for
such, including the pistols, was the
number of fire-arms,retired precipitately to the
woods, where they expressed their hostility only
by occasional whoops, and now and then by a shot
fired impotently against the ruins.
The success of this second defence, the spirited
behaviour of Dodge and Emperor, but more than
all the happy change in the principles and practice
of Nathan, who seemed as if about to prove that
he could deserve the nickname of Bloody, so long
bestowed upon him in derision, greatly relieved
the spirits of the soldier, who was not without
hopes of being able to maintain the contest until
the enemy should be discouraged and driven off,
or some providential accident bring him succour.
He took advantage of the cessation of hostilities,
to creep into the hovel and whisper words of
assurance
to his feebler dependants, of whom indeed
Telie Doe now betrayed the greatest distress and
agitation, while Edith on the contrary maintained,
as he judgedfor the fire was extinguished, and
he saw not her countenancea degree of
tranquility
he had not dared to hope. It was a
tranquility
,
however, resulting from despair and
stupor,a lethargy of spirit, resulting from
overwrought
feelings, in which she happily remained,
more than half unconscious of what was passing
around her.
CHAPTER XV.
The
enemy, twice repulsed, and on both
occasions
with severe loss, had been taught the folly
of exposing themselves too freely to the fire of the
travellers; but although driven back, they
manifested
little inclination to fly further than was
necessary
to obtain shelter, and as little to give over
their fierce purposes. Concealing themselves
severally behind logs, rocks, and bushes, and so
disposing their force as to form a line around the
ruin, open only towards the river, where escape
was obviously impracticable, they employed
themselves
keeping a strict watch upon the hovel,
firing repeated volleys, and as often uttering yells,
with which they sought to strike terror into the
hearts of the travellers. Occasionally some
single
warrior, bolder than the rest, would creep
near the ruins, and obtaining such shelter as he
could, discharge his piece at any mouldering
beam, or other object, which his fancy converted
into the exposed body of a defender. But the
travellers had taken good care to establish
themselves
in such positions among the ruins as offered
the best protection; and although the bullets
whistled sharp and nigh, not a single one had yet
received a wound; nor was there much reason to
apprehend injury, so long as the darkness of night
befriended them.
Yet it was obvious to all, that this state of
security
could not last long, and that it existed only
because the enemy was not yet aware of his
advantage
.
The condition of the ruins was such
that a dozen men of sufficient spirit, dividing
themselves, and creeping along the earth, might,
at any moment make their way to any and every
part of the hovel, without being seen; when a
single rush must put it in their power. An open
assault, indeed, from the whole body of besiegers,
whose number was reckoned by Nathan at full
fifteen or twenty, must have produced the same
success, though with the loss of several lives. A
random shot might at any moment destroy or
disable
one of the little garrison, and thus rob one
important corner of the hovel, which from its
dilapidated
state, was wholly indefensible from
within
,
of defence. It was, indeed, as Roland felt,
more than folly to hope that all should escape
unharmed
for many hours longer. But the worst
fear of all was that previously suggested by
Nathan
:
all might survive the perils of the night;
but what fate was to be expected, when the
coming
of day should expose the party, in all its true
weakness, to the eyes of the enemy? If relief
came not before morning, Roland's heart
whispered
him, it must come in vain. But the
probabilities
of relief,what were they? The question
was asked of Nathan, and the answer went like
iron through Roland's soul. They were in the
deepest and most solitary part of the forest,
twelve miles from Bruce's Station, and at least
eight from that at which the emigrants were to
lodge; with no other places within twice the
distance
,
from which help could be obtained. They
had left, three or four miles behind, the main and
only road on which volunteers, summoned from
the Western Stations to repel the invasion, of
which, the news had arrived before Roland's
departure
from Bruce's village, could be expected to
pass; if indeed the strong force of the enemy
posted at the Upper Ford had not cut off all
communication
between the two districts. From
Bruce's Station, little or no assistance could be
hoped, the entire strength of its garrison, as
Roland
well knew, having long since departed to
share in the struggle on the north side of
Kentucky
.
Assistance could be looked for only from
his late companions, the emigrants, from whom
he had parted in an evil hour. But how were
they to be made acquainted with his situation?
The discussion of these questions almost
distracted
the young man. Help could only come
from themselves. Would it not be possible to cut
their way through the besiegers? He proposed a
thousand wild schemes of escape; now he would
mount his trusty steed, and dashing among the
enemy, receive their fire, distract their attention,
and perhaps draw them in pursuit, while Nathan
and the others galloped off with the women in
another quarter; and again, he would plunge
with them into the boiling torrent below,
trusting
to the strength of the horses to carry them
through in safety.
To these and other wild proposals, uttered in
the intervals of combat, which was still
maintained
,
with occasional demonstrations on the
part of the enemy of advancing to a third assault,
Nathan replied only by representing the certain
death they would bring upon all, especially `the
poor helpless women;' whose condition, with the
reflection, that he had brought them into it,
seemed
ever to dwell upon his mind, producing
feelings
of remorseful excitement not inferior even to
the compunctions which he expressed at every
shot discharged by him at the foe. Indeed his
conscience
seemed sorely distrest and perplexed;
now he upbraided himself with being the
murderer
of the two poor women, and now of his
Shawnee
fellow-creatures; now he wrung the soldier
by the hand, begging him to bear witness, that he
was shedding blood, not out of malice, or
wantonness
,
or even self-defence, but purely to save the
innocent scalps of poor women, whose blood
would be otherwise on his head; and now
beseeching
the young man with equal fervour to let the
world know of his doings, that the blame might
fall, not upon the faith of which he was an
unworthy
professor, but upon him, the evil-doer and
back-slider. But with all his remorse and
contrition
,
he manifested no inclination to give over the
work of fighting; but, on the contrary, fired
away with extreme good-will at every evil
Shawnee
creature that showed himself, encouraging
Roland to do the same, and exhibiting throughout
the whole contest the most exemplary courage
and good conduct.
But courage and good conduct, although so
unexpectedly
manifested, in the time of need, by all
his companions, Roland felt, could only serve to
defer for a few hours the fate of his party. The
night wore away fast, the assailants grew bolder;
and from the louder yells and more frequent shots
coming from them, it seemed as if their numbers,
instead of diminishing under his own fire, were
gradually increasing, by the dropping in of their
scouts from the forest. At the same time, he
became
sensible that his stores of ammunition were
fast decreasing.
Friend! said Nathan, wringing the soldier's
hand for the twentieth time, when made
acquainted
with the deficiency, it is written, that thee
VOL. I.18
women shall be murdered before thee eyes!
Nevertheless
I will do my best to save them. Friend,
I must leave thee! Thee shall have assistance.
Can thee hold out the hovel till morning?But it
is foolish to ask thee; thee
must
hold it out; and
with none save the coloured person and the man
Dodge, to help thee: for I say to thee, it has come
to this at last, as I thought it would,I must break
through the lines of thee Injun foes, and find thee
assistance.
If you but could! said Roland, grasping at
the hope; but how to pass them in safety? Hark
you, man, we can, by a show of attack on our
own part, draw a fire from the villains; and then
a horseman as familiar as yourself with the woods,
might dash through and effect his escape. We
will do this: you shall have the best horse,
Briareus
himself: worn and exhausted as he is, he will
bear you off at the top of his speed, and fall dead,
before he attempts to slacken it. With him, you
can reach the emigrants in half an hour; and
then, then, Heaven be praised! you will find men
brave and true, who will follow you as quickly to
the rescue.
It would be the better for thee poor women,
replied Nathan, if I had a fleet horse to bear me
on the way faster than I can run on my own legs;
but, truly, friend, the riding away of a man on
horseback through this crew of murdering Injuns,
is no such safe matter as thee thinks, where there
are knives and axes, as well as rifle-bullets; and
it would, besides, be the ruin of thee and thee
poor women, as showing the lessening of thee
numbers, and the fear that was on thee spirit. Of
a truth, what I do must be done in secret; thee
enemies must not know it. I must creep among
them, friend, and make my way on foot.
It is impossible, said Roland, in despair;
you will only provoke your destruction.
It may be, friend, as thee says, responded
Nathan; nevertheless, friend, for thee women's
sake, I will adventure it; for it is I, miserable
sinner
that I am, that have brought them to this
pass, and that must bring them out of it again, if
man can do it. If I succeed, and thee friends is
the men thee says, truly, then I shall save thee life
and the lives of all; if I fail, then, friend, I shall
not see the sight I have seen before,the death of
innocent, helpless women under the Injun
scalping-knife
.
Friend, I tell thee, he continued, I
must creep through thee foes; and with Heaven's
help and little Peter's, truly, it may be that I shall
creep through them successfully.
At a moment of less grief and desperation,
Roland
would have better appreciated the magnitude
of the service which Nathan thus offered to
attempt
,
and even hesitated to permit what must
have manifestly seemed the throwing away of a
human life. But the emergency was too great
to allow the operation of any but selfish
feelings
.
The existence of his companions, the life
of his Edith, depended upon procuring relief,
and this could be obtained in no other way. If the
undertaking was dangerous in the extreme, he
saw it with the eyes of a soldier, as well as a
lover; it was a feat he would himself have dared
without hesitation, could it have promised, in his
hands, any relief to his followers.
Go, then, and God be with you, he muttered,
eagerly; you have our lives in your hand. But
it will be long, long before you can reach the
band on foot. Yet do not weary or pause by the
way. I have but little wealth,but with what I
have, I will reward you.
Friend, said Nathan, proudly, what I do, I
do for no lucre of reward, but for pity of thee poor
women; for, truly, I have seen the murdering and
scalping of poor women before, and the seeing of
the same has left blood upon my head, which is a
mournful thing to think of.
Well, be not offended: do what you can
our lives may rest on a single minute.
I
will
do what I can, friend, replied Nathan;
and if I can but pass safely through thee foes,
there is scarce a horse in thee company, were it
even thee war-horse, that shall run to thee friends
more fleetly. But, friend, do thee hold out the
house; use thee powder charily; keep up the spirits
of thee two men; and be of good heart theeself,
fighting valiantly, and slaying according to thee
conscience: and then, friend, if it be Heaven's
will, I will return to thee and help thee out of thee
troubles.
With these words of encouragement, Nathan
immediately prepared for the undertaking,
desperate
as it seemed, of making his way through the
lines of the enemy. His preparations were few
and easily made, and consisted principally of
disburthening
himself of his powder and ball, which
he gave to Roland to be divided among the three
remaining combatants, in drawing up the skirts of
his leather coat, which he belted round his waist
in such way as to leave his legs free for the
peculiar
duty to which they were to be put, and in
summoning to his side little Peter, whom he had
taken the earliest opportunity to stow away in a
safe place among the ruins, where he had quietly
remained ever since; for, as Nathan said, Little
Peter's good qualities was, not in fighting, but in
taking care of his master. His rifle, although he
had robbed himself of ammunition, leaving but a
single charge in his horn and pouch, Nathan
obstinately
insisted on retaining and carrying with
him, however much it might encumber him in his
flight; and with this poised in his hand, his knife
transferred from his belt to his breast, where it
was ready to be grasped at a moment's warning,
and little Peter crouched upon the earth before
him, to guide the way, he prepared to execute his
bold purpose, with an alacrity that awoke
something
like suspicion in Roland's bosom.
If you fail me, man, he muttered, with some
agitation, as he pondered upon the effects of such
defection, if you have devised this undertaking
only to effect your own escape, deserting me,
deserting
my friends, whom you leave in such
extremity
,
abandoned to our fate,may Heaven
fail you in like manner, and that in the time of
your greatest need!
If thee knew what it was to creep through a
camp of warring Shawnees, said Nathan, with
great equanimity, thee would allow that the
cowardly and betraying man would look for
some safer way of escape. Do thee but be as
true to theeself and thee women as I will, and it
may be that all shall yet escape unharmed.
Farewell
,
friend, he continued, grasping Roland's
hand, and grasping it as one who meditated the
mean and cowardly desertion which Roland had
for a moment imputed to him, could never have
done; if I fall, I shall not hear the last shriek of
thee murdered women; if I live, and thee can
make good thee defence till morning, neither shalt
thou.
With these words, Nathan turned from the
soldier
,
setting out upon his dangerous duty with a
courage and self-devotion of which Roland did
not yet know all the merit. He threw himself
18*
upon the earth, and muttering to little Peter,
Now, Peter, as thee ever served thee master
well and truly, serve him well and truly now,
began to glide away among the ruins, making his
way from log to log and bush to bush, close
behind
the animal, who seemed to determine the
period and direction of every movement. His
course was down the river, the opposite of that
by which the party had reached the ruin, in
which quarter the woods were nighest, and
promised
the most accessible, as well as the best
shelter
;
though that could be reached only in the event
of his successfully avoiding the different
barbarians
hidden among the bushes on its border. He
soon vanished, with his dog, from the eyes of the
soldier; who now, in pursuance of instructions
previously given him by Nathan, caused his two
followers to let fly a volley among the trees, which
had the expected effect of drawing another in
return
from the foes, accompanied by their loudest
whoops of menace and defiance. In this
manner
,
Nathan, as he drew nigh the wood, was
enabled
to form correct opinions as to the different
positions of the besiegers, and to select that point
in the line which seemed the weakest; while the
attention of the foe was in a measure drawn off,
so as to give him the better opportunity of
advancing
on them unobserved. With this object in
view, a second and third volley were fired by the
little garrison; after which they ceased making
such feints of hostility, and left him as he had
directed, to his fate.
It was then that, with a beating heart,
Roland
awaited the event, and, as he began to
figure to his imagination the perils which Nathan
must necessarily encounter in the undertaking,
he listened for the shout of triumph that he feared
would, each moment, proclaim the capture or
death of his messenger. But he listened in vain,
at least, in vain for such sounds as his skill
might interpret into evidences of Nathan's fate:
he heard nothing but the occasional crack of a
rifle aimed at the ruin, with the yell of the
savage
that fired it, the rush of the breeze, the
rumbling of the thunder, and the deep-toned
echoes from the river below. There was nothing
whatever occurred, at least for a quarter of an
hour, by which he might judge what was the
issue of the enterprise: and he was beginning to
indulge the hope that Nathan had passed safely
through the besiegers, when a sudden yell of a
peculiarly wild and thrilling character, was
uttered
in the wood in the quarter in which Nathan
had fled; and this, exciting, as it seemed to do, a
prodigious sensation among his foes, filled him
with anxiety and dread. To his ears the shout
expressed fury and exultation such as might well
be felt at the sudden discovery and capture of the
luckless messenger; and his fear that such had
been the end of Nathan's undertaking was greatly
increased by what followed. The shots and
whoops suddenly ceased, and, for ten minutes or
more, all was silent, save the roar of the river,
and the whispering of the fitful breeze. They
have taken him alive, poor wretch! muttered
the soldier, and now they are forcing from him
a confession of our weakness!
It seemed as if there might be some foundation
for the suspicion; for presently a great shout burst
from the enemy, and the next moment a rush was
made against the ruin as if by the whole force of
the enemy. Fire! shouted Roland to his
companions
:
if we must die, let it be like men;
and no sooner did he behold the dark figures of
the assailants leaping among the ruins, than he
discharged his rifle and the pair of pistols which
he had reserved in his own hands, the other pair
having been divided between Dodge and the
negro
,
who used them with equal resolution, and
with an effect that Roland had not anticipated:
the assailants, apparently daunted by the weight
of the volley, seven pieces having been discharged
in rapid succession, instantly beat a retreat,
resuming
their former positions. From these,
however
,
they now maintained an almost incessant
fire; and by and by several of them, stealing
cautiously
up, effected a lodgment in a distant part of
the ruins, whence, without betraying any especial
desire to come to closer quarters, they began to
carry on the war in a manner that greatly
increased
Roland's alarm, their bullets flying about
and into the hovel so thickly that he became
afraid lest some of them should reach its hapless
inhabitants. He was already debating within
himself the propriety of transferring Edith and
her companion from this ruinous and now
dangerous
abode to the ravine, where they might be
sheltered from all danger, at least for a time,
when a bolt of lightning, as he at first thought it,
shot from the nearest group of foes, flashed over
his head, and striking what remained of the roof,
stood trembling in it, an arrow of blazing fire.
The appearance of this missile, followed, as it
immediately was, by several others discharged
from the same bow, confirmed the soldier's
resolution
to remove the females, while it greatly
increased
his anxiety; for although there was little
fear that the flames could be communicated from
the arrows to the roof so deeply saturated by the
late rains, yet each, while burning, served, like a
flambeau, to illuminate the ruins below, and must
be expected before long to reveal the helplessness
of the party, and to light the besiegers to their
prey.
With such fears on his mind, he hesitated no
longer to remove his cousin and her companion
to the ravine; which was effected with but little
risk or difficulty, the ravine heading, as was
mentioned
before, under the floor of the hovel itself,
and its borders being so strewn with broken
timbers
and planks, as to screen the party from
observation
.
He concealed them both among the
rocks and brambles with which the hollow
abounded, listened a moment to the rush of the
flood as it swept the precipitous bank, and the
roar with which it seemed struggling among
rocky obstructions above, and smiling with the
grim thought, that, when resistance was no longer
availing, there was yet a refuge for his
kinswoman
within the dark bosom of those troubled
waters, to which he felt, with the stern resolution
of a Roman father rather than of a christian
lover, that he could, when nothing else remained,
consign her with his own hands, he returned to
the ruins, to keep up the appearance of still
defending
it, and to preserve the entrance of the
ravine.
CHAPTER XVI.
The
flaming arrows were still shot in vain at
the water-soaked roof, and the combustibles with
which they were armed, burning out very rapidly,
produced but little of that effect in illuminating
the ruins which Roland had apprehended, and for
which they had been perhaps in part designed;
and, in consequence, the savages soon ceased to
shoot them. A more useful ally to the besiegers
was promised in the moon, which was now rising
over the woods, and occasionally revealing her
wan and wasted crescent through gaps in the
clouds. Waning in her last quarter, and
struggling
amid banks of vapour, she yet retained
sufficient
magnitude and lustre, when risen a few
more degrees, to dispel the almost sepulchral
darkness that had hitherto invested the ruins, and
thus proved a more effectual protection to the
travellers than their own courage. Of this Roland
was well aware, and he watched the increasing
light with sullen and gloomy forbodings, though
still exhorting his two supporters to hope and
courage, and setting them a constant example of
vigilance and resolution. But neither hope nor
courage, neither vigilance nor resolution, availed
to deprive the foe of the advantage he had gained
in effecting a lodgment among the ruins, where
four or five different warriors still maintained a
hot fire upon the hovel, doing, of course, little
harm, as it was entirely deserted, but threatening
mischief enough, when it should fall into their
hands,a catastrophe that was deferred only in
consequence of the extreme cautiousness with
which they now conducted hostilities, the
travellers
making only a show of defending it, though
sensible that it almost entirely commanded the
ravine.
It was now more than an hour and a half since
Nathan had departed, and Roland was beginning
himself to feel the hope he encouraged in the
others, that the man of peace had actually
succeeded
in effecting his escape, and that the wild
whoop which he at first esteemed the evidence of
his capture or death, and the assault that followed
it, had been caused by some circumstance having
no relation to Nathan whatever,perhaps by the
arrival of a reinforcement, whose coming had
infused
new spirit into the breasts of the so long
baffled assailants. If he
have
escaped, he
muttered
,
he must already be near the camp:a
strong man and fleet runner might reach it in an
hour. In another hour,nay, perhaps in half an
hour, for there are good horses and bold hearts in
the band,I shall hear the rattle of their hoofs in
the wood, and the yells of these cursed bandits,
scattered like dust under their footsteps. If I can
but hold the ravine for an hour! Thank Heaven,
the moon is a second time lost in clouds, the
thunder
is again rolling through the sky! A tempest
now were better than gales of Araby,a
thunder-gust
were our salvation.
The wishes of the soldier seemed about to be
fulfilled. The clouds, which for half an hour had
been breaking up, again gathered, producing
thicker darkness than before; and heavy peals of
thunder, heralded by pale sheets of lightning that
threw a ghastly but insufficient light over objects,
were again heard rattling at a distance over the
woods. The fire of the savages began to slacken,
and by and by entirely ceased. They waited
perhaps
for the moment when the increasing glare
of the lightning should enable them better to
distinguish
between the broken timbers, the objects
of so many wasted volleys, and the crouching
bodies of the defenders.
The soldier took advantage of this moment of
tranquillity to descend to the river to quench his
thirst, and to bear back some of the liquid element
to his fainting followers. While engaged in this
duty he cast his eyes upon the scene, surveying
with sullen interest the flood that cut off his escape
from the fatal hovel. The mouth of the ravine
was wide and scattered over with rocks and
bushes, that even projected for some little space
into the water, the latter vibrating up and down
in a manner that proved the strength and
irregularity
of the current. The river was here
bounded
by frowning cliffs, from which, a furlong or
two above, had fallen huge blocks of stone that
greatly contracted its narrow channel; and among
these the swollen waters surged and foamed with
the greatest violence, producing that hollow roar,
which was so much in keeping with the solitude
of the ruin, and so proper an accompaniment to
the growling thunder and the wild yells of the
warriors. Below these massive obstructions, and
opposite the mouth of the ravine, the channel had
expanded into a pool; in which the waters might
have regained their tranquility and rolled along
in peace, but for the presence of an island, which,
growing up in the centre of the expanse,
consolidated
by the roots of a thousand willows and
other trees that delight in such humid soils, and,
in times of flood, covered by a raft of drift timber
entangled among its trees, presented a barrier, on
either side of which the current swept with speed
and fury, though, as it seemed, entirely unopposed
by rocks. In such a current, as Roland thought,
there was nothing unusually formidable; a daring
swimmer might easily make his way to the island
opposite, where, if difficulties were presented by
the second channel, he might as easily find shelter
from enemies firing on him from the banks. He
gazed again on the island, which, viewed in the
gloom, revealed to his eyes only a mass of
shadowy
boughs, resting in peace and security. His
heart beat high with hope, and he was beginning
to debate the chances of success in an attempt to
swim his party across the channel on the horses,
when a flash of lightning, brighter than usual,
disclosed
the fancied island a cluster of shaking
treetops
,
whose trunks, as well as the soil that
supported
them, were buried fathoms deep in the
flood. At the same moment, he heard, coming on
a gust that repelled and deadened for a time the
louder tumult from the rocks above, other roaring
sounds, indicating the existence of other rocky
obstructions at the foot of the island, among which,
as he could now see, the same flash having shown
him the strength of the current in the centre of
the channel, the swimmer must be dashed, who
failed to find footing on the island.
We are imprisoned, indeed, he muttered,
bitterly
;
Heaven itself has deserted us.
As he uttered these repining words, stooping to
dip the canteen with which he was provided, in
the water, a little canoe, darting forward with a
velocity that seemed produced by the combined
strength of the current and the rower, shot
suddenly
among the rocks and bushes at the entrance
VOL. I.19
of the ravine, wedging itself fast among them,
and a human figure leaped from it to the shore.
The soldier started back aghast, as if from a
dweller of another world; but recovering his
courage in an instant, and not doubting that he
beheld in the unexpected visiter a Shawnee and
foe, who had thus found means of assailing his
party on the rear, he rushed upon the stranger
with drawn sword, for he had laid his rifle aside,
and taking him at a disadvantage, while stooping
to drag the boat further ashore, he smote him
such a blow over the head, as brought him
instantly
to the ground, a dead man to all
appearance
,
since, while his body fell upon the earth, his
head,or at least a goodly portion of it, sliced
away by the blow,went skimming into the
water.
Die, dog! said Roland, as he struck the blow;
and not content with that, he clapped his foot on
the victim's breast, to give him the coup-de-grce;
when, wonder of wonders, the supposed Shawnee
and dead man opened his lips, and cried aloud, in
good choice Salt-River English,'Tarnal death
to you, white man! what are you atter?
It was the voice, the never-to-be-forgotten voice,
of the captain of horse-thieves; and as Roland's
sword dropped from his hand in the surprise, up
rose Roaring Ralph himself, his eyes rolling, as
Roland saw by a second flash of lightning, with
thrice their usual obliquity, his left hand
scratching
among the locks of hair exposed by the blow
of the sabre, which had carried off a huge slice
of his hat, without doing other mischief, while his
right brandished a rifle, which he handled as if
about to repay the favour with interest. But the
same flash that revealed his visage to the
astonished
soldier, disclosed also Roland's features
to him, and he fairly yelled with joy at the sight.
'Tarnal death to me! he roared, first leaping
into the air and cracking his heels together, then
snatching at Roland's hand, which he clutched and
twisted with the gripe of a bear, and then
cracking
his heels together again, 'tarnal death to me,
sodger, but I know'd it war
you
war in a
squabblification
!
I heerd the cracking and the squeaking;
`'Tarnal death to me!' says I, `thar's Injuns!' And
then I thought, and says I, `'Tarnal death to me,
who are they atter?' and then, 'tarnal death to
me, it came over me like a strick of lightning, and
says I, `'Tarnal death to me, but it 's
anngelliferous
madam that holped me out of the halter!'
Stranger! he roared, executing another
demivolte
,
h'yar am I, come to do anngelliferous
madam's fighting agin all critturs human and
inhuman
,
Christian and Injun, white, red, black, and
party-coloured. Show me angelliferous madam,
and then show me the abbregynes; and if you ever
seed fighting, 'tarnal death to me, but you 'll say
it war only the squabbling of seed-ticks and
bluebottle
flies! I say, sodger, show me anngelliferous
madam: you cut the halter and you cut the
tug; but it war madam the anngel that set you
on: wharfo', I'm her dog and her niggur from
now to etarnity, and I'm come to fight for her,
and lick her enemies till you shall see nothing left
of 'em but ha'rs and nails!
Of these expressions, uttered with extreme
volubility
and the most extravagant gestures, Roland
took no notice; his astonishment at the
horse-thief's
appearance was giving way to new thoughts
and hopes, and he eagerly demanded of Ralph
how he had got there.
In the dug-out,
*
*
Dug-out,
a canoe,because
dug out,
or hollowed, with
the axe.
said Ralph; found her
floating among the bushes, ax'd me out a flopper
Flopper,
a flapper, a paddle.
with my tom-axe in no time, jumped in, thought
of angelliferous madam, and came down the falls
like a cob in a corn-vanar'n't I the leaping trout
of the waters? Strannger, I don't want to sw'ar;
but I reckon if there ar'n't hell up thar among
the big stones, thar's hell no other whar all about
Salt River! But I say, sodger, I came here not to
talk nor cavort,
Cavort,
to play pranks, to gasconade.
but to show that I'm the man,
Ralph Stackpole, to die dog for them that pats me.
So, whar's anngelliferous madam? Let me see
her, sodger, that I may feel wolfish when I jumps
among the red-skins; 'for I'm all for a fight, and
thar ar'n't no run in me.
It is well indeed, if it shall prove so, said
Roland
,
not without bitterness; for it is to you
alone we owe all our misfortunes.
With these words, he led the way to the place,
where, among the horses, concealed among
brambles
and stones, lay the unfortunate females,
cowering
on the bare earth. The pale sheets of
lightning
,
flashing now with greater frequency,
revealed
them to Ralph's eyes, a ghastly and
melancholy pair, whose situation and appearance
were well fitted to move the feelings of a manly
bosom; Edith lying almost insensible across Telie's
knees, while the latter, weeping bitterly, yet
seemed
striving to forget her own distresses, while
ministering
to those of her companion.
'Tarnal death to me! cried Stackpole,
looking
upon Edith's pallid visage and rayless eyes
with more emotion than would have been
expected
from his rude character, or than was
expressed
in his uncouth phrases, if that don't make
me eat a niggur, may I be tetotaciously chawed
up myself! Oh, you anngelliferous madam! jist
look up and say the word, for I'm now ready to
mount a wild-cat: jist look up, and don't make a
die of it, for thar's no occasion: for ar'n't I your
niggur-slave, Ralph Stackpole? and ar'n't I come
to lick all that's agin you, Mingo, Shawnee,
Delaware
,
and all! Oh, you anngelliferous crittur!
don't swound away, but look up, and see how I'll
wallop 'em!
And here the worthy horse-thief, seeing that
his exhortations produced no effect upon the
apparently
dying Edith, dropped upon his knees,
and began to blubber and lament over her, as if
overcome by his feelings, promising her a world
of Indian scalps, and a whole Salt-river-full of
Shawnee blood, if she would only look up and
see how he went about it.
Show your gratitude by actions, not by
words, said Roland, who, whatever his cause for
disliking the zealous Ralph, was not unrejoiced at
his presence, as that of a valuable auxiliary: rise
up, and tell me, in the name of heaven, how you
succeeded in reaching this place, and what hope
there is of leaving it?
But Ralph was too much afflicted by the
wretched condition of Edith, whom his gratitude
for the life she had bestowed had made the
mistress paramount of his soul, to give much heed
to any one but herself; and it was only by dint of
hard questioning that Roland drew from him,
little by little, an account of the causes which had
kept him in the vicinity of the travellers, and
finally brought him to the scene of combat.
19*
It had been, it appeared, an eventful and
unlucky
day with the horse-thief, as well as the
soldier
.
Aside from his adventure on the beech-tree,
enough in all truth to mark the day for him with
a black stone, he had been peculiarly unfortunate
with the horses to which he had so
unceremoniously
helped himself. The gallant Briareus,
after sundry trials of strength with his new
master
,
had at last succeeded in throwing him from
his back; and the two-year-old pony, after
obeying
him the whole day with the docility of a
dog, even when the halter was round his neck,
and carrying him in safety until within a few
miles of Jackson's Station, had attempted the
same exploit, and succeeded, galloping off on the
back-track towards his home. This second loss
was the more intolerable, since Stackpole,
having
endured the penalty for stealing him,
considered
himself as having a legal, Lynch-like right
to the animal, which no one could now dispute. He
therefore returned in pursuit of the pony, until night
arrested his footsteps on the banks of the river,
which, the waters still rising, he did not care to
cross in the dark. He had therefore built a fire
by the road-side, intending to camp-out till
morning
.
And it was your fire, then, that checked us?
cried Roland, at this part of the story,it was
your
light we took for the watch-fire of Indians?
Injuns you may say, quoth Stackpole,
innocently
;
for thar war a knot of 'em I seed
sneaking over the ford: and jist as I was
squinting
a long aim at 'em, hoping I might smash two
of 'em at a lick, slam-bang goes a feller that had
got behind me, 'tarnal death to him, and roused
me out of my snuggery. Well, sodger, then I
jumps into the cane, and next into the timber;
for I reckoned all Injun creation war atter me.
And so I sticks fast in a lick; and then, to
sum-totalize
,
I wallops down a rock, eend foremost,
like a bull-toad: and, 'tarnal death to me, while
I war scratching my head, and wondering whar
I came from, I heerd the crack of the guns
across the river, and thought of anngelliferous
madam. 'Tarnal death to me, sodger, it turned
me wrong side out! and while I war axing all
natur' how I war to get over, what should I do
but see the old sugar-trough floating in the
bushes,I seed her in a strick of lightning. So
pops I in, and paddles I down, till I comes to the
rocks,and ar'nt they beauties? `H'yar goes for
grim death and massacreeation,' says I, and tuck
the shoot; and if I did n't fetch old dug-out
through slicker than snakes, and faster than a
well-greased thunderbolt, niggurs ar'n't niggurs,
nor Injuns Injuns: and, strannger, if you axes me
why, h'yar's the wharfo''twar because I thought
of anngelliferous madam! Strannger, I am the
gentleman to see her out of a fight; and so jist
tell her thar's no occasion for being uneasy; for,
'tarnal death to me, I'll mount Shawnees, and die
for her, jist like nothing.
Wretch that you are, cried Roland, whose
detestation of the unlucky cause of his troubles,
revived
by the discovery that it was to
his
presence
at the ford they owed their last and most fatal
disappointment, rendered him somewhat insensible
to the good feelings and courage which had
brought the grateful fellow to his assistance,
you were born for our destruction; every way
you have proved our ruin: but for you, my poor
kinswoman would have been now in safety
among her friends. Had she left you hanging on
the beech, you would not have been on the river,
to cut off her only escape, when pursued close at
hand by murderous savages.
The reproach, now for the first time
acquainting
Stackpole with the injury he had, though so
unintentionally and innocently, inflicted upon his
benefactress; and the sight of her, lying
apparently
half-dead at his feet, wrought up the feelings
of the worthy horse-thief to a pitch of desperate
compunction, mingled with fury.
If I'm the crittur that holped her into the fix,
I'm the crittur to holp her out of it. 'Tarnal
death to me, whar's the Injuns? H'yar goes to
eat 'em!
With that, he uttered a yell,the first human
cry that had been uttered for some time, for the
assailants were still resting on their arms,and
rushing up the ravine, as if well acquainted with
the localities of the Station, he ran to the ruin,
repeating his cries at every step, with a loudness
and vigour of tone that soon drew a response
from the lurking enemy.
H'yar, you 'tarnal-temporal, long-legged,
'tater-headed
,
paint-faces! he roared, leaping from
the passage floor to the pile of ruins before the
door of the hovel, (where Emperor yet lay
ensconced
,
and whither Roland followed him,) as if
in utter defiance of the foemen whom he hailed
with such opprobrious epithets,h'yar, you
bald-head
,
smoke-dried, punkin-eating, red-skins! you
half-niggurs! you 'coon-whelps! you snakes! you
varmints! you raggamuffins what goes about
licking women and children, and scar'ring
anngelliferous
madam! git up and show your
scalp-locks
;
for 'tarnal death to me, I'm the man to
take 'emcock-a-doodle-doo!
And the valiant horse-thief concluded his
warlike
defiance with such a crow as might have
struck consternation to the heart not merely of
the best game-cock in Kentucky, but to the bird
of Jove itself. Great was the excitement it
produced
among the warriors. A furious hubbub
was heard to arise among them, followed by many
wrathful voices exclaiming in broken English,
with eager haste, Know him dah! cuss' rascal!
Cappin Stackpole!steal Injun hoss! And the
`steal Injun hoss!' iterated and reiterated by a
dozen voices, and always with the most iracund
emphasis, enabled Roland to form a proper
conception
of the sense in which his enemies held
that offence, as well as of the great merits and
wide-spread fame of his new ally, whose mere
voice had thrown the red-men into such a
ferment
.
But it was not with words alone they vented their
displeasure. Rifle-shots and execrations were
discharged
together against the notorious enemy of
their pinfolds; who, nothing daunted, and nothing
loath, let fly his own `speechifier,' as he
denominated
his rifle, in return, accompanying the salute
with divers yells and maledictions, in which
latter
,
he showed himself, to say the truth, infinitely
superior to his antagonists. He would even, so
great and fervent was his desire to fight the
battles
of his benefactress to advantage, have
retained
his exposed stand on the pile of ruins, daring
every bullet, had not Roland dragged him down
by main force, and compelled him to seek a
shelter
like the rest, from which, however, he carried
on the war, loading and firing his piece with
wonderful
rapidity, and yelling and roaring all the
time with triumphant fury, as if reckoning upon
every shot to bring down an enemy.
But it was not many minutes before Roland
began
to fear that the fatality which had marked
all his relations with the intrepid horse-thief, had
not yet lost its influence, and that Stackpole's
present
assistance was any thing but advantageous
to his cause. It seemed, indeed, as if the savages
had been driven to increased rage by the
discovery
of his presence; and that the hope of
capturing
him
, the most daring and inveterate of all
the hungerers after Indian horse-flesh, and
requiting
his manifold transgressions on the spot,
had infused into them new spirit and fiercer
determination
.
Their fire became more vigorous,
their shouts more wild and ferocious: those who
had effected a lodgment among the ruins crept
nigher, while others appeared, dealing their shots
from other quarters close at hand; and, in fine,
the situation of his little party became so
precarious
,
that Roland, apprehending every moment a
general assault, and despairing of being again
able to repel it, drew them secretly off from the
ruin, which he abandoned entirely, and took
refuge
among the rocks at the head of the ravine.
It was then,while, unconscious of the sudden
evacuation of the hovel, but not doubting they
had driven the defenders into its interior, the
enemy poured in half a dozen or more volleys, as
preliminaries to the assault which the soldier
apprehended
,
that he turned to the unlucky Ralph;
and arresting him as he was about to fire upon
the foe from his new cover, demanded, with much
agitation, if it were not possible to transport
the hapless females in the little canoe, which his
mind had often reverted to as a probable means
of escape, to a place of safety.
"'Tarnal death to me," said Ralph, "thar's a
boiling-pot above and a boiling-pot below; but
ar'n't I the crittur to shake old Salt by the
fo'-paw
?
Can take anngelliferous madam down ar a
shoot that war ever seed!"
"And why, in Heaven's name," cried the
Virginian
,
"did you not say so before, and relieve
her from this horrible situation?"
"'Tarnal death to me, ar'n't I to do her fighting
first?" demanded the honest Ralph. "Jist let's
have another crack at the villians, jist for madam's
satisfaction; and then, sodger, if you're for taking
the shoot, I'm jist the salmon to show you the
way. But I say, sodger, I won't lie," he continued,
finding Roland was bent upon instant escape, while
the savages were yet unaware of their flight from
the hovel,"I won't lie, sodger;thar's rather a
small trough to hold madam and the gal, and me
and you and the niggur and the white man;"
(for Stackpole was already acquainted with the
number of the party;)"and as for the hosses,
'twill be all crucifixion to git 'em through old
Salt's fingers."
"Think not of horses, nor of us," said Roland.
"Save but the women, and it will be enough. For
the rest of us, we will do our best. We can keep
the hollow till we are relieved; for, if Nathan be
alive, relief must be now on the way." And in a
few hurried words, he acquainted Stackpole with
his having despatched the man of peace to seek
assistance.
"Thar's no trusting the crittur, Bloody
Nathan
,"
said Ralph; "though at a close hug, a
squeeze on the small ribs, or a kick-up of heels,
he's all splendiferous. Afore you see his ugly
pictur'
a'gin, 'tarnal death to me, strannger, you'll be
devoured;the red niggurs thar won't make two
bites at you. No, sodger,if we run, we run,
thar's the principle; we takes the water, the whole
herd together, niggurs, hosses and all,
partickelarly
the hosses; for, 'tarnal death to me, it's agin
my conscience to leave so much as a hoof. And
so, sodger, if you conscientiously thinks thar has
been walloping enough done on both sides, I'm
jist the man to help you all out of the bobbery;
though, cuss me, you might as well have cut me
out of the beech without so much hard axing!"
These words of the worthy horse-thief, uttered
as hurriedly as his own, but far more coolly,
animated
the spirits of the young soldier with double
hope; and taking advantage of the busy
intentness
with which the enemy still poured their fire
into the ruin, he despatched Ralph down the
ravine
to prepare the canoe for the women, while
he himself summoned Dodge and Emperor to
make an effort for their own deliverance.
CHAPTER XVII.
The
roar of the river, alternating with peals of
thunder, which were now loud and frequent,
awoke many an anxious pang in Roland's bosom,
as he lifted his half unconscious kinswoman from
the earth, and bore her to the canoe; but his
anxiety was much more increased, when he came
to survey the little vessel itself, which was scarce
twelve feet in length, and seemed ill fitted to
sustain
the weight of even half the party. It was,
besides, of the clumsiest and worst possible figure,
a mere log, in fact, roughly hollowed out, without
any attempt having been made to point its
extremities
;
so that it looked less like a canoe than an
ox-trough; which latter purpose it was perhaps
designed chiefly to serve, and intended to be used
for the former only when an occasional rise of
the waters might make a canoe necessary to the
convenience of the maker. Such a vessel,
managed
by a skilful hand, might indeed bear the two
females, with honest Ralph, through the foaming
rapids below; but Roland felt, that to burthen it
with others would be to insure the destruction of
all. He resolved, therefore, that no others should
enter it; and, having deposited Telie Doe in it by
the side of Edith, he directed Dodge and
Emperor
,
to mount their horses, and trust to their
VOL. I20
strength and courage for a safe escape. To
Emperor
,
whatever distaste he might have for the
adventure
,
this was an order, like all others, to be
obeyed without murmuring; and, fortunately,
Pardon Dodge's humanity, or his discretion, was
so strongly fortified by his confidence in the
swimming virtues of his steed, that he very
readily
agreed to try his fortune on horseback.
Any thing to git round them everlasting
varmint
,though
it a'n't no sich great circumstance
to fight 'em, neither, where one 's a kinder got
one's hand in, he cried, with quite a joyous
voice; and added, as if to encourage the others,
it's my idea, that, if such an old crazy boat can
swim the river, a hoss can do it a mortal heap
better.
'Tarnal death to me, said Ralph Stackpole,
them 's got the grit that 'll go down old Salt on
horseback! But it 's all for the good of
anngelliferous
madam: and, so, if thar's any hard rubbing,
or drowning, or any thing of that synonimous
natur'
,
to happen, it ar'n't a thing to be holped no
how. But hand in the guns and speechifiers, and
make ready for a go; for, 'tarnal death to me, the
abbregynes ar' making a rush for the cabin!
There was indeed little time left for
deliberation
.
While Ralph was yet speaking, a dozen or
more flaming brands were suddenly seen flung
into the air, as if against the broken roof of the
cabin, through which they fell into the interior;
and, with a tremendous whoop, the savages, thus
lighting the way to the assault, rushed against
their fancied prey. The next moment, there was
heard a yell of disappointed rage and wonder,
followed by a rush of men into the ravine.
Now, sodger, cried Ralph, stick close to
the trough; and if you ever seed etarnity at
midnight
,
you 'll see a small sample now!
With that, he pushed the canoe into the stream,
and Roland urging his terrified steed with voice
and spur, and leading his cousin's equally alarmed
palfry, leaped in after him, calling to Dodge and
Emperor to follow. But how they followed, or
whether they followed at all, it was not easy at
that moment to determine; for a bright flash of
lightning, glaring over the river, vanished
suddenly
,
leaving all in double darkness, and the
impetuous
rush of the current whirled him he knew
not whither; while the crash of the thunder that
followed, prevented his hearing any other noise,
save the increasing and never absent roar of the
waters. Another flash illuminated the scene, and
during its short-lived radiance he perceived
himself
flying, as it almost seemed, through the water,
borne along by a furious current betwixt what
appeared to him two lofty walls of crag and forest,
towards those obstructions in the channel, which,
in times of flood, converted the whole river into a
boiling caldron. They were masses of rock,
among which had lodged rafts of drift timber,
forming a dam or barrier on either side of the
river, from which the descending floods were
whirled into a central channel, ample enough in
the dry season to discharge the waters in quiet, but
through which they were now driven with all the
hurry and rage of a torrent. The scene, viewed
in the momentary glare of the lightning, was
indeed terrific: the dark and rugged walls on
either side, the ramparts of timber of every shape
and size, from the little willow sapling to the full
grown sycamore, piled high above the rocks, and
the rushing gulf betwixt them, made up a
spectacle
sufficient to appal the stoutest heart; and
Roland
gasped for breath, as he beheld the little
canoe whirl into the narrow chasm, and then
vanish, even before the light was over, as if
swallowed
up in its boiling vortex.
But there was little time for fear or conjecture.
He cast the rein of the palfry from his hand,
directed Briareus's head towards the abyss, and
the next moment, sweeping in darkness and with
the speed of an arrow, betwixt the barriers, he
felt his charger swimming beneath him in
comparatively
tranquil waters. Another flash
illumined
hill and river, and he beheld the little canoe
dancing along in safety, scarce fifty yards in
advance
,
with Stackpole waving the tattered
fragments
of his hat aloft, and yelling out a note of
triumph. But the lusty hurrah was unheard by
the soldier. A more dreadful sound came to his
ears from behind, in a shriek that seemed uttered
by the combined voices of men and horses, and
was heard even above the din of the torrent. But
it was as momentary as dreadful, and if a cry of
agony, it was of agony that was soon over. Its
fatal cause was soon exhibited, when Roland,
awakened by the sound from the trance, which,
during the brief moment of his passage through
the abyss, had chained his faculties, turned, by a
violent jerk, the head of his charger up the stream,
in the instinctive effort to render assistance to his
less fortunate followers. A fainter flash than
before
played upon the waters, and he beheld two or
three dark masses, like the bodies of horses,
hurried
by among the waves, whilst another of lesser
bulk and human form suddenly rose from the
depth of the stream at his side. This he instantly
grasped in his hand, and dragged half across his
saddle-bow, when a broken, strangling
exclamation
,
Lorra-gggor! made him aware that he
had saved the life of the faithful Emperor. Clutch
fast to the saddle, he cried; and the negro
obeying
with another ejaculation, the soldier turned
Briareus again down the stream, to look for the
canoe. But almost immediately his charger struck
the ground; and Roland, to his inexpressible joy,
found himself landed upon a projecting bank, on
which the current had already swept the canoe,
with its precious freight, unharmed.
If that ar'n't equal to coming down a strick
of lightning, cried Roaring Ralph, as he helped
the soldier from the water, thar's no legs to a
jumping bull-frog! Smash away, old Salt! he
continued, apostrophizing with great exultation
and self-admiration, the river whose terrors he
had thus so successfully defied; ar'n't I the
gentleman
for you? Roar as much as you cussed
please;when it comes to fighting for
anngelliferous
madam, I can lick you, old Salt, 'tarnal death
to me! And so, anngelliferous madam, don't you
car' a copper for the old crittur'; for thar's more
in his bark than his bite. And as for the
abbregynes
,
if I've fout 'em enough for your
satisfaction
,
we 'll jist say good-by to 'em, and leave 'em
to take the scalp off old Salt.
The consolation thus offered by the worthy
captain
of horse-thieves was lost upon Edith, who,
locked in the arms of her kinsman, and sensible
of her escape from the horrid danger that had so
long surrounded her, sensible also of the peril
from which he had just been released, wept her
terrors away upon his breast, and for a moment
almost forgot that her sufferings were not yet
over.
It was only for an instant that the young soldier
indulged his joy. He breathed a few words of
comfort and encouragement, and then turned to
20 *
inquire after Dodge, whose gallant bearing in the
hour of danger had conquered the disgust he first
felt at his cowardice, and won upon his gratitude
and respect. But the Yankee appeared not, and
the loud calls Roland made for him were echoed
only by the hoarse roar from the barriers, now
left far behind, and the thunder that yet pealed
through the sky. Nor could Emperor, when
restored
a little to his wits, which had been greatly
disturbed by his own perils in the river, give any
satisfactory account of his fate. He could only
remember that the current had borne himself
against the logs, under which he had been swept,
and whirled he knew not whither, until he found
himself in the arms of his master; and Dodge,
who had rushed before him into the flood, he
supposed
,
had met a similar fate, but without the
happy termination that marked his own.
That the Yankee had indeed found his death
among the roaring waters, Roland could well
believe
,
the wonder only being how the rest had
escaped in safety. Of the five horses, three only
had reached the bank, Briareus and the palfry,
which had fortunately followed Roland down the
middle of the chasm, and the horse of the unlucky
Pardon. The others had been either drowned
among the logs, or swept down the stream.
A few moments sufficed to acquaint Roland
with these several losses; but he took little time to
lament them. The deliverance of his party was
not yet wholly effected, and every moment was to
be improved, to put it, before daylight, beyond the
reach of pursuit. The captain of horse-thieves
avouched himself able to lead the way from the
wilderness, to conduct the travellers to a safe ford
below, and thence, through the woods, to the
rendezvous
of the emigrants.
Let it be anywhere, said Roland, where
there is safety; and let us not delay a moment
longer. Our remaining here can avail nothing to
poor Dodge.
With these words, he assisted his kinswoman
upon her palfry, placed Telie Doe upon the horse
of the unfortunate Yankee, and giving up his own
Briareus to the exhausted negro, prepared to
resume
his ill-starred journey on foot. Then, taking
post on the rear, he gave the signal to his new
guide; and once more the travellers were buried
in the intricacies of the forest.
CHAPTER XVIII.
It
was at a critical period when the travellers
effected
their escape from the scene of their late
sufferings. The morning was already drawing
nigh, and might, but for the heavy clouds that
prolonged the night of terror, have been seen
shooting its first streaks through the eastern skies.
Another half hour, if for that half hour they
could have maintained their position in the
ravine
,
would have seen them exposed in all their
helplessness to the gaze, and to the fire of the
determined
foe. It became them to improve the
few remaining moments of darkness, and to make
such exertions as might put them, before dawn,
beyond the reach of discovery or pursuit.
Exertions were, accordingly, made; and,
although
man and horse were alike exhausted, and
the thick brakes and oozy swamps through which
Roaring Ralph led the way, opposed a thousand
obstructions to rapid motion, they had left the
fatal ruin at least two miles behind them, or so
honest Stackpole averred, when the day at last
broke over the forest. To add to the satisfaction
of the fugitives, it broke in unexpected splendour.
The clouds parted, and, as the floating masses
rolled lazily away before a pleasant morning
breeze, they were seen lighted up and tinted with
a thousand glorious dyes of sunshine.
The appearance of the great luminary was
hailed
with joy, as the omen of a happier fate than
had been heralded by the clouds and storms of
evening. Smiles began to beam from the haggard
and care-worn visages of the travellers; the very
horses seemed to feel the inspiring influence of
the change; and as for Roaring Ralph, the sight
of his beautiful benefactress recovering her good
looks, and the exulting consciousness that it was
his
hand which had snatched her from misery
and death, produced such a fever of delight in
his brain as was only to be allayed by the most
extravagant expressions and actions. He assured
her a dozen times over, `he was her dog and her
slave, and vowed he would hunt her so many
Injun scalps, and steal her such a 'tarnal chance
of Shawnee hosses, thar should'nt be a gal in all
Kentucky should come up to her for stock and
glory:' and, finally, not content with making a
thousand other promises of an equally extravagant
character, and swearing, that, `if she axed it, he
would go down on his knees, and say his prayers
to her,' he offered, as soon as he had carried her
safely across the river, to `take the back-track,
and lick, single-handed, all the Injun abbregynes
that might be following.' Indeed, to such a pitch
did his enthusiasm run, that, not knowing how
otherwise to give vent to his overcharged feelings,
he suddenly turned upon his heel, and shaking his
fist in the direction whence he had come, as if
against the enemy who had caused his
benefactress
so much distress, he pronounced a formal
and emphatic curse upon their whole race `from
the head-chief to the commoner, from the
whiskey-soaking
warrior down to the pan-licking
squall-a-baby
,'
all of whom he anathematized with as much
originality as fervour of expression; after which,
he proceeded with more sedateness, to resume his
post at the head of the travellers, and conduct
them onwards on their way.
Another hour was now consumed in diving
amid cane-brakes and swamps, to which Roaring
Ralph evinced a decidedly greater partiality than
to the open forest, in which the travellers had
found themselves at the dawn; and in this he
seemed to show somewhat more of judgment and
discretion than would have been argued from his
hair-brained conversation; for the danger of
stumbling upon scouting Indians, of which the
country now seemed so full, was manifestly
greater
in the open woods than in the dark and almost
unfrequented cane-brakes: and the worthy
horse-thief
,
with all his apparent love of fight, was not
at all anxious that the angel of his worship should
be alarmed or endangered, while entrusted to his
zealous safe-keeping.
But it happened in this case, as it has happened
with better and wiser men, that Stackpole's
cunning
over-reached itself, as was fully shown in the
event; and it would have been happier for
himself
and all, if his discretion, instead of plunging
him among difficult and almost impassable bogs,
where a precious hour was wasted in effecting a
mere temporary security and concealment from
observation, had taught him the necessity of
pushing
onwards with all possible speed, so as to leave
pursuers, if pursuit should be attempted, far
behind
.
At the expiration of that hour, so
injudiciously
wasted, the fugitives issued from the brake,
and stepping into a narrow path worn by the feet
of bisons among stunted shrubs and parched
grasses, along the face of a lime-stone hill,
sparingly
scattered over with a similar barren growth,
began to wind their way downward into a hollow
vale, in which they could hear the murmurs, and
perceive the glimmering waters, of the river, over
which they seemed never destined to pass.
Thar
', 'tarnal death to me! roared Ralph,
pointing downwards with triumph, arn't that old
Salt now, looking as sweet and liquorish as a
whole trough-full of sugar-tree? We'll jist take
a dip at him, anngelliferous madam, jist to wash
the mud off our shoes; and then, 'tarnal death to
me, fawwell to old Salt and the abbregynes
together
,cock-a-doodle-doo!
With this comfortable assurance, and such
encouragement
as he could convey in the lustiest
gallicantation ever fetched from lungs of man or
fowl, the worthy Stackpole, who had slackened
his steps, but without stopping, while he spoke,
turned his face again to the descent; when,as
if that war-cry had conjured up enemies from the
very air,a rifle bullet, shot from a bush not six
yards off, suddenly whizzed through his hair,
scattering
a handful of it to the winds; and while a
dozen more were, at the same instant, poured
upon other members of the unfortunate party,
fourteen or fifteen savages rushed out from their
concealment among the grass and bushes, three
of whom seized upon the rein of the unhappy
Edith, while twice as many sprang upon Captain
Forrester, and, before he could raise an arm in
defence, bore him to the earth, a victim or a
prisoner
.
So much the astounded horse-thief saw with his
own eyes; but before he could make good any
of the numberless promises he had volunteered
during the morning journey, of killing and eating
the whole family of North American Indians, or
exemplify the unutterable gratitude and
devotion
he had as often professed to the fair
Virginian
,
four brawny barbarians, one of them rising
at his side and from the very bush whence the
bullet had been discharged at his head, rushed
against him, flourishing their guns and knives, and
yelling with transport, Got you
now
, Cappin
Stackpole, steal-hoss! No go steal no hoss no
more! roast on great big fire!
'Tarnal death to me! roared Stackpole,
forgetting
every thing else in the instinct of
self-preservation
;
and firing his piece at the nearest
enemy
,
he suddenly leaped from the path into the
bushes on its lower side, where was a precipitous
descent, down which he went rolling and
crashing
with a velocity almost equal to that of the
bullets that were sent after him. Three of the
four assailants immediately darted after in
pursuit
,
and their shouts growing fainter and fainter
as they descended, were mingled with the loud
yell of victory, now uttered by a dozen savage
voices from the hill-side.
It was a victory, indeed, in every sense,
complete
,
almost bloodless, as it seemed, to the
assailants
,
and effected at a moment when the hopes of
the travellers were at the highest: and so sudden
was the attack, so instantaneous the change from
freedom to captivity, so like the juggling
transition
of a dream the whole catastrophe, that
Forrester
,
although overthrown and bleeding from
two several wounds received at the first fire, and
wholly in the power of his enemies, who
flourished
their knives and axes in his face, yelling with
exultation; could scarce appreciate his situation,
or understand what dreadful misadventure had
happened, until his eye, wandering among the
dusky arms that grappled him, fell first upon the
body of the negro Emperor, hard by, gored by
numberless wounds, and trampled by the feet of
his slayers, and then upon the apparition, a
thousand
times more dismal to his eyes, of his
kinswoman
snatched from her horse and struggling in
the arms of her savage captors. The phrensy
with which he was seized at this lamentable sight
endowed him with a giant's strength; but it was
exerted in vain to free himself from his enemies,
all of whom seemed to experience a barbarous
delight
at his struggles, some encouraging him with
loud laughter and in broken English, to continue
them, while others taunted and scolded at him
more like shrewish squaws than valiant warriors,
assuring him that they were great Shawnee
fighting-men
,
and he a little Long-knife dog, entirely
beneath their notice: which expressions, though
at variance with all his preconceived notions of
the stern gravity of the Indian character, and
rather indicative of a roughly jocose than a
darkly
ferocious spirit, did not prevent their taking the
surest means to quiet his exertions and secure
their prize, by tying his hands behind him with a
thong of buffalo hide, drawn so tight as to inflict
the most excruciating pain. But pain of body
was then, and for many moments after, lost in
agony of mind, which could be conceived only by
him who, like the young soldier, has been
doomed
,
once in his life, to see a tender female, the
nearest and dearest object of his affections, in the
hands of enemies, the most heartless, merciless,
and brutal of all the races of men. He saw her
pale visage convulsed with terror and despair,
he beheld her arms stretched towards him, as if
beseeching the help he no longer had the power
to render,and expected every instant the fall of
the hatchet, or the flash of the knife, that was to
pour her blood upon the earth before him. He
would have called upon the wretches around for
pity, but his tongue clove to his mouth, his brain
spun round; and such became the intensity of his
feelings, that he was suddenly bereft of sense,
and fell like a dead man to the earth, where he
lay for a time, ignorant of all events passing
around, ignorant also of the duration of his
insensibility
.
END OF VOL. I.